Google 



This is a digital copy of a book lhal w;ls preserved for general ions on library shelves before il was carefully scanned by Google as pari of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

Il has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one thai was never subject 

to copy right or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often dillicull lo discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher lo a library and linally lo you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud lo partner with libraries lo digili/e public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order lo keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial panics, including placing Icchnical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make n on -commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request thai you use these files for 
personal, non -commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort lo Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each lile is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use. remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 

countries. Whether a book is slill in copyright varies from country lo country, and we can'l offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through I lie lull lexl of 1 1 us book on I lie web 
al |_-.:. :.-.-:: / / books . qooqle . com/| 



EMILIUS AND SOPHIA 



( 



I 






VOL. IV. 



-, -. ^-*-_ 



:-*"j 



■^— — — — i i ■ ■ ■ ■ 



£ M I L I U -S; 

*, 

A NEW SYSTEM 

O F 

E D U C A T I O N. 



Continuation of Book V. 

BY this time, I fuppofe, the reader is too 
well acquainted with me and my pupil, 
to imagine us, according to the cuftom 
of others, both afleej) in a warm pbft-chaife, tra- 
velling without feeing or obfefving any thing, 
annihilating the interval between our departure 
and our arrival, and, by the rapidity of our jour < 
hey, lofing time, by way of faving it. 

Men complain that life is Ihort, and yet they 
endeavour to render it fhorter; not knowing how 
to make a proper ufe of it, they lament the ra- 
pidity of time, and yet it is evident that it paffes 
away much flower than they would have it. Al- 
ways eager after fome diftant object, they regret 
the intermediate time which divides them from it : 
one wifhesfor to-morrow, another for a month 

Vol. IV. B fccnce> 



ft EMILIUSj OR A NEW 

hence, another for ten years hence - 9 no one has 
the philofophy to live to-day ; no dne is fatisfied 
with the prefent hour, but all think it drags too 
heavily. When they complain that time runs too 
fwiftly, they are notfincere; they would give 
any thing to accelerate its pace : they would 
readily expend their fortunes to con fume their 
whole life; and perhaps there is not an indivi- 
dual, who would not have reduced his exigence 
to the fpace of a few hours, if he had been matter 
of the power of cancelling .that time which 
hung heavy on his reftlefs mind ; or that which, 
in the eagernefs of his expectation, feparated 
him from the wifhed-for moment. One fpends 
half his days in going from Paris to Verfailles, 
from Verfailles to Paris, from town to country, 
from country to town, from one place to ano- 
ther; and his hours would be very tedious, if he 
had not the fecret of diffipating them in this 
manner. He really leaves his concerns, in or- 
der to find employment in the purfuit of bufi- 
nefs $ he thinks to fetch up the time he diffipates, 
and which otherwife he would not know how 
to employ ; or rather, on the contrary, he gallops 
/or the fake of galloping back again, and conies 
paft to town, for no other end, but to return in 
the fame manner. — Mortals t will you never ceafe 
to reproach nature ? Why will you complain that 
life is (hort, when it is not fo fhort as you wifh it I 
If there is one among you who can moderate his 
defires, fo as never to wifh time to fly, fuch a one 
will never think it too fhort. To live, and to 

enjoy 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. $ 

«njoy life* will, to him, be the fame thing 5 
and fhould it be his fate to die young, he will die 
full of days. 

If I had no other advantage in my plan, that 
elone would give it the preference above: any 
other. I did not educate Emillus to define or 
•wait for happinefs, but to enjoy it - y and when hfc 
-extends his defires beyond the prefent, it 1$ n<* 
with fuch an ardent impetuofity, as to make hifei 
regret the flownefs of time. He will not only 
enjoy the pleafure ofdefire, but that <*f going 
to the objecl: defired ; and his paflions are fo 
truly moderate, that he is always more where he 
is, than where he is to be. 

We do not therefore run like, couriers, but 
proceed like travellers. We do not only think 
of the two extremes, but of the interval which 
parted them. Travelling itfelf is a pleafure to 
us. We do not travel in a melancholy pofture, 
imprifoned in a clofe cage. We do not travel in 
luxury and fofteafe, like women* We do -riot 
/exclude ourfelves from the air, nor from the 
profpeft of the objects around us, nor lofe the 
opportunity of viewing them when it is agreeable 
to us. Emilius never fteps into a poft. chaifc, 
nor ever travels poft, but on urgent occafions. 
But what urgent bufinefs can Emilius havt, ex* 
ceptto enjoy life ? (hall I add^ and to do all the 
good in his power? No; for that itfelf is en- 
joying life. 

I can conceive but one way of travelling, 
pleafanter than on horkbackj vrz. going 011 

JB 2 foot. 



3. EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

foot. You fet out at your own time ; you ftop 
-when you pleafe ; ) ou take as much or as little 
-exercife as you choofe ; you view all the coun- 
try ; you tiirn to the right or left ; you examine 
every thing which ftrikes you ; you ftop at every 
.point of view. Do I fee a river : I coaft along 
it. . Do I approach a hanging wood : I walk un- 
der its ftiade. A grotto : I enter it. A quarry 
I examine its ftrata. Wherever I perceive any 
thing which invites me, I ftop. The moment my 
•curiofity is fatisfied, I depart, without waiting 
for horfes or poftilions. I am not -curious about 
picking out beaten paths, or convenient ways, 
but I tread wherever a man may pafs : I fee 
whatever man can fee -> and being dependent on 
no one but myfelf, 1 enjoy the moft perfect liberty 
-which man can poflefs. If bad weather over- 
takes me, and walking grows difagreeable, then 
I take horfe. If I am tired .... but Emilius is 
never tired ; he is robuft ; and why fhould he 
tire himfelf, who is never in hafte ? If he fhould 
jnake a ftay on his journey, he is never at a lofs 
for amufements j being a workman, he can al- 
ways divert himfelf among the artizans of the 
village. 

To travel on foot, is to travel like Thales, 
Plato, and Pythagoras. I can fcarce conceive 
howaPhilofopher canrefolveto travel any other 
way, and withdraw himfelf from the furvey of 
thofe treafures which he treads under feet, and 
which the earth lavifhes to his fight. Who, that 
has the leaft tafte for agriculture, would not be 

curious 



SYSTEM OF_EDUCATICrN. 5* 

curious to know the particular produ&s of the 
climate in the places he paffes through^ and the 
method of their cultivation ? W ho, that has the 
leaft tafte for natural hiftory, can traverfe a foil 
without examining it ? a rock, a mountain, or a 
meadow, without looking for foffils, or botani- 
zing, as he goes ? Our fafhionable philofophers. 
ftudy natural hiftory in their clofets ; they know 
the names of things, but have no" idea of theij? 
nature. But the cabinet of Emilius is richer 
than that of kings ; his cabinet is the whole 
earth. Here every thing is difpiayed in its pro- 
per place ; the Naturalift, who hath the care of 
it, arranging all things in the fined order. Not 
D'Aubenton himfelf could clafs them better. 
: What a variety of pleaftires are combined hjf 
fuch an agreeable method of travelling ! not to* 
fpeak of our healthy which it eftablifhes, or of 
our fpirits which it exhilirates. I have always 
found thofe who travel in eafy carriages, thought- 
ful, melancholy, peevifh, or uneafy j and thofe 
on foot always chearful, light-hearted, and fa- 
tisfied with every thing. How glad we are 
when we get to our night's lodging ! How fa- 
voury we find a coarfe meal ! With what plea- 
fure we fit down to table ! How foundly we fleej> 
in a hard bed ! When we only want to get to 
our journey's end, we may take a poft-chaife j 
but when we are inclined to travel, we fhould 
go on foot. 

If Sophia is not forgotten before we can naVe 
travelled fifty leagues in the manner I havede-* 

B 3 fct%K& v 



f EMTLIUS; OR, A KZVT 

fcribcdy either I muft have but little addrcfs, or 
Emilius muft have very little curiofity : for with 
fo much knowledge of nature, it is difficult to 7 
refift the temptation of acquiring more. Our 
curiofity increafes in proportion to our informal 
tion; and he knows juft enough to make him 
eager for further inftru&ion. 

Neverthelefs,. one object draws on another, 
and* we ftill keep going on. I fixed on a very 
diftant place for our firft journey : the pretence 
Was plaufible : on quitting Paris, we were to 
go a great way in purfuit of a wife. 

One day, having ftrayed longer than ufual in 
an unfrequented mountainous country, we loft 
our. way. But it was of no confequence to us ; 
gll way&.are good, if they do but lead to the 
*ri{hed-for object". But it is neceflary to meet 
with accommodations when one is hungry. In 
thts.fituation, luckily we met with a peafant, 
who took us into his cottage j and we eat eagerly 
of the coarfe diet he fet before us. Seeing us 
ntakieib hearty a meal, he faid, "If Providence 
had directed you to the other fide 6f the hill, 
yow would have been better entertained... 
You would have found a happy family. . . Such 
charitable folk* ! . . . Such good people ! . . . 
They have not, indeed, more good -will than 
I, but. they have better means, though it is faid 
|hft : they- have been much richer formerly . . . 
But, thank God, they do not feel the want of 
it ; -and all the country is the better for what 
they have remaining." 

The 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION 7 

The heart of the benevolent Emilius cheared 
up when he heard the expreffion of c Good 
c people.' " My friend (faid he) looking ear- 
ncftly at me, let us vifit the family who are fo 
much beloved in their neighbourhood. I fhould 
delight,to fee them; perhaps they may be glad 
to fee us like wife. I am certain that they will 
receive us well : if we are agreeable to them, 
they will not be other wife to us." 

Having got an exaft direction to the houfe, 
we fet out and wandered through the woods. A 
heavy rain overtook us on our way, and retarded 
our pace, but without obliging us to ftop. At 
length we reached our journey's end, and in the 
evening-arrived at the houfe, which, though 
plain, made fome appearance, in the mid ft of the 
hamlet. We prefentedourfelves, and requefted 
the rights of hofpitality. The mafter was called 
to fpeak to us, and he afked us fome queftions, 
but interrogated us with great complaifance. 
Without telling him the intent of our journey, 
we acquainted him with our having loft our way # 
His former profperity has given him the facility 
of difcerning the condition of men from their 
manners - y (they who have lived in high life, are 
feldom mi flake n in this refpect) and by means of 
this paffport, we gained admittance. 

We were conducted into a fmall apartment, 
but it was decent and convenient. They made 
us a fire, and we were provided with clothes, 
and every thing we had occafion for. '* How fa 
this ! (faid Emilius in a furprife) one would 

B 4 conclude* 



8 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW * 

conclude they had expected us. What a juft 
account the peafant gave us ! What care, what- 
attention, what benevolence ! and all for ftran- 
gers ! I can fancy myfelf in the days of Homer* 
** Ycu are in the right, faid I, not to be infenfible 
to fuch treatment, but do not befurprifed at it. 
Where ftrangers do not often come, they are 
always welcome. Nothing renders people more 
hofpitable, than their having occafion to exercife • 
it but feldom : it is the abundance of guefts 
which deftroys hofpitalijy. In the day* of' 
Homer, people travelled but little^ and travel- 
Ters-were every where well entertained. Per- 
haps we are the only guefts whom they have en- 
tertained here for many months paft." — "No 
matter, he replyed ; there is ftill fome merit in 
knowing how to live without company, and yet 
always to receive them well. ,K 

When we were dried, and a little refrefhed* 
we rejoined the mafter of the houfe. He pre- 
fented us to his wife, and fhe received us not 
only politely but heartily. Emilius was moftly 
honoured with her obfervation. A mother, in 
fuch a critical fituation as me was, feldom fees > 
without emotion, or at leaft without curiofity, a 
man of that juvenile age come into her houfe. 

They haftened fupper onour account. When 
we entered the room, we faw five plates : we 
feated ourfelves, and found a place vacant. A 
young damfel came in, made a low curtfey, and ' 
modeftly took her place without faying a word.. ' 
Emilius, who was taken up with the keennefs or 

bia 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. . g 

'Bis appetite, or with anfwering occafional quef- 
tioris, juft faluted her, and fell to (eating again* 
The principal object of his journey was fo far 
from his thoughts, that he imagined himfclf as 
yet at a great diftance from it. The converfa- 
tion turned on our having loft our way. " Shy 
(faid the mailer of the houfe to Emilius) you: 
feem to be a difcreet and amiable youth ; and J 
cannot help thinking that your governor and you 
arearrivedjiere wet and fatigued, in the feme con- 
ditioa as Mentor and Telemachus landed on the 
iflandofCalypfo." — "It is true, replied Emilius,, 
that we here meet with thehofpitality of Calypfo." 
To which his Mentor added, and the charms of 
Eucharis. But Emilias, though acquainted with- 
the Odyffey, had not read Telemachus, an& 
did not know who Eucharis was. As for the 
young maiden, I perceived her blufli exceedingly,, 
and look down upon her plate, with evident: 
marks of confufion. Her Mother, who obfcrved^ 
her emotion,, made figns to her father, and he- 
changed the converfation. — In fpeaking of his 
retirement, he was infenfibly led to a relation* 
of the accidents which occafioned it:, his mif— 
fortunes, the virtues of his wife, the confolation* 
they found in their mutual afte&ion, . and the" 
pleafant and tranquil life they led in their re- 
treat ; but never faid one word of their daughter •- 
Thefe circumftances formed an agreeable, and* 
affe&ing detail,, which no one could hear with— 
out emotion. Emilius moved with fympathetic: 
ttndernefc, ceafed eating,, to liftcn to the ftory>- 

B s, ' " A* 



10 • ' EMILIUSj OR ANEW 

At length, when the moft worthy of men came 
to that part of his hiftory, wherein he expatiated 
with pleafure on 1 the attachment of the moft 
amiable of women, the young traveller, forget- 
ting himfclf, grafped the hufbancTs hand, which 
he had taken hold of, and with the other feized 
the hand of his wife, which, in a kind of tranf- 
port, he bedewed with his tears. Every one 
was delighted with the youth's unaffe&ed fym- 
pathy : but the daughter, more afte&ed than 
any one at this fymptom of his tendernefs* 
thought that fhe beheld Telemachus weeping 
over the misfortunes of Philo&etus. She caft a 
look towards him by ftealth. in order to examine 
his perfon more attentively ; and {he perceived 
nothing which injured the" comparison. His 
open air denotes freedom without arrogance ; hi* 
manners are lively, without being giddy; his 
fenfibility rendered his look more gentle, and 
his countenance more affe&ing. Seeing him 
weep, flie was ready to mingle her tears with his* 
Though (he had fo good an excufe, yet a fecret 
fcame reftrained her. She even reproached her- 
felf for' the tears which were ready to ftart from 
her eyes, as if it were a weaknefs to bewail the 
misfortunes of her family. 

Her mother, who, during the whole time of 
fupper, had not ceafed to watch her, perceived 
the reftraint (he Was under, and delivered her 
from it, by fending her on fome little errand. 
She returned in a minute, but fo far from being 
recovered, that her confufion was vifible to 

every 



SYSTEM OF E0FCATIONV i* 

drery one. Her mother, with an affectionate 
tone, faid to her, " Sophia, compofe yourfelf $; 
will you never ceafe bewailing your parents mis* 
fortunes i You, who are our only comfort under 
them, ought not to be more affected with them* 
than we are." 

You might have perceived Emilius ftart at the 
Word Sophia. Struck with a name fo dear to- 
him,.heexpreffedhis furprize by cafting an eager 
look towards the amiable object that bore it.. 
4 Ah ! (faid he to himfelf,) Sophia ! art thou the 
Sophia whom my heart purfues ?'— He obferve^ 
her, he examines her with a kind of fear and 
doubt*. He does not difcover the exact figure. 
which 1 his imagination had painted; and he is at • 
st lofs to conclude, whether that which he beholds* 
is better or worfe* ^He-ftuUies every feature, he 
remarks every motion and gefture, and every- 
thing fuggefts a thoufand confufed thoughts. He 
would give the world that {he would but fpeak- 
He cafts a look of uneafinefs aiid perplexity to- 
wards me ;. his eyes afk me a thoufand qucftions^ 
He feems at every look, to fay ; Direct me, be- 
fore it is too late. If my affections are once- 
attached and milled, I {hall never recover them* 
again. 

Emilius, of all men ia the world r is kaft Ca- 
pable of difguife. How (hould he* conceal the 
flfrongeft emotion he had ever felt,, in the pre«~ 
fence of four fpectators who examined him r and!. 
among whom, the perfon in appearance the molt 
nauentive* was in. fact the moft obfervant. His, 
»' . & 6 conJ'ufioiii 



li EMILIUS; OR, A NEVT 

confufion did not efeape the penetrating eyes of 
Sophia ; his looks informed her that (he was the 
object which occafioncd it : flie perceived that 
his inquietude did not yet amount tolove ; but- 
fhe engrofles his intention, and that is fuflicient; 

Mothers have eyes as well as their daughters^, 
and have fomewhat more experience. Sophia's 
mother fmiled at the fwcceCs of our (themes. 
She read the hearts of the two young people ; (he 
perceived that it was time to rivet the affe&ions 
of the young Telemach us; (he made her daughter 
(peak. Her daughter, with her native fweetnefs, 
anfwered in a tone rendered- the more affe&ing 
by her timidity. At the firft (bund of her voice* 
Emilius gave himfelf up, It is Sophia ! he no* 
longer doubts it. If it (hould not be her, it is* 
now too late for him to*rfe*©ede. 

It was then that the charms of that bewitch- 
ing girl pierced like lightning through his heart; 
and he began to drink intoxicating draughts of, 
love from her eyes. He no longer talks, he no, 
longer gives you an anfwer ;. he fees nothing but 
Sophia, he hears nothing but Sophia : if (he 
fpeaks, his fympathizing lips move with her's ; 
if (he cafts down her eyes, he cafts down his ;_ 
if her heaving bofom feems to labour with a (igh^ 
he fetches one from the bottom of his heart. 
He feems even animated, with the fame foul a* 
Sophia. How fudden is the change in.hi& own ! 
It is now no longer Sophia's but Emilius's turn 
to tremble. Farewell freedom, fimplicity, and 
frankncfs. Confufed, fearful, and embaraffed, he. . 

no. 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. jj 

bo longer dares to look round him, for fear of 
finding that he is obferved. .Afhamed of dif* 
covering his feelings, he would be invifible to all 
the worlds that he might indulge himfelf in con- 
templating the abje& of his affe&ions, without 
being remarked. Sophia, on the other hand, 
takes qourage from the timidity of Emilius'j fhe 
perceives he*triumph, and enjoys it. 

Nol mojira gia, ben che in fuo car ne rich. 
She does not change countenance $, but not*- 
witbftanding her modeft air and downcaft eyes, 
her tender heart flutters with joy, and tells her 
that fhe has found Telemachus.. 

If I were to enter here into the plain and ark- 
lefs hiftory of their innocent loves, many per- 
haps would confidcr fuch; a detail as a frivolous 
amufement ; but they would be miftaken. They 
do not fufficiently confider how much the firft 
attachment of a man to a woman, influences the 
whole courfe of their lives.. They do not per- 
ceive that the firft lively impreflion made by love, 
or by the propenfity which often fupplies its 
place, is attended with efFefts,. of which the con- 
nexion is imperceptible in a courfe of years, but 
which neverthelefs operates till death. In the 
common treatifes of education they give us futile 
and pedantic leflbns, concerning the chimerical 
duties of children; and they do not fay one 
word concerning the moft important and the mod 
difficult objeft of education: namely, of that 
crifis, that intermediate fpace, which feparatcs 
youth from manhoods If I have.rendered thefe , 
efliys 



I 4 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

effays ufeful in any particular, it is chiefly by 
having expatiated on that effential topic omitted 
fey all others j and by not having differed myfelf 
to be difcouraged in the undertaking by a falfe 
delicacy, or afraid to engage in it on account of 
the difficulty of expreffiom If I have explained 
what ought to be done, I have faid what I ought 
to have faid : it is to no purpofe to tell me that 
the whole is a romance. Human nature itfelf is 
a very fine romance* If it is no where to be 
found but in my writings, is that my fault ? I 
intended it as the hiftory of my own fpecies : 
you, who deprave human nature, iris you wbe- 
turn" my book into a romance. 

Another consideration which adds weight to 
the former, is, that I am not defcribing a young 
man abandoned from his infancy to fear, defire, 
envy, pride, and all the paffions which are imbi- 
bed in the common mode of education : I am de- 
fcribing a youth who is not only ftruck with the 
firft impreffion of love, but with the firft paffioa 
of any kind ; and from this fingle paffion per- 
haps, of which he will always retain a lively 
fenfe, his difpofition will takes its unalterable 
bent. His manner of thinking, his fentiments* 
■his tafte, being once eftabliftied by a fettled paf- 
fion will acquire fuch confidence, tliat they will 
be incapable of change. 

It is eafy to conceive that between Emiliu* 
and me, a night after fuch an evening, would not 
be paffed wholly in fleeping. How then i Shall 
the conformity of a name alone have fuch aa 

influence 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION, 15 

influence over a difcreet man ? Is there but one, 
Sophia in the world ? Or, are they all alike in 
difpofition, as well as name ? Are all the So- 
phias he fees, his Sophia ? Is he fo weak as to 
be enamoured of a young ftranger, to whom he 
has never faid a word ? Stay, young man, con- 
fider and examine. As yet you do not know at 
whofe houfe you are ; and to hear you talk, one 
would conclude that you thought youxfelf at 
home already. 

But this was not a trme for fuch leffons> and 
they were not of a nature to be much attended 
to. They only ferved to attach the young man 
the ftronger to Sophia, by the earneftnefs with 
which he endeavoured to juftify his inclinations.. 
The conformity of the name, the fortuitous 
meeting, even my referve y all contributed to in- 
creafe his fenfibility : Sophia already ftands fo 
high in his efteem, &at he depends on making 
me fond of her likewife. 

In the morning, I imagined that Emilius 
would endeavour to fet himfelf off to the bcft ad- 
vantage he could, in his old travelling drefs. la 
fa&, he took fome pains ; but I could not for- 
bear fmiling to fee how eager he was to make ufe 
of the linen they had provided. I faw through 
hisdefigns ; it gave me pleafure to find, that by 
leaving room for making returns, and taking his* 
own in exchange, he made way for eftabl idling- 
a kind of correfpondence, which might give him 
a right to fend thither, and to renew his vifits. 

« 

I exij£&&& 



46 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

. I expe&ed to have found Sophia likewife, on: 
i*cr fide, fomewhat better dreffed ; but I was mif- 
taken. This common coquetry is of fervice to 
thofe only who want to pleafe the eye* But that of 
true love is more refined y and forms higher pre- 
tentions. Sophia was dreffed plainer than the day 
before, and even more negligently, N though ftilL 
with the moft fcrupulous neatnefs. I can disco- 
ver coquetry in this negligence, no farther thaa 
becaufe I perceive it to be affefted- Sophia is 
fenfible that an extraordinary appearance of 
drefs amounts to a declaration, but {he does not 
confider that a ftudied negligence of attire bears, 
the fame indication ; it (hows that (he is rather, 
ambitious of pleafing by the graces of her per.-- 
fon, than of her drefs. Of what consequence is 
it how (he is dreffed, if fhe does but engage at- 
tention ? Sophia, already affured of her conqueft,. 
is not fatisfied to ftrike the eyes of Emilius with, 
thofe charms, which his heart is not eager to ex- 
plore ; {he is not content that he {hould fee them, 
fhe would have him imagine them. He has not 
feen enough already, to be anxious about guef- 
fing the reft ? 

It may be fuppofed that during our difcourfe* 
that night, Sophia and her mother had alfofome. 
converfation together. Some confeflions were 
extorted, and fame inftru&ions giv«n. The 
next day they met well prepared* It is not. 
twelve hours fince our young couple firft faw 
each other ; they have not yet exchanged a {ingle 
word, and yet you may perceive that they under- 

{tand. 



MMPIMMMl 



SYSTEM OP EDUCATION. rjp 

Hand one another already. They do not accoft 
each, other in a familiar manner ; their addrefs is 
timid and aukward; their downcaft eyes feem to» 
avoid a meeting ; and th^t alone is a fignificant 
fymptom ; they mutually {hun each others thejr 
already perceive the neceffity of being myfteri- 
ous, before they have converfed together. Whea 
we took our leave, we defired the liberty of com- 
ing in perfon to return what we took away with 
us. Emilius formally requefted this permifiior* 
from the father and mother, at the fame time, 
that his eager eyes, turned towards the daughter* 
fued to her in a more pr effing manner. Sophia, 
faid nothing, made no motion, feemed to fee. 
nothing, to hear nothing \ but fhe blufhed ; and 
her blulhes conveyed even a clearer anfwer thai* 
her parents gave us. 

They allowed us to return, without preffing. 
us to ftay.' This conduct was difcreet : they 
willingly (heltered us as travellers, at a lofs foe 
a night's lodging, but it would not be decent for 
a lover to continue to lie in the fame houfe with, 
his miftrefs. 

We were fcarce got out of that beloved houfe* 
but Emilius thought of fixing fomewhere in the 
neighbourhood ; the neareft cottage feemed to* 
him too far diftant. He would even lie in the 
moat which furrounds the houfe. Indifcreet 
young man, faid I, with a tone of commifera- 
tron ; has your paflion blinded you already ? 
Are you loft to all propriety and reafon I Un- 
happy wretch \ you think you have an affection* 

for 



T8 EMItlUSj OR, A NEW 

for Sophia, and yet you would difhonour her ! 
What would people fay of her, if they knew 
that a young man, who came out of the houfe, 
lay concealed in the neighbourhood ? You love 
her, you fay! Ought you therefore to injure 
her reputation ? Is that a proper recompenfe : 
for the hofpitality with which her parents have" 
entertained you ? Would you reflect difgrace on 
her, from whom youexpeft happinefs yourfelf?- 
No, faid he, with great impetuofity ; but of 
what conference is the idle talk of mankind, 
and their unjuft fufpicions ? Have you not taught 
me to pay no regard to them ? Who can judge 
better than myfelf how much I honour Sophia ? 
My attachment fhall never be a difgrace to her. 
When my affections and endeavours render 
her all the homage (he deferves, in what can I 
affront her ? 

Dear Kmilius, faid I, embracing him, your* 
reafons are applicable only to yourfelf ; learn to 
apply them to her. Do not compare a woman's 
honour with that of a man ; they depend on dif- 
ferent principles. Thefe principles are equally 
folid and rational, becaufe they are equally de- 
rived from nature; and the fame virtue which 
makes you defpife the reports of men refpe£ting 
yourfelf, obliges you to pay a regard to them 
where your miftrefs is concerned. Your honour 
depends wholly on yourfelf; but her's is depen- 
dent on the opinion of others. To be negligent 
of her reputation, is to wound your own ; and 

you 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION* 1+ 

you forget that juftice which you owe to your- 
felf, if you are the oecafion of her not receiving 
that refpe<9: which is due to her. 

I proceeded then to explain to him thereafons 
of thefe diftin£Hons, and convinced him of the 
injuftice he would be guilty of in paying no re- . 
gard to them. Is he certain that he fhall be the 
hufband of Sophia, of whofe fentiments he is 
wholly ignorant ; who in confequence of her own 
inclinations, or of her parents, may have prior 
engagements, to whom he is a ftranger ; and 
who perhaps has not any of thofe correfpondent 
requifites, which render the marriage ftate hap- 
py ? Is he ignorant that fcandal fixes an indelible 
ftain upon a girl, which is not to be effaced even 
by her marriage with the perfonwho occafioned 
it ? What man of fenfibility would injure her: 
he loves ? What man of honour would give an 
unhappy woman oecafion to bewail for ever the 
mi fortune of having been agreeable to him ? 

Emilius, who is always apt to run into ex- 
tremes, was fo terrified at theconfequences I de- 
fcribed, that he began now to think himfclf much 
too near the abode of Sopia : he mends his 
pace : he looks round about him to difcover whe- 
ther we were overheard ; he would facrifice his 
own happinefs a thoufand times over to the ho- 
nour of his miftrefs ; he had rather never behold 
her again while he lives, than oecafion her the 
lealr. difpleafure. This is the firft fruit of the 
pains I have taken in his youth, fo to form his 
mind as to render it fufceptible of affe&ion. . .. * 

It 



20 EMILIUS; OR, ANEW 

It is our endeavour therefore to fettle ourfe!ve»v 
at a convenient diftance. We enquire, and are 
told there is a town within fix long miles ; and 
we endeavour to procure a lodging there, rather 
than in the adjacent villages, where our abode 
might look fufpicious. 

At this town at length we arrive ; our young: 
lover entertaining the mod pleafing as well as 
the moft prudential fentiments refpedting theob- 
je£r, of his affe&ions. It is thus that, directing. 
his growing paffion to preferve the appearance 
as well as the reality of virtue, I infenfibly re- 
concile the impetuofity of his inclinations to the 
laws of decorum. 

But matters are now approaching towards a 
crifis. All the grand difficulties are removed, 
all the great obftacles are furmounted ; the hard- 
eft tafk which remains, is to ayoid fporling r^y 
work by being in too much hafte to conclude it* 
Confidering die uncertainty of life, we fhould be 
careful to avoid that miftaken prudence of facri- 
ficing the prefent time to that which is to come : 
it is often facrificing what is, to what will never 
be. Let us endeavour to make men happy at 
every period of life, for fear,notwithftanding all 
our follicitude, they (hould die before they attain 
felicity. Befides, if there is a time toenjoy life,. 
it is certainly towards the clofe of adolefcency,. 
when the faculties of body and mind have at- 
tained their full vigour, and when a man in the 
rnidft of his career, views at a diftance the two- 
extremes., which make it appear fhort to his ima- 
gination,. 



SYSTEM CXF EDUCATION. « 

filiation. If unthinking youth are miftaken, it 
is not in coveting pleafure ; their miftake arifes 
from purfuing falfe objects of pleafure ; and 
while they are preparing for a future day, they 
have not the fenfe to make ufe of the prefent 
moment. 

Do but reflect on my Emilius.; juft turned of 
twenty, well made, well formed in mind and 
body, ftrong, healthy, adive, robuft, endowed 
with fenfe, reafon, goodnefs, humanity, under 
the influence of good manners and true tafte, in 
love with whatsis virtuous, pra&ifing the rules of 
benevolence, free from the (hackles of preju- 
dice, but fubjeft to the laws of discretion, and 
faithful to thofe of friendfhip, matter of all ufe- 
fill, and many ornamental, talents, rather in- 
different about riches, trufting for fupport to his 
own hands, and under no apprehenfions of want- 
ing bread, whatever changes of fortune may be- 
fall htm. — Behold him now inflamed with a grow- 
ing paffion : his heart expofed to the firft attacks 
of love ; his pleafing illufions prefent to him a 
new world of delight : he is fond of an amiable 
object, who is ftill more amiable in her.difpofi- 
tion, than in her perfon : he hopes for, and ex- 
perts that return which he believes to be his 
due ; it is a fympathy of foul, it is a concurrence 
of virtuous fentiments, which firft gave birth to 
their attachment. Such an attachment muft be 
durable : he devotes himfelf with confidence, and 
even with reafon, to the moft charming of all il- 
lufions, without fear, without regret, without 



&2 EMILIUS; Olt A NEW 

any other inquietude than that which is in fe pa- 
rable from the expectation of blifs. What can 
he want to add to his felicity? See, examine^ 
imagine what he can require further, and what 
will coincide with the happinefs he enjoys ? He 
Unites at one time all the bleilings 4ie can ac- 
quire; there is no making any additipn, without 
diminifhrng the ftock he pofleffes ; he is as happy 
as a man can be. Shall I interrupt fuch pure 
felicity? All that is valuable in life is centered 
in the happinefs he now taftes. What return 
could I make him equivalent to the blifs I Should 
deprive him of; Even the final completion of 
his defires would break its ftrongeft charm. It 
is infinitely more pleafing to hope for this fu- 
preme delight, than to obtain it : we enjoy it 
more in expectation than in fruition. O worthy 
Emilius, love, and be beloved ! Enjoy your paf- 
"fion a long while before you gratify it - 9 enjoy 
love and innocence at once ; enjoy an earthly 
paradife, in expeftation of another ; I will not 
Shorten this happy period of your life 5 I will 
even favour the enchantment, and prolong it as 
much as poffible. Alas ! it muft end, and that 
•in a fhort time ; but I will at leaft endeavour 
that you may always retain it in memory, and 
never repent that you once enjoyed it. 

Emilius did not forget the things we had bor- 
rowed. As foon as they were ready, we took 
iiorfe, and went expeditiously to return them. 
-He now had no fooner fet out, than he wide J 
to be at his journey's end. When the heart is 

2 a prey 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. aj 

fkf rey to paffion, we begin to experience the 
reftlefs moments of life. If my time has not 
been mifpent, his whole life, however * will not 
pafs in this manner,. 

. Unluckily the road is bad and intricate. We 
Joft our way. He was the firft to perceive" it, 
and, without being impatient, without cornplain- 
ing, he applied all his attention to reppver it; we 
wandered a long time, before he knew where he 
Was, and he ftill kept his temper. This may 
feem nothing to you* but I, who am acquainted 
Kith his natural impetuofity, think Uyery extra- 
ordinary ; I fee the fruit of the pains I have 
taken from- his infancy to inure him to the #froke$ 
pfneceflity. 

At length we arrived. The reception we met 
with was more familiar and obliging than at firft; 
we are already become old acquaintance, Emi- 
lius and Sophia falute each other with a little 
confufion, and without fpeaking : what fhould 
they fay to each other before u$ f The conver- 
fation they would hold, does not require wit-, 
nefles. We took a turn in the garden, which 
inftead of being laid out into parterres, was corn- 
mod ioufly defigned for the purpofes of the kit- 
chen and table : inftead of a park they have an 
orchard veil planted with fruit trees of every 
kind, and watered with rivulets, whofe borders 
are full ©f flowers. " What a delightful place ! 
faid Emihus, full of enthufiafm ; 1 think I be- 
hold the garden of Alcinous, as defcribed by Ho- 
mer," Sophia defired to know who Alcinous was, 

and 



fcj. EMILltJS'j OR, A NEW 

and her mother afked me. Alcinous, faid I, was 
king of Corcyra, wnofe garden, as defcrihed by 
Homer, is criticized by men of tafte, as too Am- 
ple and void of ornament *. This Alcinous had 
a lovely daughter, who the night before her fa- 
ther gave hofpitable. reception to a ftranger, 
dreamt that (he fhould foon be married. Sophia 
was ftruck, bluflied, and caft her eyes on the 
ground. It is impoffible to conceive any one in 
greater confufion. Her father, who took plea- 
sure in adding to it, continued the difcourfe, and 
©bferved that the young princefs ufed often to go 
to the river herfelf to wafli the linen ; " Do yon 
imagine, he added, that Jhe would have difdained 
to touch the dirty napkins ? Sophia, to whom 

this 
* Ck>fe to the gates a fpacious garden lies, 

From ftorras defended and inclement Ikies. 
Four acres was th'allofted fpace of ground, r 

Fenced with a green enclosure all around; 
Tall thriving trees confefs'd the fruitful mold 5 
The red'ning apple ripens here to gold. 
Here the blue fig with lufcious juice overflows, 
With deeper red the full pomegranate glows j 
The branch here bends beneath the weighty pear, 
And verdant olives flourim round the year. 
The balmy fpirit of the weftern gale 
Eternal breathes on fimits untaught to fail! 
Each dropping pear a following pear Applies, 
Qn apples, apples, figs on figs arife. 
The fame mild feafon gives the blooms to blow, 
The buds to harden, and the fruits to grow. 
Here order'd vines in equal ranks appear, 
With all th'united labours of the year j 
Some to unload the fertile branches run, •« 

Some dry the black'ning clutters in the fun, 

Others 



SYSTEM OP EDU-CATIONT. 15 

this was direited, forgetting her natural timidity, 
cstcufed herfelf,with great vivacity, fay ing, <€ That 
her papa was fenfible fhe would have waflied aM 
the fmalj linen, if they would have fuffered her, 
and that file would have done * more with plea- 
sure, if they had laid their commands on her.** 
As (he uttered thefe words, (he caught a look 
at me by ftealth with a degree of fodicitude, at 
which 1 could not help fmiling, as I could plainly 
read in hex ingenuous heart the fentiment which 
joccafioncd her to fpeak. Her father had the 
farther cruelty to afk her -in a tone of raillery, 



} 
} 



Otters to tread the liquid harrveft join, 
The^groaning prefles foam with floods of wine/ 
Here are the vine* in early flower defcry'd, 
Here grapes difcoioirr'd on the funny fide, 
And 'there in Autumn's richeft purple dy'd. 
Beds of all various herbs for ever green, 
Xn beauteous order terminate the fcene. 
Two plenteous fountains the whole profpect crownM 5 
This through the gardens leads its dreams around, 
Vifits each plant, and waters all the ground. 
While that in pipes beneath the palace flows, 
And thence its currents on the town Jieftows.-* 

Pope. 
Such is the defcription of the royal garden of Alcinous, 
in the feventh book of the Odyflfey, in which, to the fcan- 
dal of that old dreamer Homer, and of the princes of 
thofe days, we find no lattice- work, noftatues, nocafcades, 
no Chinefe paling. 

* I mull own that we have fome obligations to So- 
phia's morher, for not fuflcring her to fpoil her foft hands 
in the wafh-tub : thole hands which Emilius wasdeftined 
16 often to kifs. 

C Wtex 



16 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

Wfiat occafion (he had to take this to herfelf, anc 
what there was in common between her and th<_ 
daughter of Alcinous ? Abaflied and trembling, 
(he now durft hardly breathe, or look any one in 
the face. Lovely girl ! it is too late to diflem- 
ble j you have made the declaration in fpite of" 
yourfelf. 

Xhefe little railleries were foon forgotten * or 
appeared to be fo : very luckily for Sophia, Emi» 
lius was the only one who did not comprehend 
their % meaning. We continued our walk, and 
the young people, who had hitherto kept even 
with us, could fcarce confine themfelves to our 
flow pace j they infenfibly got before us ; they 
drew near to each other ; at length they entered 
into converfation, and we faw them at a good 
diftance from us. Sophia appeared to be com* 
pofed and attentive ; Emilius was talking with 
great vivacity and emotion ; and neither of them 
feemed to be tired with the difcourfe. After 
having walked about an hour we returned ; we 
called to them, they came back, but walked 
flowly in their turns, and one might fee that they 
were willing to make the moft of their time. At 
length their converfation ceafedof a fudden, be- 
fore we were within hearing of them, and they 
doubled tfyeir pace to rejoin us. Emilius ac- 
cofted us with an open and engaging air; his 
eyes fparkled with joy ; he caft them never the- 
lefs with fome concern towards Sophia's mother, 
to fee what reception fhe would give him. So- 
phia's behaviour was more embarrafled $ when 

lhe 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 27 

fhe came up to us, fhe feemed quite confufed at 
having been fo long engaged in private conver- 
sation with Emilius : fhe who had fo often been 
alone with others, without thinking any harm in 
it. She haftened to her mother, a little out of 
breath, and faid fomething, of no great confe- 
quence, in order to carry the appearance of not 
having been long detached from the company. 

^ From the ferenity vifible in the countenances 
of the lovely young couple, one might perceive 
that their conversation had relieved their tender 
minds from a great burthen. They are not lefs 
referved with each other, but their referve is lefs 
troublefome to them. Nothing but what is re- 
fpe&ful comes from Emilius, nothing but what 
is modeft from Sophia, nothing but what is vir- 
tuous from both. Emilius now ventures to (peak 
to her ; fometimes (he ventures to anfwer him $ 
but fhe never opens her mouth, without firft 
confulting her mother's eyes. The moft vifible 
alteration in Sophia's behaviour is towards me. 
She pays a more earneft regard to me, fhe 
fpeaks to me more affe&ionately, fhe is attentive 
to every thing which may give me fatisfa&ion ; I 
perceive that fhe honours me with her efteem f 
and that fhe is anxious to obtain mine. I can 
conceive that Emilius has fpoke to her concern- 
ing me j one would conclude that they had al- 
ready plotted to engage me in their party : there 
was, however, no fuch contrivance, and Sophia 
herfelf is not to be won fo foon. He will, per- 
haps, have more occafion for my interceffion with 

C z \\*x^ 



feB feMlLlUS; 6R, A NEW 

her, than for her's with me. Amiable pair ! — As 
1 am pcrfuaded that my young friend's grateful 
heart engaged him to make me a principal topick 
of converfation* in his firft interview with his 
tniflrefs, that perfuafion alone is a recom* 
pence for all my trouble : his friendfhip has re- 
paid me all. 

Our vifits were repeated. The interviews 
between the young people grew more frequent. 
JEmilius, intoxicated with love* thought himfelf- 
at the very fummit of happinefs. Neverthelefsj 
lie could not engage Sophia to give her direct af* 
fentj fhe heard him* and made no reply. Emilius 
was fully acquainted with her modefty j fo much 
referve did not furp rife him greatly; he ig 
fenfible that (he has no diflike to him ; he 
knows that it belongs to parents to difpofe of 
their children in marriage ; he concludes that 
Sophia waits for her parents commands j he afks 
her leave to follicit their confent, which flie does 
hot oppofe; He communicates his defign to me$ 
and I propofe it to them, even in his prefence. 
How greatly was he furprifed to hear that So- 
phia was left at her own difpofal, and that it 
depended on her alone to make him happy ! He 
was at a lofs how to account for her conduct. 
His hopes are damped : he is alarmed ! he finds 
that he has not made fuch a progrefs as he ima- 
gined j and it is on this occafion that the moft 
ardent love employs its moft affecting rhetorick 
for the purpofes of perfuafion. 

Emilius 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 29 

Emilius could not gucfs wbatobftacle oppofed 
his happin^fs : if he is not told it, he will never 
difcover it while he lives, and Sophia is too 
proud to tell }iim. The difficulties which lie be- 
fore her, would make another forward to accept 
bis propofals; (he has not forgotten the inftruc- 
tions of her parents. She is poor ; Emilius is 
rich. How very neceflary is it for him to engage 
her efteem ! What a fliare of merit muft he have 
to remove this inequality ! But how fliould he 
think of thefe obftacles? Does Emilius know- 
that he is rich ? Does he even condefcend to 
enquire about it? Thank heaven, he has no 
need of riches, he knows how to be beneficent 
without them. The good he does, i flues from 
his heart, not from his purfe. He beftpws his 
time, his follicitude, his affe&ions, his perfon, 
to comfort the affli&edj and in making anefti- 
mate of his bounty, he takes no account of the 
money he diftributes among the indigent. 

Not knowing to what caufe he fhould refer his 
difgrace, he attributes it to his own fault ; for 
who fliould dare to tax the obje<9: of his adoration 
with caprice ? The humiliation of felf-love in- 
creafes the regret of having been reje&ed. He 
no longer approaches Sophia with the amiable 
confidence of a mind confcious of reciprocal 
worth, but appears fearful and trembling before 
her. He defpairs of gaining her affe&ions, and 
tries to move her companion. Sometimes in- 
deed his patience is exhaufted ; indignation is 
ready to take place, while Sophia, feeming to 

C 3 anticipate 



3 o EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

anticipate his impetuofity, difarms him with her 
looks; her very filence intimidates him} and he 
becomes more fubmiflive than before. 

Tired with this obftinate refiftance and invin- 
cible filence, he poured forth his mind into the 
bofom of his friend. There herepofed the griefs 
of his wounded heart, imploring his advice and 
affiftance. <c What an impenetrable fecret ! 
(faid he.) She is undoubtedly interefted in my 
behalf: fo far from avoiding me, -file is plea- 
fed with my company. She receives me with 
tokens of pleafure, and expreffes regret when we 
part: fhe accepts of my ailiduities, with kind- 
nefs ; my fervices feem agreeable to her ; fhe con- 
descends to give me her advice, and even Some- 
times honours me with her commands. Never- 
theless fhe rejefts my follicitations, and is un- 
moved by my importunities. If I venture to 
fpeakof our union, fhe imperioufly enjoins me 
filence, and if I perfift, (he leaves me. With 
what reafon can (he imagine that I fhould be 
attached to her, when fhe will not allow me to 
fpeak of her being attached to me ? You whom 
fhe reSpects, you whom fhe loves, and on whom 
fhe dares not impofe filence, do you fpeak to 
her; make her explain herfelf ;affift your friend; 
accomplifh the work you have begun ; let not 
all your cares prove fatal to your pupil : the 
Sentiments you have infpired will make him un- 
happy, if you do not complete his felicity." 

1 addrefled my Self to Sophia, and with fome 
difficulty extorted a fecret from her, which I 

knew 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 31 

knew before (he told it me. It was with more dif- 
ficulty that I obtained her leave to acquaint 
Emiliuswith it. The explanation I gave him 
threw him into a furprife, from which he could 
fcarce recover. He cannot account for this de- 
licacy; he cannot conceive that the poffeflion of 
a fum of money, more or lefs, contributes any 
thing to the owner's character or merit. When 
I gave him to underftand what an influence 
wealth had over the world, he burft into laugh- 
ter; and tranfported with joy, was forgoing 
away directly, to diveft himfelf of all he was 
worth, in order to have the honour of being as 
poor as Sophia, and of returning in a condition 
worthy to be her hufband. 

" How ! (faid I, flopping him, and laughing in 
my turn at his impetuofity) will that young head 
of your's never grow fedate ? After having phi- 
lofophifed all your life, will you never learn to 
reafon ? Do not you perceive that by purfuing 
your ftrange project, you make your condition 
worfe, and render Sophia more relentlefs? It is 
but a trifling advantage to have a better fortune 
than her, but it would be a great one to have fa- 
cificed every thing to her, and if her pride will 
not fuffer her to lay herfelf under the former ob- 
ligation; how, do you think, (he can determine 
to fubmit to the latter? if flic cannot bear that 
a hulband (hould reproach her with having ad- 
vanced her fortune, how can fhe endure that 
he {hould reproach her with having beggared 
himfelf on her account ? It would be unhappy 

C 4 for 



32 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

for you, if flie fhould ever fufped your having 
entertained fuch a defign. On the contrary, let 
your love for her induce you to ceconomy, left 
/he fhould accufe you of endeavouring to gain 
her by ftratagem, and of making a voluntary fa- 
crifice to her of that wealth, which you would 
otherwife imprudently diifipate. 

" Do you imagine that in reality fhe has any 
averfion to a large fortune, and that your riches 
are the immediate grounds of her oppofition i 

No, my dear Emilius, it proceeds from a more 
weighty and folid reafon, that is, from the con- 
sideration of the efFe£t v/hich riches produce in 
the owner's mind. She knows how much the 
goods of fortune are efteemed by thofe who pof- 
fefs them. They who are wealthy, prefer gold 
to merit. In fetting money againft fervices, 
they find that the latter never balance the form- 
er, and they think that the overplus is due to 
them, even after a life fpent in ferving them for a 
bare fubfiftence. What have you to do then, 
, Emilius, in order to remove her apprehenfions ? 
Make yourfelf thoroughly known to her; but 
this is not the bufinefs of a day. Show her that 
you have the treafures of a noble mind^ which are 
Superior to the riches you have the misfortune to 
inherit. Endeavour by time and perfeverance to 
overcome her fcruples : oblige her, by difplaying 
generous and elevated fentiments, to forget your 
riches. Love her, ferve her, and affift her rc- 
fpe&able parents. Convince them that your afli- 
duity is not the rcfult of an idle and tranfient 

paffion, 



SYSTEM OP EDUCATION. 33 

paffion, but of indelible principles deeply engra- 
ven in your mind. Pay due refpect to merit, 
abandoned by fortune ; this is the only way to 
obviate her prefent fcruples." 

One may eafily conceive with what tranfports 
of joy the young man attended to this difcourfe, 
and with what hope and confidence it infpired 
him; how happy he thought himfelf in being •- 
obliged to obferve a conduct, to render himfelf 
acceptable to Sophia, which he would have prac- 
tifed if Sophia had never been? or he had ne- 
ver been in love with her. Who is there, the 
leaft acquainted with his .character, that cannot 
imagine his behaviour on thisoccafion ? 

Behold me now the confident of our young 
people, and the mediator of their loves ! A fine 
employment for a governour ! So good a one, 
that I never in my life did any thing which raifed 
me more in my own opinion, and which gave 
me fuch heart-feltfatisfaction. Befides, fuch am 
employment is attended with agreeable circum- 
fiances ; I am not an unwelcome gueft ; and 
the parents leave the conduct of the young lovers 
to my difcretion. Emilius, always fearful of 
difobligingme, was never more tractable- The 
young lady loads me with civilities, of which, 
however, I am not the dupe, and of which I 
place no more to my own account than belongs 
to me. It is thus that fhe indirectly indulges 
the regard (he bears to Emilius. Thus fhe be- 
llows a thoufand careffes on him by proxy $ 
which fhe had rather die than yield to himfelf: 

C 5 and 



34 XMILIUSj OR, ANEW 

and he, who knows that I will not hurt his intt 
reft, is delighted that I am on fuch good term 
with her. When fhe refufes the offer of his arn 
as we are walking, he comforts himfelf that fht 
gives mine the preference. He retires without 
murmuring, and prefling my hand, fays to me 
with a low tone and downcaft eye, " My dear 
friend, fpeakin mybehalf." He watches us with 
eager eyes ; he endeavours to read our fentiments 
in our countenances, and to interpret our dif- 
courfe by our motions ; he knows that nothing 
which paffes between us is indifferent to him. 
Lovely Sophia ! how much your tender heart is 
at eafe, when without being overheard by Tele- 
machus, you can difcourfe with his Mentor! 
With what amiable fincerity you fuffer him to 
read all that paffes in your affectionate bofom ! 
With what pleafure you difclofe to him your per- 
fect efteerh for his pupil ! With what ingenoufi- 
nefs you fuffer him to difcover that you entertain 
for this worthy youth the moft tender fentiment&f 
With what affected refentment you difmifs the 
intruder, when his impatience prompts him to 
interrupt you ! With what agreeable indignation 
you reprove his indifcretion, when he comes un- 
feafonably to prevent you fpeaking in his com- 
mendation, and attending to me, in order, from 
my anfwers, to collect fome additional reafons 
for loving him! 

Having at length gained toleration as a pro- 
feffed lover, Emilius made the belt ufe of his 
privilege ; he talks, he prefles, he follicits, he 

importunes.- 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION* 35 

importunes. Though he receives unfavourable 
anfwers, though he is repulfed, he is not dif- 
couraged: it is enough for him that he is heard. 
At laft he obtains, not without difficulty, that 
Sophia on her fide fhould publickly take upon her 
to prefenbe to him his duty as a lover, that lhe 
fhould command inftead of intreating, that fhe 
fhould receive without returning thanks, that 
fhe fhould regulate the number and times of his 
vifits, that (he fhould forbid him to come till 
fuch a -day, or ftay beyond fuch an hour. All 
this was not concluded in jeft, but very ferioufly; 
and though it was with difficulty that (he afTumed 
thefe rights, yet (he exercifed them with a rigour 
which often made poor Emilius regret that he 
had ever granted them. But whatever (he 
commands, he makes no reply ; and frequently, 
as he is taking leave in obedience to her, he 
looks at me with a chearful eye, as if he meant 
to fey— You fee that fhe has taken pofleffion of 
me. At the fame time the haughty fair one 
penetrates his meaning, and fmiles in fecret at 
the pride of her captive. 

Oh ! that I had the pencil of a Raphael, and 
the pen of a Milton, to paint the voluptuous 
fcenes, and defcribe theexquifite delights of love 
and innocence ! No, rather be concealed every, 
delufive art, before the facred truth of nature. 
Be the heart fufceptible* and the mind virtuous;. 
then let the unreftrained imagination reprefent 
the tranfports of two young lovers, who, under 
the eyes of their parents and governours, indulge 

C 6 themfelvefr 



36 EMILIUS; Oft, A NEW 

themfelves without fear,, in the fweet, the flat- 
tering illufions of love ; and in the intoxication 
of defire, advancing flowly towards the deftined 
moment of their union, interweaving with flowers 
and garlands that happy knot, which is to join 
them till death. So many delightful images infa- 
tuate me, I col left them without order or regu- 
larity; the delirium they occafion prevents my 
combining them. Oh ! who is there that has a 
feeling heart, and cannot form to himfelf the de- 
lightful pidture of the different fituationsof the 
parents, the daughter, the govcrnour, the pupil, 
and their reciprocal concurrence towards the 
union of the moft lovely pair, whom virtue and 
mutual affe&ion can unite to blefs ! 

It is now that Emilius, being fincerely anxious 
to pleafe, began to perceive the value of thofe 
agreeable talents he had acquired. Sophia is 
fond of finging, he fings with her: he does more, 
he teaches her mufic. She is a&ive and lively; 
fhe loves to be in motion ; he teaches her to 
dance, and changes her irregular fteps into the 
graceful movements of art. Such leffons are de- 
lightful; youthful gaiety gives them life, and 
foftens the refpe&ful timidity of love; a lover is 
allowed to give leflbns with rapture ; it may be 
permitted him to be a dancing-mafter to his mif- 
trefs. i 

They have an old harpfichord, quite out of 
order. Emilius repairs and tunes it. He is an 
harpfichord-maker as well as a joiner ; he was 
always taught to forego the affijtance of another; 

K in 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 37 

in every thing which he could d*fcimfelf. Their 
houfe ftanding itk a fkuation perfe&ly pic- 
turefque, he has drawn, feveral views of it in 
which Sophia has. fometiroes affifted, and with 
which fhe has embellilhcd her father's clofet. The 
frames are not gilt, and they do not require 
fuch ornament. By obferving the drawings of 
Emilius, and imitating them, fhe improves by 
his-example, (he cultivates every talent, and her 
manner gives a luftre to them all. Her father and 
mother recollect their ancient profperity, on fee- 
ing this little revival of the fine arts around them> 
for which alon6 they prized their former condi- 
tion. Love has adorned every part of their 
houfe ; love alone, without coft or trouble, has 
furnifhed them with the fame pleafures, which 
were formerly provided at much trouble and ex- 
penfe. 

As the idolater enriches the object of his ado- 
ration with the treafures he values moft, and 
adorns the altar of the god he worfhips ; fo the 
lover delights to fee his miftrefs perfect, and is 
continually defirous of gracing her with fome 
new ornament. She does not require any addi- 
tion to be agreeable to him, but he. has a defire 
of adorning her -> it is a new homage which he 
thinks he pays to her j it is a circumilance which 
adds to the pleafure he takes in admiring her. He 
imagines that nothing beautiful is in its proper 
place, unlefs it embellifhes that beauty which he 
thinks fupremc. It is a very affe&ing fight, and 
which at the fame. time makes one finite, to fee 

.... 1 Emilius 



38 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

Emilius eager to teach Sophia all that he knows; 
not confidering whether what he would have her 
learn is agreeable to her tafte, or fui table to her. 
He talks to her on every fubje£t, he explains 
every thing to her with a childifh eagernefs ; he 
thinks that he need but Tpeak, and that fhe will 
underftand him immediately : he anticipates the 
pleafure he {hall enjoy in reafoning and philofo- 
phifing with her ; he confiders all acquifitions as 
ufelefs, which he cannot difplay before her: he 
is almoft afhamed to know any thing of which 
(he is ignorant. 

Behold him, therefore, giving her leffons in 
philofophy, mathematicks, hiftory, in fhort, in 
almoft every thing. Sophia with pleafure for- 
wards his zeal, and endeavours to improve* 
When he can obtain the favour of giving his in- 
ftruftions on his knees before her, how happy is 
Emilius ! he thinks paradife open before him. 
Neverthelefs this attitude, which is more uneafy 
to the fcholar than to the matter, is not the moft 
favourable for inftru&ion. In fuch a fituation, 
the fair pupil does not know what to do with 
her eyes, in order to avoid her lover's, which 
are always on the watch ; and when their looks 
meet, the I fl'on does not go on the better for the 
renccunt r. 

Women are not incapable of the art of think* 
ing, but they ought only to have a fuperhcial 
knowledge of. the abftrufe fciences. Sophia con- 
ceives every thing, but has not a good me* 
mory. She make the greateft progress in mo- 
rality 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 39 

rality and matters of tafte; as for phyfics, flic 
only retains an idea of fome general laws, and the 
theory of the fyftem of the univerfe. Sometimes, 
in their walks, as they are furveying the won- 
ders of nature, they venture to exalt their pure 
and innocent minds to a contemplation of its 
author. They do not dread his prefence, they 
open their hearts before him. 
• How ! two lovers in the prime of their youth, 
pafs their time in talking of religion! Do they 
fpend their hours in repeating their catechifm !— 
Why fhould we ridicule what is truely noble ? 
Yes, without doubt, they may repeat it in the 
courfe of the illufion which tranfports them 5 
they find themfelves innocent, they love each 
other, they difcourfe together with a degree of 
enthufiafm, concerning that divine perfection, 
which {ramps a value on virtue; and the fa- 
crifices they make to it render it fiill more efti- 
mable. During the tranfports which they arc 
forced to fubdue, they frequently fhed tears to- 
gether, pure as the dew of heaven; and thofe 
delicious tears form the enchantment of their 
lives; they are under the influence of the moft 
delightful delirium of which the human heart can 
be fufceptible. Even their fel f-denial increafes 
their felicity, and they acquire honour in their 
own eftimation, from the facrifices they make to 
virtue. Ye fenfual beings, bodies without fouls, 
they will one day experience your pleafures, and 
yet will look back with regret as long as they 

live, 



40 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

live, on that happier time when they denied 
themfelves fuch gratification. 

Notwithftanding this good underftanding be- 
tween them, they have fometimes flight diflen- 
tions, nay even quarrels; the lady is not without 
fome tin&ure of caprice, nor her lover without 
impatience ; but thefe little ftorms foon vanifli, 
and only ferve to ftrengthen their union. In 
truth, experience has taught Emilius, not to 
be fo much afraid of them for the future ; the 
reconciliation being more to his advantage, than 
their little bickerings do him prejudice. The 
advantage he reaped from their firft difagree- 
ment, made him hope for the fame on all future 
occalions — he was miftaken : but if he does not i 
always make the fame acquifition, neverthelefs 
he always gains fomething, in obtaining a con- 
firmation from Sophia, that (he is fincerely inte- 
refted in his affe&ions. The reader may be 
curious to know what was the advantage he 
gained: and I am the more willing to tell him, 
as the example will give me an opportunity of 
inculcating a very ufeful maxim, and of com- 
bating a very pernicious one. 

Emilius is really in love ; of courfe he is not 
forward ; and we may conceive ftill further, that 
the haughty Sophia will not admit familiarities. 
As difcretion has its bounds in every thing, one 
would rather tax her with fhowing too much 
fev«rity, than too much indulgence ; and even 
her father is afraid left her exceffive pride fhould 
degenerate into arrogance. In the moft private - 

con ver fat ions, 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 41 

converfations, Emilius dares not follicit the leaft 
favour, nor even feeni to defire it ; and when 
fhe condefcends to take hold of his arm as they 
are walking, a favour which fhe does not fufter 
t© be ufurped as aright, hefcarce ventures, with 
a fwelling figh, to prefs her hand to his bofom. 
Neverthelefs, after along reftraint, he will run 
the rifle of imprinting a kifs upon her fleeve by 
Health, and fometimes he is fo happy, that flie 
is willing to overlook it. One day, however, 
when he was inclined to take this liberty, in a 
more open manner, (he took it into her head to 
think it improper. He perfifted, {he grew angry i 
her indignation made her utter fome ferious ex- 
preilions; Emilius did not bear them without 
reply : they pouted the reft of the day, and parted 
in a difcontented mood. 

Sophia was uneafy. Her mother was her con- 
fidant; how could fhe conceal her inquietude 
from her ? It was their firft quarrel ; and a 
quarrel of an hour was a matter of vaft confe- 
quence ! She repented her indifcretion ; her mo- 
ther allowed her to repair itj her father even 
commanded her. 

The next day, the reftlefs Emilius made his 
vifit fooner than ordinary. Sophia was at her 
mother's toilet ; the father likewife was in the 
fame apartment : Emilius entered in a refpcctful 
manner, but with a melancholy air. The fa- 
ther and mother had fcarce paid their compli- 
ments to him, before Sophia came up, and pre- 
fenting her hand, afked frim, with a reconciling 

tone* 



42 EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

tone, how he did? It was evident that her pretty 
hand was thus ftretchcd forth to receive a kifs; 
he took hold of it, but did not offer to falute it. 
Sophia, fomewbat abaQied, drew it back with as 
good a grace as (he could. Emilius, who is not 
accuftomed to the manners of the fex, and who 
has no idea of caprice, does not forget readily, 
neither is he fo foon appeafed. Sophia's father 
feeing her difconcerted, threw her into the ut- 
moft confufion by rallying her on her difap- 
pointment. The poor girl, thus vexed and mor- 
tified, does not know what to do with herfelf, 
and would give the world that fhe did but dare 
to cry. The more flic reftrains herfelf, the more 
her heart fwclls ; at length, a tear ftarts forth 
in fpite of her. Emilius faw the tear, threw 
himfelf on his knees, feifed her hand, and im- 
preffed kifTes on it with a degree of rapture. " In 
truth, you are too condefcending (faid her fa- 
ther, burfting into laughter;) I fhould fliow lefs 
indulgence to fuch whimfical girls, and I would 
avenge myfelf on the very lips which had offended 
me." Jtmilius, emboldened by this declaration, 
turned a fuppliant eye towards the mother, and, 
thinking he beheld a fign of approbation, made 
trembling advances towards Sophia, who turned 
afide her face, and, to fave her lips, prefented 
her rofy cheek. The indifcreet youth was not 
fatisficd ; fhe made a faint refiftance. What a 
kifsl if it had not been given in the prefence 
of a mother. 

After 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION, 43 

After this exemplary punifliment, the father 
went out on bufinefs, and the mother, hav- 
ing fent Sophia away on fome pretence, (he ad- 
tlreffed herfelf to Emilius in the following very 
ferious terms : " Sir, I am perfuaded that a young 
man, like you, well born and educated, endowed 
with honourable fentiments and good morals, 
cannot repay with diftionour, that fiiendfhip 
which the family has fhown to you. I am nei- 
ther fevere not prudifh ; I know how to make 
proper allowances for the levity of youth, as 
you may conclude from what I juft now fuffered 
to pafs under my eye. Confultyour friend with 
regard to your duty; he will tell you the diffe- 
rence between the toying which is authorifed by 
the prefence of a father and mother, and thofe 
liberties which are a {Turned in their abfence, by 
abufing their confidence, and turning thofe very 
favours into fnares, which, before them, are no 
more than innocent freedoms. He will inform 
yoi|, Sir, that my daughter was no otherwife to 
blame with regard to you, than in not perceiving 
at firft the impropriety of permitting what fhe 
ought never to fuffer : he will tell you, that 
whatever is taken as a favour, actually is one, 
and that it is unbecoming a man of honour to 
impofe on the fimplicity of a young girl, by af- 
fuming thofe liberties in private, which fhe may 
admit of before company. For every one knows 
how far decency will allow him to go in pub- 
lick 5 but no one can tell what lengths he may 

proceed 



44 EMILIUS; OR A NEW 

proceed in private, who makes himfelf the fole 
judge of his own defires." 

After this juft reprimand, which was more ad- 
dreffed to me than to my pupil, this difcreet mc< 
ther quitted the room, and left me in admira- 
tion of her uncommon prudence, in being under 
no apprehenfion at a lover's kiflingher daughter's 
lips in her prefence, but alarmed that he fhould 
even venture to kifs the hem of her garment in 
private. On reflecting upon the folly of our 
modern maxims, which facrifice modefty to de- 
corum, I can eafily conceive why the language 
grows chafle, as the heart grows depraved, and 
why their behaviour is the moft fcrupulous, who 
are in fait the moft defigning. 

While I was recomending thefe duties to 
Emilius, which I ought to have inculcated foon- 
er, a new reflection occurred to me, which, per- 
haps, does moft honour to Sophia, and which* 
neverthelefs, I take care not to communicate 
to her lover. What I mean to obferve is, that all 
the affecled pride which is imputed to her, is 
but a prudent precaution to fecure her againil 
herfelf. Having the misfortune to find herfelf 
of a warm conftitution, ihe is afraid of the firft 
fpark, and does her utmoft to avoid it. She is 
not feverei out of pride, but out of humility* 
Sheaffumeslkat dominion over Emilius, which 
fhe is afraid* file cannot excrcife over Sophia ; fhe 
ufes the one to combat the other. If ihe had 
more confidence in hgrfelf, fhe would have lefs 
feverity. Except ih this one article, What 

girl 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 4$ 

girl can be more mild and gentle ? Who en- 
dures an injury with more patience ? Who id 
more cautious of offending another ? Who forms 
lefs pretenfiorts of any kind* virtue excepted ? 
Nevertheless flie is not proud of her virtue, (he 
is only proud in order to preferve it ; and when 
Che can indulge her inclinations without rifque, 
fhe will carefs even her lover. But her prudent 
mother did not communicate thefe little circum- 
stances even to her father : men ought not to 
be acquainted with every thing. 

So far from appearing elated by her con- 
queft, Sophia became more affable, and lefs af- 
fuming with every one, except with him, per- 
haps, who has occafioned this change. Her ge- 
nerous heart no longer glows with the fpirit of 
independence. She modeftly triumphs in a 
vi&ory purchafed at the price of her liberty. 
Her behaviour is lefs open, and her converfation 
more timid, fince fhe cannot hear the word lover 
without a blufh. But fhe feels content in the 
midft of this embarraffment, and even her bafh- 
fulnefs is not a difagreeable fenfation. The dif- 
ference of her behaviour is moll obfervable when 
(he is in company with young men who are ca- 
fual vifitors. As fhe is no longer concerned 
about them, fhe has relaxed from that extreme 
referve fhe ufed to entertain. Being fixed in her 
choice, fhe makes no fcruple of being obliging to 
thofe who are indifferent to her ; fhe is more re- 
gardlefs of her merit, fince fhe no longer inte- 

rcfts herfelf about them ; fhe always finds them 

agreeable 



4 6 EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

agreeable enough, for perfons with whom flie 
will never have any connexion. 

If true love may avail itfelf of coquetry, I 
fhould think fome traces of it were vifible in the 
manner of Sophia's behaviour to thefe vifltors, in 
the prefence of her lover. One would conclude, 
that, not content with difplaying the warmth of 
her affedlion, by an exquifite mixture of kindnefs 
and referve, fhe was further defirous of inflam- 
ing his paffion by giving him fome little inqui- 
etude. One would imagine, that when (he pur- 
pofely fhows herfelf fprightly among her young 
friends, fhe defigned to torment Emilius by that 
graceful freedom which fhe dare not ufe with 
him : but Sophia is too attentive, too good, and 
too difcreet to torment him in reality. To mo- 
derate the force of fuch impreffions, love and 
modefty operate in the room of prudence $ fhe 
knows when to alarm, and when to compofe 
him ; and if fhe fometimes makes him uneafy, 
fhe never makes him forrowful. Let us pardon 
the little inquietude fhe gives the objeft of her 
afFe&ions, which only proceeds from her appre- 
henfions that he cannot be too much attached to 
her. 

. But what effeft has all this little artifice on 
Emilius ? Will it not make him jealous I 
This is what we muft examine $ for fuch digref- 
fions fall within the fcope of my work, and do 
not lead me far from my fubjeft. 

I have already explained how, among thofe 
circumftances which entirely depend on opinion, 

this 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 47 

this paffion found enterance into the heart of 
man. But in love it is a different cafe : jealoufy 
then appears fo very natural, that it is difficult 
to conceive it otherwife than as inherent in na- 
ture; and even the example of animals, among 
whom many are jealous even to rage, feems un- 
deniably to juftify fuch a conclufion. Is it 
merely from the force of cuftom that game- 
cocks tear each other to pieces, or bulls combat 
with fo much fury ? 

An antipathy to every thing which thwarts 
and interrupts our pleafures, is i neon teft ably a 
natural fenfation. The defire of obtaining, to 
a certain degree, the exclufive pofTeffion of what 
we love, ftands in the fame predicament. But 
when this defire, flrengthened into a paffion, 
transforms itfelf into that gloomy and melan- 
choly fufpicion, which bears the name of jea- 
loufy, then the cafe is different ; fuch a paffion 
may be either natural or not ; we muft make 
proper diflin&ions. 

The examples drawn from animals have been 
already examined in my treatife concerning the 
inequality of mankind ; and as I ftill think that 
examination juft, I venture ta refer my readers 
to it : I will only add to the diftin&ions I efta- 
blifhed in that treatife, that the jealoufy which 
proceeds from nature depends a great deal on 
the prerogative of the fex ; and that when this 
prerogative is, or appears to be, unlimited, 
then jealoufy is at its full heighth ; for the male 

in 



48 EMILIUS} OR, A NtW 

in that cafe, meafuring his right by the ftandard 
of his defires, can never confider another male, 
but as an intruding rival. " In fome animals like- 
wife, the female always admitting the firft comer, 
the male has no f right over her but that of 
conqueft, which perpetually occafions rival con- 
tefts. 

On the contrary, among thofe animals which 
attach themfelves to one only, where their union 
conftitutes a kind of moral obligation, a fort t>f 
marriage, the female, by her own ele&ion, be- 
longing to the male whom (he has chofen, "ge- 
nerally refufes to admit another ; and the mate 
having fuch a preference of affe&ion as a pledge 
of her conftancy, islefs anxious on feeing other 
males with he*, and lives with them in a mort 
peaceable manner. Among animals of this kind> 
the male takefe a (Hare in bringing up the young ; '. 
and, by one of thofe laws of nature, which we 
cannot obferve without being affe&ed, the fe- 
male feems to return that attachment to her 
mate, which he mows to her offspring. 

Now, to confider human nature in its pri- 
mitive fimplicity, it is eafy to perceive, by the 
limited power of the male, and the moderation 
of his defires, that he was deftined by nature to 
be fatisfied with one female ; which is further 
confirmed by the numerical equality between the 
individuals of both fexes, at leaft in our cli- 
mates ; an equality, which does not hold to any 
degree among thofe animals, where the fypcrior 

power 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION, 49 

power of the male fubjedts many females to one 
male. And although, as men cannot fit brood- 
ing like pigeons, nor give fuck, they may in 
thefe refpe&s be claiTed among the quadru pedes, 
yet infants are fo weak and helplefs, that the mo- 
ther and they could noteafily difpenfe with the 
attachment of the father, nor with the follicitude 
which refults from that attachment. 

All thefe obfervations confpire to prove, that 
the jealous fury of the males, in fome fpecies of 
animals, concludes nothing with refpectto man* 
kind ; and even the exception of thofe countries, 
where polygamy is eftablifhed, does but con- 
firm this principle the ftronger, fince it is the 
plurality of wives which occafions the tyrannical 
precaution of hufbands; and their fenfe of 
their own weaknefs, makes them in thofe parts 
have rccourfe to conftraint, in order to elude the 
laws of nature. 

Among us, where thofe laws, though lefs 
evaded in that refpecl:, are yet thwarted on other 
and more odious occafions, the motive of jealoufy 
rather arifes from the focial paffions, than from 
natural inftinft. Among the greateft part of 
the attachments of gallantry, the lover abhors 
his rivals, much more than he loves his mif- 
trefs ! If he is afraid that any one fhould be well 
received but himfelf, his concern proceeds from a 
principle of felf-love, of which I have traced the 
origin; and vanity is more predominant in him 
than love. Moreover, our ill judged inflitutions 

Vol. IV. D have 



S EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

have rendered women fo full of diffimulation*, 
and have fo much inflamed their appetites, that 
one fcarce can rely on the ftrongeft proofs of 
their attachment ; and they can hardly confer any 
marks of preference, fufficient to fe cure us agairitt 
the apprehenfion of rivals. 

But, with regard to true love, the cafe is dif- 
ferent. I have feen in the treatife above-men* 
tioned, that this fentiment is not fo natural as 
it is imagined : and there is a wide difference be-' 
tween that agreeable habitude which begets an 
afFc&ion in the man for his fail- partner, and that 
immoderate ardour whichrenders him intoxicated 

with the imaginary charms of an obje&, which 
fee does not view in a juft light. Thatpaffion 

which only demands preference and excluiive 
right, differs from vanity in this particular, that 
vanity, requiring every thing and granting no- 
thing, is always unjuft; whereas love, granting 
as much as it requires, is always perfeftly equi- 
table. Befides, the more it requires, the more : 
credulous it is; the fame elufion which gives 
it birth, makes it eafy of perfuafion. If love is 
anxious, efteem is full of confidence; and love 
never exiftcd in an honcft heart, independent 

of 

■ 

* The kind of diftimulation I fpealc of here, is 
the reverfe of that which becomes them, and which 
is agreeable to nature j one confifts in difguifing their 
real fentiments, and the other in feigning thofe fen* 
timents which they have not. Women often pa/a 
their lives in difplaying the trophies of affe&ed fen* 
fibility, and are fond of nothing but themfelves. 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 51. 

of efteem; bccaufc no one can love another, 

but for thofe very qualities which he himfelf 

adeems. 

AH thefe preliminaries being explained, we 

may pofitively determine what kind of jealoufy 
Emilius is fufceptible of; for fince this paffion 
has fcarce any root in tke human heart, its form 
is entirely ftaped by education. Emilius, though 
amorousand jealous, will not be choleric, gloomy, 
and miftruftful, but delicate, fufceptible, and 
timid 5 he will be fooner alarmed than irritated ; 
he will be more anxious to fecure his miftrefs, 
than to encounter his rival 5 he will, if he can, 
remove him as an obftacle, without hating him 
as an enemy; if he fhould hate him, it would 
not be on account of his having the arrogance to 
difpute a prize to which he has formed preten- 
tions, and becaufe he expofes him to a real dan* 
ger of lofing the objeft of his affe&ions ; he 
will not be fo abfurdly vain as to be offended that: 
another (hould prefume to ftand in competition 
with him. Conceiving that the right of prefe- 
rence depends entirely on merit, and that it is ho- 
nourable to fucceed, he will redouble hisfollici- 
tude to render himfelf agreeable, and will proba- 
bly gain the preference he feeks. The generous 
Sophia, may give his love fome little alarms, but 
flie well knows how to manage them, and to make 
him amends ; and the rivals, who were only ad- 
mitted in order to put that love to the proof, 
foon bedifmiffed. 

D 2 But 



5^ EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

But whither dol find myfelf infenfibly carried? 
Emilius ! How greatly art thou altered ! Art 
thou the robuft and hardy }outh whom I taught 
to defy the rigour of the feafons, who expofed 
his perfon to the hardeft toils, and devoted his 
mind entirely to the dictates of wifdom ; proof 
againft prejudices and paflions, enamoured of 
truth alone, fubtiviffive only on reafon, and de- 
pendent only to himfelf ! Behold him now ener- 
vated by a life of indolence, and refigned to the 
direction of women ; their amufements are Jiis 
occupations, their will his pofitive law ; a young 
girl is the arbitrefs of his fate ; he bows fubmif- 
five before her ; the grave, the manly Emilius is 
become the play- thing of a child! 
/ Such is the fhifting of the fcenes on the ftage 
of life ; every age has its peculiar fprings which 
fet it in motion ; but the man is (till the fame. 
At ten years old, he is under the influ- 
ence of a cake; at twenty, of a miftrefs; at 
thirty, of his pleafures ; at forty of ambi- 
tion ; at fifty of avarice: — when is it that his 
purfuit is directed after wifdom alone? Hap- 
py is he who is guided to her in fpite of -himfelf ! 
Of what importance is it who guides him, if he 
is but conducted to the right end ? Heroes, nay 
philofophers themfelves, have paid this tribute to 
human weaknefs ; and he who ftooped to handle 
the diftafF, was not on that account the lefs a 
hero. 

Would you extend the effects of good edu- 
cation throughout a whole life ? prolong the 

good 



SYSTEM OP EDUCATION. 53 

good habits of infancy through the maturer pe- 
riod of youth; and when your pupil is formed 
to your mind, endeavour to confirm him in thofe 
habits, that he may always remain the fame. 
This is the laft polifh which is neceflary to per- 
fect your work. It is for this end in particular, 
that it is requifite to continue a young man 
under the care of his governour; for iris to be 
feared that he will not know how to direft his 
affedions without him. What deceives pre- 
ceptors, and fathers in particular, is, their fupu 
pofing that one period of his life excludes another, 
and that as foon as children are grown up, 
they milft renounce all the habits they ac- 
quired when little. If this was the cafe, to what 
purpofe fhould we beftow care on their infancy : 
as the good or bad ufe which they might make 
of it vanifhes when. they arrive at maturity ; and 
by entering on a different way of life, they ne- 
ceflarily require different modes of thinking? 

As violent difeafes only have the power to de* 
ftroy the memory, fo nothing but fome violent 
paffion can produce the fame effect in our mo- 
rals. It is true, our taftes and inclinations alter, 
but the alteration though fomtimes pretty fud- 
den, is conciliated by cuftom. In the fucceffion of 
of our defires, as in a proper gradation of colours, a 
(kilful artift will render the tranfitions impercep- 
tible, will blend and mix the tints, and willfo 
difpofe them on the canvafs, that no one may 
glare beyond the reft. This rule is confirmed by 
experience \ iatemperate minds change their af- 

D 3 fe&ioas* 



54 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

fe&ions, their tafte, their fentiments, every day, 
and are only conftant in the habit of incon- 
ftancy ; but the moderate man always recurs to 
his old habits, and even in his old age he does 
.not lofc a relifh for thofe pleafures which he 
loved in his childhood. 

If you can contrive that young people, as they 
enter on a new ftage of life, do not contract 
a contempt for that which they have quitted ; 
that on their acquiring new habits, they do not 
totally abandon their former $ that they air- 
ways incline to do -what is proper, without re* 
gard to the time when they firft began to 
practice it ; by fuch management, you will 
fhorten your work, and you may depend on 
them the reft of their lives ; for die revolution 
moft to be apprehended, is that of the age over 
which you now fuperintend. As they always 
regret this time, they with greater difficulty re- 
nounce the tafte which they were allowed tor 
preferve at this period ; whereas if they are in- 
terrupted in them they never refume them after- 
wards. 

The greater part of the habits which you think 
to make children and young people contra&, are 
not properly habits, becaufe they have adopted 
them by force ; and following them againft their 
inclinations, they only wait for an opportunity 
of renouncing them. We do not acquire a re- 
lifh for a prifon, by being obliged to abide in 
one; the habit in that cafe, inftcad of leflening 
the averfion, increafes it. It is not fo with 

Emilius 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION* 55 

Emilius who never did any thing from his in- 
fancy" but voluntarily and with pleafure : and be- 
ing now arrived at manhood, by continuing to 
a& in the fame manner, he only adds the domi-* 
nion of cuftom to the fweets of liberty. An 
active life, exercife* and motion, are fo necef* 
fary to him, that he could not difpenfe with 
them without pain* To reduce him at once, 
fo a foft and fedentary life, would be to im- 
prifon him, to chain him, to keep him in a 
violent and unnatural ftate ; and I make no 
doubt but his difpofition and his health would 
equally fuffer* He can fcarce breathe in a con- 
fined room ; he requires a free air* frequent ac- 
tios, aod fome degree of fatigue. Even while 
with Sophia, he cannot help cafting a fide- long 
glance at the country, and wiihing totraverie 
tlie fields with her. He can be inactive, never- 
theiefs, when it is neceflary he fhould be fo 5 
kut yet he feems inwardly agitated and reftlefs ; 
lie appears to be at variance with himfelf, and 
enly tofubmit becaufe he is in fetters'. Such, 
therefore, you will fay, are the wants to which 
I have fubje&ed him, fuch are the habitudes 
Which I have given him : ' and all this is true ; I 
have inured him to the condition of man. 

Emilius loves Sophia ; but what were the charms 
which firft attached him ? fenfibility, and the 
love of virtue. While he was fond of thefe qua- 
lities in his miftrefs, could he renounce them him- 
felf? At what price has Sophia rated herfelf in her 
turn ? at the price of all thofe fen timents which are 

D 4 inherent 



3* . EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

inherent in her lover's mind ; an efteem for true 
worth, frugality, fimplicity, generous difintereft- 
ednefs, and a contempt for pomp and riches. E~ 
milius was mafter of thefe virtues, before love had 
imprinted them in his mind. In what then is 

Emilius altered ? he has additional reafons for 
being bifnfelf. This is the only circumftancc 
in which he is different from what he was, 

• I do not fuppofe that in reading this book 
with any degree of attention, any one will be- 
lieve that all the circumftances of the filiation in 
which Emilius ftands, were combined by acci- 
dent/ Was it by accident that, though the ci- 
ties furnifli fo man^amiable girls, fhe whom 
he admires was only to be found in the obfcurity* 
of adHtantrecefs? Is it by accident that they met? 
Is it owing to accident that they cannot lodge in 
the fame place ? Is it to be imputed to chance,* 
that he cannot find an afylum but at fuch adi— 
ftance from her ? It is from accident that he fees 
her fo feldom, and that he is obliged to purchafe 
the pleaAire of feeing her now and then at the- 
expenfe of fo much fatigue ? Do you fay he 
grows effeminate ? On the contrary, he be- 
comes hardier ; he ought to be as robuft as I 
have made him, in order io fupport the fatigue 
which Sophia makes him endure. 

He lodges fix long miles diftant from her. This 
circumftance ferves as a bellows for. the forge : it 
is by this that I temper the fhafts of love. If they 
lodged next door to each other, or that he could 
vifit her, lolling effeminately in an eafy coach, he 

would 



, SYSTEM OF EDUCATION 57 

would make infipid love to her, like a languid 
and courtly Parifian. 
- TJie firit vifits we paid ta Sophia, we travelled 
on horfeback to make the more hafte. We 
found this method convenient, and at the fifth vir 
lit we ftill went on horfeback. We were now 
expected. At more than two miles diftance from 
the houfe, we perceived fome people in the road. 
Emiliusfirft faw them; his heart fluttered as he 
drevv. nearer, and difcovered Sophia. He threw 
himfelffromhis horfe, he flew, and faluted the 
amiable family. Emilius is fond of fine horfes ; 
his was a fpirited one; and finding himfelf at li- 
berty, he galloped acrofs the fields : I rode after 
him and catched him with great difficulty, and 
brought him back. Unlukily Sophia is afraid 
of horfes ; I durft not go near her. Emilius took 
no notice of any thing that patted; but Sophia 
hinted to him what trouble he had given his 
friend. Ernilius ran to me quite confuted, took 
the horfes, and ftaid with them : it is right that 
every one fliould take their turn ;. but being.uneafy 
in this fituation r he foon proceeded forward with 
his charge. Having thus been obliged to leave 
Sophia behind him, he began to think that horfes 
were not quite fo convenient. He came back, 
however, quite out of breath, and. met us about 
halfway. 

At our next journey, Emilius would not go on 
horfeback. " Why y faid I, we need only take a 
fervant to look after the horfes." — <c No(repliedhe) 
we fhall be too troublefome to the family. You 

D 5 „ find 



5 8 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

f ndthat they will provide for all,man and horfes." 
* It is true ( faid I ) they have that noble hofpitality, 
which generally accompanies a narrow fortune. 
The rich, covetous in the midft of all their pomp, 
only entertain their friends, but thofe of fmall 
fubftance accomodate all that belong to them/* 
44 Let us, however, goon foot (faid he ;) have not 
you the courage, you who fo chearfully fliare the 
toilfome pleafures of your friend ?"— " With all 
my heart (returned I) immediately; befides, by 
this means you may make love, without being 
much taken notice of*" 

This time, we met the mother and daughter 
ftill farther from home than before.- We had 
walked extremely faft. Emilius was all ih a 
fweat ; a beloved hand condefcended to apply a 
handkerchief to his face. The world may a~ 
bound with horfes, but we mail not be in hafte 
to make ufe of them for the future. 

Nevertheless, it is a little cruel that our lover* 
cannot fpend an evening together. The fumroer 
is pretty far advanced, the days begin to grow 
ihort. Notwithftanding, all we can fay, they 
will never fuffer us to go home late ; and when 
we do not come early in the morning, we are 
.obliged to return. almoft as foon as we arrive. 
They often pitied us, and were uneafy on our 
account; at length the mother obferved that 
though we could not with decency lie in the 
houfc, they could procure us a lodging occasion- 
ally in the village. At this propofal Emilius 
was tranfported with joy ; and Sophia, without 

thinking, 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 59 

thinking, kifled her mother that day much of- 
tener than ufual. 

By degrees, the molt friendly intercourfe and 
innocent familiarity were fettled and cftablifhed 
among us. On the days appointed by Sophia 
or her mother, I generally went with Emilius 5 
fometimes likewife I fufrered him to go alone. 
We ought not to treat a man like a child! and 
what progrefsfhould I have made in all this time 
if my pupil did not deferve my confidence? It 
fpmetimes happened likewife that I went without 
him. On thefe occafions he is dull, but does not 
complain; what would his complaintsfignify? and 
befides, he knows that I never go thither to hurt 
his intereft. But, whether we go fepajrately or 
together they know that bad weather never 
prevents us, being proud of furmounting any in* 
conveniences of this kind. Sophia, however* 
would not allow us this honour, and in fitted on 
our not coming in bad weather. This is the 
only inftance in which I found her difobedient 
to the rules I prefcribed to her in private. 

Once when he went alone, and I did not ex- 
pect him till the next day, he arrived that fame 
evening, and I faid, embracing him; " What! 
my dear Emilius ! are you come home to your 
friend!" But inftead of returning my careffes r 
he faid to me, fome what discontentedly, " Do not 
think that I am returned fo foon of my own ac- 
cord, it is much againft my will. Sophia infilled 
on it ; and it is on her account, not youf's." 
Struck with this ingenuous declaration* I ern~ 

D 6 braced 



60 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

braced him again, and faid ; " This is frank and 
iincere; never robme of what is my due! If fhe 
fent you back, 1 made you at leaft open enough 
toconfefsit; if your return is her work, your 
fincerity is mine. May you always maintain that 
generous candour, which becomes noble minds! 
We may amufe people who are indifferent to 
us, but it is criminal to fuffer a friend, to afcribe 
that as a merit to us, which we have not done 
with a view to oblige him." 

I took care not to leffen in his efteem the va- 
lue of his frank confeffion, by telling him that 
there was more love than generofity in it, and 
that he was lefs anxious to difclaim the merit of 
his return, than to attribute it to Sophia. But 
it is thus that, without intending it, he difcovers 
his inmoft thoughts : if he came back at his let- 
fore with a flow pace, and thinking only of the 
objed of his affections, Emilius is no more than 
Sophia's lover ; if he returned in hafte, and all 
in a fweat though fomewhat discontented, Emi- 
lius is the friend of his Mentor. 

The reader may already perceive that the 
young man is far from pafling all his time 
with Sophia, or feeing her whenever he pleafes. 
One or two vifits in the week are the moft he is 
allowed to make; and thofe, which frequent- 
ly are half a day's length, are feldom extend- 
ed to the day following. He fpends more time 
in wifcing to fee her, or in comforting himfelf 
that he has feen her, than he really pafles in her 
company. Even with regard to the time taken 

up 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 6l 

up In his journie?, v he paffes fewer hours with her, 
than he employs in going and coming. His 
pleafures, which are-pure and delightful, though 
more imaginary than real, ferve to inflame his 
love without enervating his mind. 

On thofe days when he does not vifither, he> 
is not indolent and (edentary. Even on fuch 
days Emilius is ftill himfelf; he is not trans- 
formed in the leaft. For the moft part he walk* 
about the country, he purfues his Natural Hifto-. 
ry, he obferves and examines the feveral foils f 
their different productions and culture; he com- 
pares the methods of hufbandry he fees, with 
thofe he is acquainted with ; andconfiders the rea- 
foh of their difference. When he apprehends that 
other methods are preferable to thofe which he 
fees employed, he communicates them to the la- 
bourers j if he propofes a plow of a better coa- 
ftru&ion, he orders one to be made according to 
his plan ; if hedifcovers a vein of marl, he {hows 
them the ufe of it, of which they are ignorant in 
that country. He often fets to work himfelf; they 
are all furprifed to fee him handle their imple- 
ments more dextroufly than themfelves, to find 
him plow deeper and more regular furrows than 
they, to fow with a more even hand, and to raife 
a bank with more jfkill. They do not make a jeft 
of him, as one who talks finely about agricul- 
ture; they find that in fad he can pra&ife what 
he propofes. In a word, he extends his zeal 
and follicitude to every thing which can be of moft 
general utility. But he does not flop here, he 

vifits 



6% EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

vifits the peafants cottages, he enquires into thei 
condition, what family they have, whatnumbe, 
of children, what quantity of land, what is the 
nature of its product, what fubftance they have, 
what expenfes they are at, what debts they 
owe ? He gives little money away, knowing 
that in general a bad ufe is made of it ; but he 
directs the ufe of it himfelf, and fees that it turns 
to their advantage. He provides them with work- 
men, and often pays them for their labours. 
He repairs the cottage of one ; he clears another's 
land, which lay uncultivated for want of means 
to till it ; to a third he gives a cow, a horfe, ice. 
in the room of thofe they have loft : if two neigh* 
bours are going to law with each other, he 
brings them together, and fettles their difpute ; if 
a peafant falls fick, he orders him to be taken care 
of, and even looks after him himfelf*. If ano- 
ther is oppreffed by a powerful neighbour, he 
protects him ; if a poor young couple are ford 
of each other, he enables them to marry; if 
a mother has loft her darling child, he vifits 
•her, and comforts her $ he does not defpifc the 

poor 

# The way to take care of a poor man who is fick, is 
not to purge him, to give him medicines, to lendafurgeon 
to him. Such people do not require thefe remedies; they 
want good and plentiful nourishment. Faft yourfelves, ye 
rich and luxurious, when you have a fever, but when your 
poor tenants are fo afflicted, give them meat and wine; 
tnoft of their di (orders proceed from hard labour and low 
diet; the bed julep for them is in your cellars, and the 
beft apothecary you can fend to them, is your butcher, 

I" 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 63 

poor, he is not in hafte to quit the unfor- 
tunate \ he often eats with the peafants^ whom 
he relieves, and fometimes accepts civilities from 
thofe who have no need of his fervices; by 
becoming a benefactor to one, and a friend to 
others, he makes himfelf their equal. In a 
word, he always does as much fervice in his own 
perfon, as he does by his pcirfe. 

Sometimes he takes his rounds near the dwel- 
ling of his Sophia, in hopes of obtaining a fight 
of. her by fteaith, without being feen. But 
Kmilius is always without difguifc in his con- 
duct; Ke neither can nor wifhes to make eva* 
fions. He poffefles that amiable delicacy, which 
flatters and improves felf love, in confequence of 
an inward teftimony of re&itude. He fcrupu- 
loufly obferves his orders, and never goes near 
eftough to obtain that pleafure by chance, for 
which he would be only indebted to Sophia. 
But he ft rolls with pleafure in the environs, trac-> 
ing the foot-fteps of bis miftrefs, making tender 
fefie&ions on the fatigue fhe has undergone, and 
the walks (be has taken out of complaifance to 
him. The day before the time appointed for 
vifiting her, he will go to fame neighbouring 
farm to order a collation for the next day. Our 
walk is directed that way, without any appear- 
ance of defign i we go in as it were by chance, 
and meet with fruits, cakes, and cream. So- 
phia is not infenfible of thefe marks of atten- 
tion, and very readily compliments us on our 
forecaftj for I have always my fhare of the 

compliment 



64 EMILIUS; OR, A NRW 

compliment though I had no part of the merit 
which occafioned it ; this is an artifice of her's, 
that (he may return thanks with a better 
grace. The father and I eat cakes and drink 
wine : but Emilius is of the ladies mefs, always 
upon the watch for fome plate of cream, in 
which Sophia has dipped her fpoon. 

The fight of the cakes made me put Emilius 
in mind of his juvenile exploits. They defired to 
know what thefe were : I told them, they laugh- 
ed; and afked him if he could run fo well 
ftill? Better than ever, faid he; I fhould be 
very forry to have forgotten it. One of the com- 
pany had a great inclination to fee him run, but 
durft not propofe it ; another however made the 
propofal ; he accepted it : and they got together 
two or three young people out of the neighbour- 
hood. They propofed a prize, and ta make it 
look more like his youthful rices, they put a cake 
upon the goal. All held themfelves in readinefs;. 
Sophia's father gave the fignal. The fwift- 
fboted Emilius feemed to cut the air, and he 
reached the goal when his clumfy competitors- 
were fcarce arrived half-way. Emilius receiv- 
ed the prize from Sophia's hands, and with 
the generofity of Eneas, made prefents to the 
three vanquifhed runners. 

In the full glow of his triumph, Sophia ven- 
tured to challenge the conqueror, and boafted 
that (he could run as well as him. He did not 
refufe to enter the lifts with her ; and, while fhe 
is preparing to enter the courfe tucking up her 

gown 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 65 

gown on each fide, and (more anxious to dis- 
play a fine leg before Emilius, than to out-run 
him) examining whether her petticoats are fhort 
enough, he whifpered her mother in the ear; 
fhe fmiled, and gave him a token of approbation. 
He then placed himfelf by the fide of his com- 
petitor, and the fignal was no fooner given, than 
fhe fet out and flew like a bird. 

Women are not made for running; when they 
fly, it is to be overtaken. Running is not the 
only exercife they are unfit for, but it is the only 
one in which they appear with a bad grace : their 
elbows behind flicking clofe to their body, gives 
them a ridiculous appearance, and the high heels 
on which they are perched, makes them feem 
like fo many grafs-hoppers, who endeavour to 
run, inftead of leaping. 

Emilius, not fuppofing that Sophia could run 
better than other women, did not deign to ftit 
from his place, and he faw her ftart with a fmile 
of confeious fupcriority. But Sophia is light, ah€ 
wears low heels; fhe does not require any arti- 
fice to make her foot appear fmall . She got the 
ftart of him with fuch rapidity, that he had but 
juft time enough left to overtake this new Ata- 
lanta, when he perceived her at a great diftance 
from him. He then fet out in his turn, like an 
eagle darting on his prey; he purfued her, got 
clofe to her heels, and at length overtook her 
when fhe was quite out of breath; then gently 
putting his left arm round her waift, he took her 
up like a feather, and preffing the delightful 

burthen 



66 EMILIUS; OR, A KEW 

burthen to his heart, he thusfinifhed the race, and 
made her touch the mark firft ; at the fame time 
crying out, Sophia has gained the viftory f Then 
kneeling on one knee before her, he owned him- 
felf vanquifhed. 

Together with thefe various amufements, we 
fomctimes work at a trade we have learnt. At 
leaft one day in the week, and every day when 
the weather will not allow us to be out in the 
fields, Kmilius and I repair to the next joiner's* 
We do not work there merely for form's fake, as- 
people above fuch employment, but in good ear- 
neft and as real workmen. Sophia's father com** 
ing to vifit us one day, found us at our labour,, 
and did not fail to exprefs his furprife to his wife 
and daughter at what he had feen. " Go (fajdhe) 
and fee the young man at the workfhop, and 
you may judge whether he defpifes the condition 
of the poor!" Sophia was infinitely pleafed with 
this account. They confult together on this 
furprifingEmilius, thus employed. They que- 
ftion me, without explaining their intention** 
and having fixed,the day, the mother and daugh- 
ter take a chaife and come to the town. 

As (he entered the work-fhop, Sophia efpied a 
young man in his waiftcoat at the farther en4 
of the place, with his hair tied up carelefly, an4 
<b intent on what he was about that he did nor fee 
her. She flopped and made figns to her mother, 
Emilius, with a chiflel in one hand, and a mallet 
in the other, was finifhing a mortife. Afterwards 
he fa wed a board, and fixed a piece on the table 

to 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. &J 

to plane it. This fight affe&ed Sophia; it did 
honour to Emilius. Woman, refpedi your fu- 
perior! it is he who toils for you, who fup- 
portsyou. Such is the province, fuch is the 
prerogative of man ! 

While they were looking at him with atten- 
tion, I perceived them, and pulled Emilius by 
the fleeve; he looked up, he faw them, threw 
away his tools, and ran to them full of joy; 
when he had vented his firft tranfports, he 
made them fit down, and refumed his work. 
But Sophia could not fit ftill long; fhe ran 
over the fhop, examined the tools, tried whe- 
ther the boards were fmooth, picked up the 
fhavings, watched our hands, and faid fbe 
liked th^ employment, becaufe it was cleanly. 
She even attempted to work like Emilius* 
With her white and delicate hand, fhe putti- 
ed a plane along the board; the plane Aid 
along, but took no hold.*-~~I think 1 fpy 
the Go<J of love clapping his wings in the 
air, and laughing; I think I hear him cry 
out, with (bouts of joy; New Hermles has bis 
revtnge. 

In the mean time, the mother afked the ma- 
tter of the fliop forae queftions. " Sir (faid fhe) 
what do you pay ttiofe workmen?'*— " Madam 
("faid he) I give each of them twenty-pence a 
day, and find them provifions! but if that youth 
had a mind, he might earn more, for he is the beft 
workman in the country."— <4 Twenty-pence 
a day, and you find them pro vifions!" (faid the 

mother 



68 EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

mother, looking tenderly at us}. " Madam, it is 
even fo (faid the mafter)." On this fhe ran to 
Emilius., prefled him to her bofom, and fhed 
tears over him, without being able to utter a 
word more than, c< Oh ! my fon ! my fon !" 

Having paffed fome time in chatting with us 
but without hindering our bufinefs ; " Let us go^ 
(faid the mother to her daughter) : it is late, we 
muft not make your father wait for us." Then 
coming up to Emilius, fhe gave him a little 
tap on the cheek. " Well, my good workman 
won't you come along with us ?" He anfwered 
her in a ferious tone, " I am bufy ; you muft 
afk our matter's leave." They afked the mafy 
ter, if he could fpare us? He anfwered* that : 
he could not. c< I have bufinef§ which muft be 
finished in hafte, and which muft go home to- 
morrow. Depending upon them, I have re- 
fu fed workmen who offered themfelves; if thejr 
leave me I don't know where to get others 
now, and I cannot complete my work by the 
time appointed." The mother made no reply,- 
She expected Emilius to fpeak. He held down 
hisheadand faidnothing. " Sir (faidflie) fome- 
what furprifed at his filence, have you noanfwer 
to make to this?" Emilius looked tenderly at 
Sophia, and only faid, " You fee I muft flay.** 
Upon this, the? ladies left us. Emilius attended 
them to the door, followed them as far as he 
could with his eyes, fighed, and returned to* 
his work,, without fayinga word* 

la 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 69 

In their way home, the mother, fomewhat 
picqued, talke4 to her daughter about this unac- 
countable behaviour. " How ! (faid (he) was 
it fuch a difficult matter to make the mafter 
amends, without being obliged to flay; and 
could not this young man, who is fo lavifh of his 
money when there is no neceility, know how to 
beftow it on a proper occafion ?" — " God forbid, 
madam! (replied Sophia) that Emilius mould 
make fuch an ufe of money, as to employ it in 
order to break a perfonal engagement, forfeit his 
own word with impunity, and make another 
likewife violate his promife ! I am fenfible that 
he could eafily make the mafter amends, for the 
flight prejudice his abfence might occafion; but 
at the fame time, he would debafe his mind to 
the power of wealth j he would learn to fubfti- 
tute riches in the place of his duty, and to think 
himfelf free from all obligations, if he can but 
pay for the breach of them. Emilius has a diffe- 
rent way of thinking and I hope he will never 
alter it on my account. Do you think that his 
refolution to flay behind us coft him no uneafi- 
nefs ? Be allured, Madam, it was on my ac- 
count that he ftaid— I faw it plainly expreffed 
in his looks." 

Sophia, neverthelefs, is not difpofed to difpenfe 
with the proper attention and affiduity of a lover. 
On the contrary, fhe is haughty and afluming ; 
fhe had rather not be loved, than loved with in- 
difference. She has a noble pride which arifes 
from a conjcioufnefs of merit, and which exacts 

its 



70 fcMlLIUS; OR, A NEW 

its due refped. She would difdain a heart, 
infenfible of the value of her's ; which did not. 
love her for her virtues, as much or more than 
for her charms; a heart which did not prefer its- 
duties even to her* and prefer her, to all other 
confederations. She would not regard a lover, 
who knew no other law, but her will ; flie is 
ambitious of reigning over a man, whom (he has 
not debafed. Thus Circe having transformed 
to brutes the companions of Ulyffes defpifed 
them, and courted him alone whom fhe could 
not deprave. 

But that facred and inviolable right excepted, 
Sophia was jealous of her privileges to cxcefs ; 
(he obferves how fcrupuloufly Emilius regards 
them, with what zeal he fulfils her commands, 
with what addrefs he anticipates them, with what 
vigilance he arrives at the appointed moment; 
ihe would neither have him come before, nor 
after the time. To come before, would be to 
prefer his own will to her's; to come after the 
hour, would be tonegleft her. Neglcft Sophia! 
Such a negligence would not happen twice. 
Her unjuft fufpicion of having been once ne- 
glected, was very near undoing us; tut Sophia 
is equitable, and knows how to repair her errors. 

One evening we were expefted ; Emilius hav- 
ing received a fummons. Our friends came out 
to meet us ; but we did not appear. " What 
can become of them? (faidthcy). What accident 

has happened? No meffengcr !" They 

waited for us the whole evening. Poor Sophia 

dreaded 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION* 71 

dreaded fome misfortune; fhe is alarmed, (he is 
grieved, fhe fpends the night in tears. In the 
evening, they difpatched a meffenger to enquire . 
after us. The next morning the meffenger re- 
turned, accompanied by another from us, who 
made our apology by word of mouth, and told 
them we were well. Soon after, we arrived 
twrfelves. Then the fcene changed; Sophia 
<lried up her tears, or, if fhe fhed any more, 
•they were tears of indignation. Her haughty 
fpirk could not but refent that Emilius was alive 
and had made her expe<ft him in vain. 

On our arrival, fhe would have retired, but 
was obliged to ftay ; however, recollecting her- 
felf in an inftant, fhe affected a ferene and 
•compofed countenance, which would have de-. 
ceived any one. The father faluted us and faid : 
*• You have kept your friends here in great un~ 
eafinefs ; there are fome here, who will not eafily 
forgive you ? ,, —« Who is that, Sir?" faid So- 
phia, with the tnoft gracious fmile fhe could put 
on. «' Why need you enquire (faid her father) if 
it is not you }" Sophia made no reply, but turn- 
ed to her work. The mother received us in a 
cbdl and compofed manner, Emilius was con- 
founded, and afraid to approach Sophia. She 
addreffed heTfelf to him firft, afked after his 
health, defired him to fit down, and played the 
counterfeit fo well, that the poor youth, who is 
not yet perfectly acquainted with the language 
of paflions, was the dupe of this arFe&ed in- 
difference, 



d'fference, and * OR > A NEw 

Wfefc ^ »Vy near b 

. To undeceive him r " * 

**l. and attempted ' //** no W of SoDi) . . 

<*° : fte drewr it VT t0 faJ «e it, asl f r , PW 

*™h fucha Z . m me naftJv / V e ° Ue ntJi 

■nfweitd evert ?h COntem Ptuou s ^' ffere "ce 
fo ^car lift h With f «ae de er L ' > m °no- 
Awards her Y death > caft a Z ttCo,, <*ni. 

*•». *nich g ave £? ^ da »ed S i,! 
» V*r eitheMo^^L^^C ?1? 
Jem have forllnh* ""^ce.^e Acf; 

^thdre W , f brfl f e 7 s ha nd, *hich ft. ' , *«« 

We are iuiforh.« n * ton e, «< n « fa ' d 

h ^e„ to rS'^ bUt ** a « M 'a S 7 Wa > 
f0f yo«ne a r „ r : PV^^""^ ?'« 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 73 

" We fet out yefterday at four o'clock; the 
hour appointed was feven, and we always referve 
more time than is neceffary, that we may reft 
ourfelves by the way. We had already compafT- 
ed three fourths of our journey, when the moft 
lamentable cries pierced our ears; they iflued 
from a hollow way in the hill, at fome diftance 
from us. We haftened to the fpot where we 
heard the cries ; and found an unfortunate pea- 
fant, who coming from the town on horfeback^ 
and fomewhat overtaken with liquor, had fallen 
from his horfe, and broke his leg. We called 
Gutforaffiftance — none was near; we endeavour- 
ed to fet the unhappy man on horfeback, but 
found it impoflible ; the leaft motion gave the poor 
wretch the moft exquifite torture. We then de- 
termined to tie the horfe in the wood, fomewhat 
out of the road, and then taking the man in 
our arms, we carried him as gently as we 
could, following his directions with refpecl: to 
the road which led to his habitation. It was a 
long way, and we were obliged to reft ourfelves 
very often. We arrived at laft, fpent with fa- 
tigue; we discovered, with a deep concern, that 
we were acquainted with the houfe, and that the 
unhappy wretch, whom we had carried with fo 
much pains, was the very peafant who had re- 
ceived us fo cordially the firft day of our coming 
into thefe parts. In the confufion we were all 
in, we did not recoiled each other, till our ar- 
rival. 

Vol. I V\ E " He 



74 fctaititrsj ok, A NfeW 

" He had only two young children. His wife* 
tvho was ready to bring him a third*- was fo feif* 
ed at feeing him brought home in fuch a condi- 
tion, that (he fell into labour pains, and wad 
brought to bed a few hours afterwards. What 
could we do x in fuch a cafe, in a fequeftered cot- 
tage, where we could procure no afliftance? 
Emilius ran away to take the horfe we had left irt 
the wood, mounted him, and rode full gallop to, 
fetch a furgeon from the town. He gave the! 
horfe to the furgeon, and not being able to" get a 
nurfe foon enough, he returned on foot with a 
fervant, after having difpatched an exprefs to 
you ; while I, perplexed, as you may imagine, t 
between a man with a broken leg and a woman 
• in labour, endeavoured to get every thing ready, 
which the houfe afforded, and which I judged 
neceflary for the relief of both. 

<c I will not enter into a detail of what foU 
lowed, which is nothing to the purpofe. It was ' 
two hours after midnight, before we had either 
of us a moment's reft. At length, we returned 
at break of day to our lodging, determining, as 
foon as poiSble, to give you an account of the . 
accident which had befallen us." 

Here I ceafed, without adding a word further. 
But before anyone had an opportunity of fpeak- 
ing, Emilius drew near his miftrefs, raifed his 
voice, and faid to her, with more refolution than 
I could have expefted 5 <* Sophia, my deftiny de- 
pends on you! you know it well. You may kill 
me with grief j but do not hope to make me 

forget 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 7$ 

forget the duties of humanity ; they are ftill more 
facred, than thofe to which you have a claim; 
and I will never renounce them, even for you." 

At thefe words, Sophia, inftead of replying, 
rofe from her feat, put he,r arm round his neck, 
killed his cheek, and then, ftretching forth her 
hand with inexpreffible grace, faid, " Emilius, 
take my hand, it is your's; whenever you pleafe, 
be my hufband, my matter. I will endeavour to 
dcferve the honour." 

She had fcarce embraced him, when her fa- 
ther enraptured, cried out, Encore! Encore! and 
Sophia, without further importunity, kiffed him 
twice again, on the other cheek; but, at that 
inftant, recollecting herfelf, and filled with con- 
fuiion at what fhe had been doing, {he took re* 
fuge in her mother's arms, and hid her face, co- 
vered with blufhes, in herbofom. 

I need not defcribe the joy which every one 
felt on this occafion ; the humane reader muft 
be fenfible of it; After dinner, Sophia afked if 
it would be too far to pay a vifit to thofe poor 
people. Sophia defires it; it is a good office; 
and we go thither. We find them in different 
beds; Emilius had fent one, with people to give 
them affiftance. Butneverthelefs both lay foun- 
eafily, they fuffered as much from their painful 
fituation, as from their accidents. With her foft 
and light hand Sophia removed every thing 
which hurt them, and placed their limbs in an 
eaficr pofturc. They immediately found relief ; 
one would think that (he felt every thing which 

E 2 had 



76 EMILIUS j OR, A NEW 

had given them pain/This delicate girl is not dif- 
gufted either with the uncleanlinefs or the fmell 
of the place. She who is always fo modeft and 
nice ! who would not, for the world, have come 
near a man's bed, fhifts the poor peafant with- 
out any fcruple, and puts him in a more conve- 
nient pofition. The zeal of charity is fuperior 
to modefty ; what fhe does, fhe- does fo gently, 
and with fuch fkill, that they find relief, though 
they fcarce feel her touch them. The hufband 
and wife in concert blefs the charitable girl who 
affifts them. She appears a comforter fent to 
them from heaven; her amiable perfon, her 
fweet difpofition, her gootkiefs and companion, 
all feem to proclaim her an angel. Emilius, 
affected with the fccne, views every thing which 
paffes in filence, Man, love thy companion! 
God has deftined her to comfort thee in thy 
afflictions, and to afTuage thy miferies : fuch is 
the province of woman. 

They faw the new-born child chriftened. 
The two young lovers flood fponfors, eagerly 
wifhing, from their hearts, to have occafion for 
employing others in the fame office, on their 
account. They long for the happy moment of 
their union; they think it juft at hand: Sophia's 
fcruples are all removed — but mine are not. 
They are not yet fo far advanced as they ima- 
gine ; .very one muft have his turn. 

One morning, when they had not feen each 
other for two days, I came into Emilius's apart- 
ment with a letter in my hand, and looking at 

him 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 77 

him ftedfaftly, I afked him, " What would you 
do, if any one was to bring you the news of 
Sophia's death ?" At this alarming queftiori, he 
ftarted furioufly, and his countenance exprefled 
unutterable agoayof apprehenfion." Anfwer me," 
faid I, with the fame ferenity as before. — En- 
raged at my compofure, he drew near to me, but 
foon flopped fhort in an attitude which was almoft 

menacing. " What fliould I do! I 

know not j but this I know, that I fhould never 
bear the fight of him again, who fhould bring 
me the intelligence." — " Be comforted (faid I 
fmiling) : (he lives, fhe is well ; and fhe expects 
us this evening. But let us take a walk, I have 
ibmething to fay to you." 

The paflion which engrofles him will not fuf- 
fcr him, as formerly, to attend to difcourfes of 
purereafon; I am obliged to avail myfelfx>f that 
very paffion, to intereft him fo as to render him 
attentive to my inftru&ions. This is what I 
have effe&ed by this terrible prelude ! I am now 
certain that he will liften to me. 

" You muft endeavour to be happy, my dear 
Emilius ; this is the end which every fenfible Be- 
ing propofes; it is the firft defire imprinted in us 
by nature, and which never abandons us. But 

where is happinefs ? Who enjoys it ? Every 
one is in purfuit of it, yet no one finds it. We 
fpend our whole lives in fearch of it, and yet ne- 
ver attain it. My young friend, when I took 
you in my arms as foon as you was born, and, 
calling heaven to witnefs the engagement I made 

E 3 devoted 



9 



7 8 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

devoted my days to the happinefs of your's, was 
I aware of the charge I undertook ? No ! I 
only knew that by enfuHng your felicity, I (hotrkl 
fccure my own. By making this ufeful fearch 
on your account, I rendered the benefit com* 
mon to both. 

cc While we are ignorant of our duty, it is the 
part of wifdom to remain inactive. This is a 
maxim which men moft ftand in need of, and 
which they are the leaft qualified to obferve. By 
purfuing happinefs without knowing where it is 
to be found, we may probably fly from it, aod 
we expofe ourfelves to as many chances of run- 
ning wide from it, as there are ways which de- 
viate from theright path. But all the world have 
not a capacity to know when it is proper for them 
toa&. Our ardent purfuit after happinefs ren- 
ders us fo reftlefs, that we had rather take a 
wrong road, than not endeavour to attain it ; and 
when we have once ftarted from the place where 
we might meet with it, we can never recover it 
again. 

u Though equally ignorant with others, Ien- 
deavoured to avoid the common failing. In tak- 
ing charge of you, I determined not to take an 
unneceffary ftep, and to prevent your doing fo. 
I adhered to the path of nature, in hopes of its 
leading me to that of happinefs. I found they 
were both the fame, and that I had followed it, 
without knowing it. 

" Be you my witnefs, my judge; I will never 
except againil you. Your early years were not 

Sacrificed 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 79 

facrificed to thofe which were to follow ; you 
have enjoyed all the bleflings which nature has 
beftowed on you. Of the evils to which flie has 
madeyou fubjedt, and from which I could not 
preferve you, you have yet only experienced fuch 
as may inure you to fuftain greater. You have 
never endured any, but to avoid one more grie- 
vous. You have neither experienced fe verity, 
norflavery. Free and contented, you have hi- 
therto beenjuft and good; for mifery and vice 
are infeparable : and a man never grows wicked, 
till he becomes unhappy. May the remembrance 
of your youth continue when you are old ! — I do 
not fear but your honeft heart, when it recol- 
le&s that time, will blcfs the hand which diredl- 
ed you. 

" When you arrived at years of maturity, I 
cautioned you againft adopting the prepofleffions 
of mankind ; when your he art became fufceptible, 
I preferved you from the dominion of paflion. 
If I could have prolonged that inward ferenity 
to the end of your life, I fhould have complet- 
ed my work, and you would always have been 
as happy as man can be : but, my dear Emilius, 
it were to no purpofe to have dipped your 
mind in the river Styx; I could not make 
it invulnerable throughout ! you have a new 
enemy to encounter, whom you have not 
yet learned to fubdue, and from whom I cannot 
protect you. This enemy, is yourfelf. Nature 
and fortune had made you free. You could en- 
dure difappointments; you could bear bodily 

£ 4 pain* 



8o feMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

pain, but you was a ftranger to uneafinefs ©f 
, mind; you was fubjeft only to the common 
lot of human nature, but now you arc fubfer- 
vient to all the attachments you have formed; 
by contra&ing defires, you have made yourfelf a 
flave to every object of your wifhes. Without 
any change in your condition, without receiving 
any real injury, without any thing which may 
effedt your being, what misfortunes may befal 
your mind ! What mifery may you experience* 
without being fick ! How many deaths may yoq? 
Juffer, without dying ! A falfehood, a miftake, 
jeven a doubt, may throw you into defpair. 

" You behold the heroes at the theatres aban- 
don themfelves to excefs of grief, make the houfe 
echo with their abfurd lamentations, bewail 
their fate like women, weep like children, and 

by thefe extravagancies gain the applaufe of the 
audience. Remember how much you difapprov- 
ed of thefe bewailings, thofe cries and lamenta- 
tions, in men from whom we might expecl: a£ts 
of conftancy and fortitude. c What! ((aid you) 
are thefe the examples they difplay for our 
imitation! are they afraid that man is not 
mean, wretched, and weak enough, without their 
flattering his weaknefs, under the fallacious 
appearance of virtue ?' My dear friend, be 
not fo fevere on fuch fcenes for the future : 
behold ! you are become one of thofe heroes r 
whom you defpifed. 

" You are not afraid of pain, or death; you 
can fubmit to the law of neceflity, in phyfical 

evilsj 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 9* 

evils, but you have not yet learned to fubdue 
your appetites ; and it is from them more than 
from our real wants, that all the mifery of our 
lives proceeds. Our defires are unlimited, our 
power of refiftance weak. Man, by means of 
his defires, is attached to a thoufand obje&sj 
and yet, of himfelf he is not fure of fecuring 
one, not even his own life* the more he en- 
larges his attachments, the more he increafes his 
troubles. Every thing in life is tranlient : every 
thing we are fond of, we muft abandon fooner 
or later, and yet we attach ourfelves to them, as 
if we were fure of poffefling them to eternity. 
With what horrour was you feifed at the bare 
idea of Sophia's death? Have you concluded 
then that file is immortal ? Arc there none who 
die at her age ? She muft die, my friend, and 
perhaps before you. Who can enf lire us that fhe 
is alive at this moment? Nature made you to die 
but once, you have fubje&ed yourfelf to a fecond 
death, and are likely to die twice* 

" Thus abandoned to inordinate paflion, how, 
many fubje&s of uneafinefs you create yourfelf! 
Always expofed to difappointments, loffes, and 
alarms, you will not even enjoy the little com- 
fort you have left. The fear of lofing all, 
will prevent your enjoying any thing ; by refign- 
ing yourfelf entirely to your paflions, you put it 
out of your power to gratify them. You will 
always be in purfuit of happinefs, and it will al- 
ways fly from you ; you will be unhappy, and 
become wicked •> and how fhould you be other- 

E 5 wife 



«2 EMIL1U8; OR, A NEW 

wife, when you have no law but your own ir- 
regular defires? If you cannot bear involun- 
tary privations, how will you prafitife the virtue 
of felf-denial? How will you be able to facri- 
fice inclination to duty, and force your -defires to 
attend toreafon? You who have already deter- 
mined never to feteyes on the man who fhould 
acquaint you with your miftrefs's death : how 
would you look at him who fhould deprive you 
of her while fhe is living? How would you re- 
gard him, who fhould tell you fhe is dead to 
you ? that virtue obliges you to part ? If you 
muft live with her at all events, whether Sophia 
is married or not, whether you are free or not, 
whether fhe loves or hates you, whether fhe 
grants or withholds her affe&ions ? — It is of no 
confequence, you muft and will poffefs her on 
any terms. Tell me where he will flop, who 
has no law but his own appetite, and cannot 
refrain his defires ? 

" My friend, there is no happinefs to be at* 
tained without refolution, nor any virtue with- 
out ftruggle. The word virtue implies refolu- 
tion ; refolution is the foundation of every vir- 
tue. Virtue is only to be attained by a being 
whom nature has formed weak, but whom re- 
folution has made powerful; in this confifts the 
merit of a virtuous man ; and though we call 
God juft, we do not call him virtuous, becaufe 
he finds no difficulty in a&ing right. To give 
you a juft idea of virtue, a word fo much abufed, 
I waited till you was in a difpofition to attend to 

me. 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 83 

me. While the praftice of virtue cofts us no 
trouble, it is not fo Yieceffary to be acquainted 
with its nature. The occafion rifes as the paf- 
fions are inflamed ; and you #re now come to 
this crifis. 

" Having educated you in all the fimplicity of 
nature, inftead of inculcating painful duties, I 
have preferved you from the vices which render 
thofe duties painful ; I have rendered falfehood 
rather unneceffary, than odious to you; I have 
been lefs follicituous about teaching you to give 
every one their due, than inftru&ing you what 
belongs to yourfelf. I have made you rather 
good, than virtuous; but he who is only good* 
preferves his goodnefs no longer than he finds a 
pleafure in it : goodnefs is broken and deftroyed 
by the fhockof human paflions; a man who ia 
• only good, is only good for his own fake* 

44 Who then is the man of virtue i He who. 
can fubdue his affections. For in fo doing, he 
purfues the dictates of reafon, conscience, and 
duty ; he adheres to a regular plan, from which 
nothing can tempt him to deviate. Hitherto you 
have been free in appearance only; you enjoyed 
the precarious liberty of a flave, who has not yet 
received his matter's commands. Be now actu- 
ally free; learn to be your own mafter; govern 
your affections, Emilius, and you will be vir- 
tuous. Thus you have another apprenticefhip to 
ferve, and a more painful one than you have 
already experienced : for nature delivers us from 
the evils fhe inflicts, and teaches us to endure 

E 6 them* 



84 EMILIUS; bR, A NEW 

them; butftie does notaffift us in thofe which we 
create ourfelves; fhe leaves us to our gui- 
dance; fhe abandons us as the victims of our 
paffions, to fink beneath our fantaftick mifery, 
and glory in the tears at which we ought to blufh. 

" This is the firft paffion you have felt. It is 
the only one perhaps worthy of you. If you 
know how to govern it like a man, it will be the 
laft; you will fubdue all others, and be obedient 
only to virtue. 

." Your paffion is not criminal : I grant it; it 
is as pure as the minds which entertain it. It 
was formed by virtues, and nourifhed by inno- 
cence. Happy lovers I The charms of virtue 
heighten thofe of love; and the delightful union* 
you expect, is not lefs the reward of your difcre- 
tion, than of your attachment. But, tell me fin* 
cerely, are you lefs a flave to this paffion, pure 
as it is? Are you lefs devoted to its influence? 
and if it fhould ceafe to be innocent to-morrow, 
would you fupprefs it to-morrow? This is the 
time to try your fortitude; it will be too late 
when you haye immediate occafion for it. This 
dangerous effort fhould be made before the dan- 
ger draws near. Soldiers do not exercife their 
arms in fight of an enemy ; they pra&ife in time 
•of peace, an-! prefent themfelves ready prepared, 

4< It is a miflake to diftinguifh between law- 
ful and forbidden paffions ; to devote ourfelves to 
the firft, and to reject the latter. They are all 
good while they are under fubje&ion ; they are 
all bad if they gain the]ajccndancy. Nature for- 
bids 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 85 

bids us to extend our attachments beyond out 
powers; reafon forbids us to wifli for that which 
we cannot attain; and confcience does not for- 
bid us to be tempted, but it commands us not to 
yield to temptation. Our paffions do not depend 
on ourfelves ; but the government of them 
does abfolutely. Every feeling which we fubdue 
is natural : everyone which fubduesusis criminal. 
•A man is not guilty for being fond of his neigh- 
-hour's wife, if he keeps that unfortunate paffion 
-within the bounds of innocence; but he is cul- 
pable, for being fond of his own wife to fuch 
a degree as to 'facrifice every thing to that fond- 
«efs. 

" Do not expe£t tedious leffons of morality 
from me. I have but one precept to recommend, 
and that includes all others — Be a Man ! Con- 
fine your affe&ions within the limits of your 
condition. Study and learn thofe Kmits: • how- 
ever narrow they may be, we are never unhappy 
while we keep within them, but only when we 
exceed them; we are unhappy, when our inor- 
dinate defires make us afpire after impoffibilities ; 
•we are unhappy, when we forget the condition 
of human nature, to form an imaginary exift- 
ence, from which we always drop into our own. 
The only pleafures we are unwilling to quit, are 
thofe we think we have a right to enjoy. We 
are eafily detached from thofe which we think it 
impoffibleto attain; defires without hope create 
no uneafinefs. A beggar is not tormented with 
the defoe of being a king; a king does not wiih 

to 



86 EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

to be a God, till he has forgotten that he is a 
man. 

" The delufions of pride, are the fources of our 
greateft misfortunes; but the confideration of the 
mifery of human nature, always makes a wife 
man moderate. He preferves his ftation, he is not 
reftlefs to leave it, he does not endeavour in vain 
to acquire what he cannot fecure; and applying 
his attention to enjoy what he has, he is in faft 
more rich and powerful, in proportion as his de- 
fires are more moderate than our's. Shall a mor- 
tal and perifhable being attempt to form ever- 
lafting attachments on this earth, where every 
thing fluctuates, where every thing decays, and 
from which he may be removed to-morrow i O 
Emilius! O my friend! if I fhould lofe you, 
what comfort fhould I have remaining ? And yet 
I muft learn to bear the lofs, for who knows how 
foon I may be deprived of you ? 

" Would you live happily and difcretely? 
Attach your mind to thofe beauties which never 
decay; let your defires be limited by your con- 
dition ; let your duty go hand in hand with your 
inclinations; extend the law of neceffity to mo^ 
ral accidents ; learn to bear the lofs of every 
thing which you may be deprived of; learn to re- 
nounce every thing at the command of virtue, 
to raife your mind fuperior to accidents, to de- 
tach your heart without breaking it, to be cou- 
rageous in adverfity; in a word, learn never to be 
unhappy; to perfevere in your duty; in fhort, 
never to be criminal, You will then be happy 

5 in 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 87 

in fpite of fortune, and prudent in fpite of your 
pailions. Then you will find a pleafure even in 
the fruition of precarious tranfpor-ts, which no- 
thing can interrupt; you will enjoy them without 
their engrofling you j and you will perceive that 
man, who is'fubjedl to lofe every thing, enjoys 
that only which he knows how to renounce. It 
is true, you will not experience the illusion of 
imaginary pleafures -> neither will you feel the 
useafinefs which is the jefultof them. You 
will be a great gainer by the exchange ; for tbefe 
pains are real and frequent* the pleafures are 
rare and fantaftick. Having overcome fo many 
delufive notions, you will not be fubfervient to 
that which fets life at fo high a rate. You will 
pafs your days without trouble, and end them 
without terrour ; you will quit life with the fame 
cafe that you renounce other enjoyments. Let 
others, feifed with dread, think their being at an 
end when they leave this world ; you who know 
the true worth of exiftence, will think it does 
but begin Death clofes the life of the wickedi 
and gives birth to~that of thejuft. ,, 

Emilius liftened to me with a degree of at- 
tention, mixed with inquietude. From this pre- 
amble, he apprehended fome fatal conclusion. 
Heforefaw, that, by urging the neceflity of exer- 
cifing fortitude of mind, I meant to prepare him 
for this fevere trial ; and, like a wounded man 
who trembles at the approach of a furgeon, he 
fancies that he feels the wound preffed by the 

heavy, 



88 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

heavy, but healing hand, which prevents it from 
mortifying. 

Uncertain, perplexed, eager to know whither 
my difcourfe tended, inftead of returning an an- 
fwer, he afked me a queftion. " What muft I 
do? (faid he, almoft trembling and afraid to look 
up)." — " You muft quit Sophia (replied I, with 
a refolute tone." — " What do you fay ? (he cried 
out, with fome vehemence) quit Sophia! Leave 
her, deceive her, be a traitor, a villain, a per- 
jured wretch !...." I replied, interrupting 
him, " Can Emilius fuppofe that I (hall advife 
him to merit thefe appellations?" — "No (he con- 
tinued with the fame impetuofity) neither you nor 
any other fliall make me deferve them; I fliall 
know, in fpite of you, how to preferve the cha- 
racter you have formed — I fliall know how to 
avoid deferving fuch imputations." 

As I expected that at firft he would give vent 
to his paffion, I let it pafs over without difcom- 
pofing myfelf. With what grace could I re- 
commend moderation to him, if I was not maf- 
terof it myfelf! Emilius knows me too well to 
imagine that I would require any thing unbe- 
coming of him; and he is fenfible likewife that 
it would be unjuft to quit Sophia, in the fenfe 
in which he took the word. He, therefore, de- 
fired an explanation. I then re fumed my dif- 
courfe. 

<c Do you imagine, Emilius, that a man in 
any ftation whatever, can be happier than you 
have been for thefe three months paft? If you 

fuppofe 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. $g 

fuppofe it, undeceive yourfelf. Before you have 
tailed the pleafures of life, you have exhaufted 
its felicity. There is nothing fuperior to what 
you have felt. Senfual pleafures are tranfrent. 
The habitual ftate of the affe&ions always lofe 
by their gratification. You have enjoyed more 
in expectation, than ever you will enjoy in re- 
ality. The imagination, which decks the objefl 
of our defires, is loft in the fruition. Ex*- 
Cept the Supreme Being, who is felf-exiftent, 
there is nothing beautiful but what is ideal. If 
this ftate of expedtation could have lafted for- 
ever, you would have enjoyed the completeft 
happinefs. But every thing incident to human 
nature partakes of its decay; every thing in this 
life is finite and tranfitory ! and if even the 
condition which makes us happy was to laft for 
ever, habit would deprive us of our tafte for it* 
If externals remain the fame, our affe&ions 
chajige; happinefs leaves us, or we renounce it. 
" The time has flipped away infenfibly during 
your delufion. The fummer is over, winter is 
coming on. Should we be able to continue our 
former courfeof life in fuch a rigorous feafon, it 
would not be fuffered. We muft, againft our 
will, change our manner of living; this will 
laft no longer. I fee, by the impatience of your 
looks, that this difficulty no longer perplexes 
you : the declaration of Sophia, and your own 
defires fuggeft an eafy expedient of avoiding the 
(how, and of feeing your miftrefs as oft as you 
pleafe, without the trouble of a journey. This 

expedient 



90 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

expedient is agreeable no ddubt : the fpring will 
come on, the fnow \yill melt away, but yout 
marriage will remain indifibluble; we muft pro- 
vide for every feafon. 

" You would marry Sophia, and you have 
not been acquainted with her above five months ! 
You would marry her, not becaufe fuch a 
match would be prudent, but becaufe you love 
her; as if love was rjever deceived ; and as if 
they who were united by affe&ion, werene- 
. ver parted by hatred. She is virtuous; I know 
fhe is ; but is that enough ? Doth probity ne- 
ceflarily make perfons agreeable to each other ? 
It is not her virtue I call in queftion, but her 
difpofition. Is that of a woman to be fo readily 
known ? Will an attachment of four months 
aflure you of the continuance of it during life? 
Perhaps an abfence for half that time would 
make her forget you ; perhaps fome other youth 
waits only for your departure, to efface your im- 
preflions from her heart ; and it is not impoffible 
that you may find her at your return, as cojd and 
indifferent as you have hitherto found her tender 
and fufceptible. Our fentiments depend not on 
our moral principles ; flie may continue a very 
virtuous girl, and yet love you no longer. On 
the other hand, it is poffible, indeed, ihe may 
remain conftant and faithful ; I flatter myfelf fhe 
will; but who can pofitively anfwer either for 
you or her, when neither of you have been put 
to the tryal ? Would you defer making fuch a 

, tryal till it could anfwer no purpoie r Would 

you 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. gj 

you defer the knowledge of each other till you 
could not be feparated ? 

" Sophia is not yet eighteen years,of age, and, 
you are but juft twenty-two; this is indeed 
a proper age for love, but not for marriage. 
What a pretty couple to become the heads of a 
family ! In order to be capable of educating 
your children, wait at leaft till you are no longer 
fuch yourfelves. You are ignorant how greatly 
young perfons fuffer from a too early pregnancy; 
which not unfrequently enervates their conftitu- 
tion, deftroys their health, and fhortens their 
life. You know not how many unfortunate chil- 
dren fuffer in their conftitution and health, for 
want of having been nourished in the womb of 
an adult mother. If a pregnant wife be not full 
grown, flie muft divide the growing fubftance 
with her child; and thus each being deprived of 
the whole fliare which nature requires, it isim- 
poflible they fliould not both be affe&ed. I know 
but little of Emilius, if he would not much ra- 
ther have a wife and children of robuft and vi- 
gorous conftitutions, than gratify his impatience 
at the cxpenfe of their health and life. 

c< In regard to yourfelf in particular, have you 
maturely confidered the nature of the obligations 
you would lay yourfelf under; in becoming a 
hufband and a father ? In afluming the charac- 
ter of a matter of a family, you become an im- 
portant member of the commbn-wealth? — Do 
you know the duties attendant on this character, 

or what is required of you by the government, 

by 



$2 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

by the laws, and by your country ? Do you 
know on what condition you are permitted to 
live, and for whofe fake you ought, when called 
uppn^to die ? You imagine you have already 
learned every thing £ and in fa& you know no- 
thing. Before you take your place in the com- 
munity, learn to know and refpeft the order of 

fociety, and to fix on that rant which is the 
moft fuitable to you. 

" Emilius, you muft quit Sophia; not that I 
mean you fliould abandon her; if, indeed, you 
were capable of fuch behaviour, fhe would be 
but too happy in not being a&ually married to 
you : you muft quit her, in order to return wor- 
thy of her affections. Be not fo vain as to 
imagine you have deferved her already : you have 
ftill much to do. Undertake, then, this noble 
tafk; learn to fupporther abfence, and to earn 
the prize of fidelity; fo that you may havefome- 
thingto boaft of on your return, and be entitled 
to afk her hand; not as a favour, but as there- 
ward of your merit." 

Being as yet unaccuftomed to combat his in- 
clinations, to defire ardently one thing, yet re- 
folveupon another, it is no wonder Emilius does 
not readily acquiefce in a meafure fo full of felf- 
denial. No; he would difpute the propriety of 
it totheutmoft. He can fee no reafon why he 
fhould reje& the happinefs which is in his power ; 
he thinks to delay the acceptance is to difdain 
the hand that is offered him. " Where is the ne- 
ceflity (fays he) for me to be parted from Sophia, 

in 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 93 

in order to learn what I am ignorant of ? Or, 
Were it neceffary, why fhould I not previoufly 
enter into thofe indiffoluble engagements, which 
will be the Aire pledge of my return I Let me 
but marry her, and I am ready to follow you 
through the world ; let us be once united, and 

I will part with her without fear/' " What ! 

Emilius ! fliall we unite, only to part you ? 
think what a contradiction. It is noble for a 
lover to fupport the abfence of his miftrefs ! but 
it is imprudent for a hufband ever to quit his 
wife, unlefs in cafes of neceffity. To remove, 
however, all your objections, I am not infenfible 
that your delays fhould be involuntary ! it is re- 
quifite you fhould tell Sophia, that you leave her 
againft your inclination. You muft, neverthe- 
lcfs, be content; and as you are to be governed 
by reafon in this affair, you muft obey the dic- 
tates of another mafter. You have not forgot 
the engagements into which you entered with 
me: infhort, Emilius, you muft leave Sophia j 
I infift on it." 

On this peremptory declaration, he wasfilent! 
but, after paufing for a moment, he feemed to 
gather confidence, and afked me, when we were 
to fet out ? u Within a week ( faid I ) fo that it 
re neceffary to prepare Sophia for our departure. 
Women have not the fortitude of men ! they re- 
quire, therefore, to be treated with more addrefs ; 
it being, befides, no duty incumbent on her to 
infift on this abfence : it is allowable in her to 
fupport your parting with lefs courage. 



94 JBMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

I am but too much inclined, to attend our 
young lovers, and continue the moment of their 

. amours till tfye journal of their feparation ; but 
I have already to often trefpaffed on the patience 
of my readers ; for once, therefore, I fhall check 
my prolixity, in order to draw toward a 
conclufion* Do you conceive that Emilius will 
difplay as much refolution in this matter be- 
fore his miftrefs, as he hath done before his 
friend ? For my part, I conceive he will ; it is 
from the fincerity of his love that he will de- 
duce that refolution. He would be even more 
confufed in her prefence, if it would coft him 
lefs to part from her; as in fuch a cafe, he 
would be fenfible of his injuftice, and would be 
in a fituation the moft embarraffing of all others 
to an ingenuous mind. But the more fuch a 
facrifice cofts him, the more honour will he af- 
fume to himfelf in the eyes of her who makes it 

"fofevere. He is not apprehenfive that me will 
miftake the motives for his determination. His 
every look feems to fay to her, Read in my heart, 
Sophy, that fidelity on which I prefume to rely 
on yours. 

The proud Sophia endeavours, on her part, to 
fupport with equal dignity, the unexpected ftroke 
by which fhe is thus furprifed. She ftrives to 
appear unaffected by it; but as fhe reaps not, like 
Emilius, the honour of the combat and the vic- 
tory, her refolution does not Co well fupport her. 
She burfts into tears, fhe cannot reftrain her invo- 
luntary fighs, while the fear of being forgotten 

embiters 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION* , 95 

embitters the thoughts of reparation. Not that 
ihe lets fall a tear before her lover, or betrays to 
him her anxiety. No ; {he-would rather die than 
let a figh efcape her in his company; it is to me 
ihe pours forth her complaints, it is I who am 
made the confident of her tears. The women 
are extremely artful, in difguifing their fenti-* 
ments; the more (he murmurs in fecret againft 
my feverity, the more attentive is Ihe to oblige 
and flatter me; being fully fenfible that her de- 
ftiny is in my hands. 

On this occafion, I endeavour, therefore, to 
confole her: taking upon me to anfwer for the 
fidelity of her lover, or rather of her hufband. 
I charge her to preferve the fame conftancy to- 
wards him, and affure her with a folemn pro- 
tection, that within two years he (hall be her's* 
She knows me too well to think I would deceive 
her; and thus I become thefecurity for each to 
the other*. Their own hearts, their virtue, the 
confidence they place in my probity, and in the 
aflurance of their parents,, all ferve to confirm 
thefe young lovers in the certainty of their being 
deftined for each other. But what can reafon do 
againft human weaknefs ? They part, as if they 
were never to meet again. 

It is now that Sophia recollects the forrows of 
Eucharis, and imagines herfelf to be in the fame 
fituation. We muft not lay a foundation, how- 
ever, for the remembrance of thefe fantaftick 
amours during their abfence. To prevent 
this I take an opportunity of faying te herj 



" Sophy, 



</t> 



^ EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

<c Sophy, I would have you make an exchange of 
books with Emilius. Give him yourTelemachus, 
that he may learn to refemble fo accomplished a. 
character \ and he fhall give you his Spectator, 
in which you are fo fond of reading. There 
you may ftudy the duties of a modeft and virtuous 
wife, remembring, that, in two year's time, 
thefe duties will be your's." This exchange is 
agreeable to both and adds to their confidence 
in each other. At length comes the forrowful 
hour of parting. 

Sophia's father, with whom I had concerted 
my whole fcheme, embraced me, as I took my 
leave; and, taking me afide, add re fled me, in a 
ferious and firm tone, as follows : — " Knowing 
that I had to do with a man of honour, I have 
hitherto confented to every thing you defired; I 
have now, therefore, got but one word to fay- 
Remember that your pupil hath fealed his mar- 
riage contract on my daughter's lips." 

What a difference was obfervable in the coun- 
tenance of the two lovers ! Emilius glowing, im- 
petuous, and agitated to the moft violent ex-. 
tremes, gave vent to his exclamations, bedewing 
the hands of the father, mother, and daughter, 
with his tears ; embracing the whole family, and 
repeating the fame things an hundred times over, 
with a perplexity that would have been ludicrous 
enough on any other occafion. On the other 
hand, the afflicted Sophia was pale, motionlefs, 
and filent ; her eyes, though fhe wept not, had 
loft their fire, and a fixed gloom overfpread her 

coun- 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 97 

countenance; fhe heard, fhe faw nobody, not 
even Emilius himfelf. It was in vain he kiffcd 
her hand, or preffed her in his arms; flie re- 
mained infenfible to his tears and carefles : — with 
regard to her, he was already departed. How 
much more affecting was this mournful obje&, 
than the troublefome lamentations of her lover ! 
Emilius fhuddered at the fight, and it was with 
the greateft difficulty I forced him away. Had 
I permitted him to ftay a moment longer, he 
would never have been prevailed on to go. I 
was charmed, however, at his carrying away 
with him fo mournful an impreffion. If he 
fhould ever be tempted to forget what he owes 
to Sophia, the recollection of her image, at the 
moment of his departure, will be fufficient to 
reclaim him. 



ON TRAVELLING. 

IT hath been a fubjefl of much difpute, whe- 
ther it be expedient for young people to 
travel. If the queftion were differently put, and 
it were aflced, whether it be of any ufc for men 
to have travelled, there would perhaps be no dif- 
pute about it. 

The abufe of reading is deftruflive to know- 
ledge. Imagining ourfelves to know every thing 
we read* we conceive it unneceflary to learn it 
by other means. Too much reading, however, 
ferves only to make us prefumptuous blockheads* 
Of all the ages in which literature hath flouriih- 

Vol. IV F «J, 



itj8 EtalLItJSj 0R| A NEW 

cd, reading Was never fo univerfal as in the pfe* 
fent, nor were men, in general, ever faignorant* 
Of all the countries in Europe, there is none in 
which are printed fo many hiftories, travels, and 
Voyages, as in France, and yet there are no 
people in Europe who know lefs of the genius 
and manners of other nations than the French, 
So many artificial volumes make us negledl that 
of nature \ or, if we read the book of the 
world, every one confines himfelf tofome par- 
ticular fheet. 

A Parifian imagines himfelf verfed in the 
knowledge of mankind, though he knows only 
Frenchmen: in a city always full of ftrangers, 
he looks upon every new comer as an extraordi- 
nary phenomenon, whofe fellow is not to be 
met with in the world. One muft have lived 
among the citizens of this metropolis, and have 
been intimately acquainted with them, to be able 
to conceive, how people, with fo much wit, can 
be fo very itupid. It is, indeed, whi/nfically 
ftrange, that they fhall have read, perhaps, a 
dozen times over, the defcription of a country, 
whofe inhabitants they regard, when they fee 
them, as fo many prodigies. 

It is too much trouble to have at once an au- 
thor's prejudices and our own to remove, in or- 
der to come at truth. I have fpent great part 
of my life, in reading accounts of voyages and 
travels, and never yet found two that agreed in 
giving me the fame notions of the fame people. 
On making a comparifon alfo of the little I have 

had 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 99 

had an opportunity of obfcrving with what I have 
read, it hath ended in totally throwing afide 
the romances of travellers, and regretting the 
■lofs of that time which I have thrown away, in 
pormg over them for inftru&ion ; being fully con- 
vinced, that, with regard to obfervations of every 
kind, it is not enough to read thofe of others : 
we muft make obfervations of our own. This 
Would be the cafe, were even travellers always 
Sincere, and did they tell us only what they faw 
or believed without difgui fin g the truth, by the 
falfe colours in which they exhibit it; it is 
more particularly fo, therefore, when we find a 
difficulty in difcovering the truth, through the 
deceitful appearance they have caft on it. 

Let us give up the boafted refource of books, 
therefore, to fuch as may content themfelves 
with it: reading is an art, like that of Raymond 
Lully, well enough calculated to teach people to 
talk about what they do not underftand. It is 
well enough to qualify young Platos for philofo- 
phifing in polite affemblies, and for inftru£ting 
the company in the cuftoms of Egypt and India 
on the credit of Paul Lucas, or Tavernier. 

I lay it down, as an inconteflible maxim, that 
a man, who is acquainted with the people of one 
nation only, inftead of knowing mankind, 
knows only the people among whom he hath 
lived. Hence we are led to another method of 
propofingthe queftion in hand. Is itfufHcient 
for a man well-educated to be acquainted only 
with his own countrymen ; or is it neceflary for 

F 2 him 



ioo EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

him to be acquainted with mankind in general? 
There can be no doubt or difpute, I imagine, 
concerning a reply to this queftion. Thus we 
fee how much the folution of a difficulty fome- 
times depends on the method of propofing it. 

In order to ftudy mankind in general, how- 
ever, it may be afked, whether it be neceflary to 
make the tour of the world ? Can it be requifite 
to go as far as Japan to make obfervations on 
the characters of Europeans ? In order to ftudy 
the'fpecics, can it be needful to know all its in- 
dividuals? Not at all. There are men who fo 
nearly refemble each other that it is not worth 
while to ftudy them feparately. Whoever hath 
feen ten Frenchmen hath feen the whole nation ; 
and, though we cannot fay altogether fo much of 
Englifhmen, and fome other people, it is never- 
theless very certain, that every nation hath a fpe- 
cifick character, which is to be deduced from the 
obfervations made on not one only, but feveral 
of its individuals. Thus, whoever may have 
compared the people of ten different nations, 
may be faid to know mankind, as he who has 
feen ten Frenchmen, may be faid to know the 
French. 

In order to know the character of a people, 
it is not fufficient to ride poft through their coun- 
try y it is neceffary to know how to travel. To 
make obfervations, it is requifite to have eyes, 
and to turn them toward the object we are feli- 
citous of obferving. There are many people, 
who will learn ftill lefs from travelling than from 

books $ 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. ici 

books; becaufe. they are incapable of reflec- 
tion. In reading they might rely, at leaft, on 
the fenfe of their authour; but in travelling, 
being unable to j udge for themfelves, they would 
learn nothing. Others again never profit by tra- 
velling, becaufe they do not covet inftruSion. 
The objeft of their purfuits is fo different, that 
it is a chance if this ever ftrikes them. Of all 
the people in the world, the French travel the 
moll j but, being fo vain of their native cuftoms, 
they confound all the various modes together, 
which do not refemble their own. The French 
are difperfed through every part of the globe; 
nor is there any country in the world where fo 
many travellers are to be found among the na- 
tives as in France: and yet, with all this, there 
are no people in Europe who have feen fo much 
and know fo little. 

The Englifh alfo travel a good deal, but in a 
very different manner. Nature feems to have 
conftituted the two nations to contradict each 
other in every thing. Among the Englifh, it 
is their nobility and people of fortune who tra- 
vel : the French nobility ftay at home. On 
the other hand, among the French the common 
people travel much, and the common people in 
England never travel at all. The difference is 
honourable to the latter : the French have al- 
ways fome views of intereft in their travelling ; 
but the Englifh never go to feek their fortune 
in foreign countries, unlefs in the way of com- 
merce, and with their pockets full of money. 

F 3 When 



102 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

When they travel, they go to fpend their fortune 
and not to live by their induftry; they are too 
proud to ftoop to fervile employments any where 
but at home. Hence it is that they learn more 
by travelling than the French, who have gene- 
rally fome other object in view. The Englifh, 
neverthelefs, have their prejudices as well as 
other nations ; they have even more than moft 
others : but thefe prejudices are lefs the effeft of 
ignorance than of obftinacy. The Englifh, 
carry about them the prepofleflions of an infolen/t 
pride, and the French thofeof the moft ridicu- 
lous vanity. 

As thofe people, who are the leaft polite, 
are generally the moft prudent, thofe, who tra- 
vel the leaft, ufually profit by it the moft.; 
becaufe, having made lefs progrefs in frivolous 
enquiries, and being, therefore, lefs taken up 
with objects of vain curiofity, their whole at- 
tention is directed to fuch as are of real utility, 
I hardly know any people, except the Spaniards, 
who travel in this manner. While a French- 
man bufies himfelf in running about among the 
artifts, an Englifhman laborioufly employs his 
time in defigning after the model of fome an- 
tique, and a German follicits the litrrati to fa- 
vour him with their names in his Album: the 
Spaniard ftudies in filence the government, the 
manners, and the police of the country, and is 
the only one of the four, who, on his return 
home, deduces, from what he hath*feen, any 
thing ufeful to his countrymen. 

The 



I 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 103 

The ancients travelled but little, read little, 
and wrote lefs ; and yet in the few writings they 
left us, we may fee plainly they made much bet- 
ter obfervations on each other, than we do at 
prefent. Without recurring to Homer, the on- 
ly poet, who had the art of tranfporting his rea- 
ders to the fcene of action he defcribes, we can- 
not deny Herodotus the honour of having given 
us a better description of manners, in his hiftory, 
although more in the way of narrative than re- 
flection, than any of cur modern hiftorians; 
who have taken fo much pains, nevertheless, 
to interlard their relations with portrait and cha- 
racters. Tacitus has defcribed the Germans 
of his time much better than any modern writer 
hath defcribed thofe of our's. It is indeed incon- 
teftible that fuch perfons as are verfed in ancient 
hiftory, are better acquainted with the Greeks, 
the Carthaginians, Romans, Gauls, andPerfians, 
than any people of thefe times are with their 
neighbouring nations. 

It muft be allowed, alfo, that the original 
charadterifticks of nations are daily obliterated, 
and for that reafon become more difficult to feife. 
In proportion as various tribes, families, and peo- 
ple mingle with each other, we find thofe na- 
tional differences dif ppear which were formerly 
fo perceptibly ftriking. In ancient times each 
nation was more confined within itfelf; the re- 
fpective people had lefs communication with 
foreigners, they travelled but fcldom, their inte- 
refts were lefs connected : there were then few of 

F 4 thofe 



J04 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

thofe regal bickerings, now called negociations; 
no ambafladours in ordinary, or conftant refi- 
dcnts at foreign courts : long voyages were very 
rare, and diftant commerce but little, and even 
that little was ufually carried on by the prince 
himfelf, who employed foreigners or fomedefpi- 
cablc people, without influence or authority. 

There is, at prefent, a 'much clofer and 
more frequent communication between Europe 
and Afia, than there was formerly between 
France and Spain. The parts of Europe itfelf 
were then lefs connected, than thofe of the 
whole earth are prefent. 

Add to this, that the ancients, imagining 
themfelves to have been, from their original, 
natives of the country they inhabited, had for- 
gotten thofe diftant ages when their anceftors 
frft eftablifhed themfelves, and had refided long 
enough on the fpot, to admit of thofe lafting 
impreffions, which the climate ever makes on a 
fettled people. Whereas, fince the Roman con- 
quefts, the frequent emigrations of the Barba- 
rians have mixed and confounded all things. 
The French are not now fuch tall, robuft, fair 
people, as they were formerly; the Greeks are 
no longer . thofe graceful figures, which feryed 
the purpofes of art as models of the human 
form \ even the modern Romans themfelves are 
as remarkably different from the ancient in per- 
fon, as in chara&er: the Perfians, who were 
originally Tartars, lofe daily their primitive de- 
formity, by their connections with the fair Cir- 

caffians; 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 105 

Cafiians; the Europeans are no longer com- 
pounded of Gauls, Germans, and Jberians; 
they are all Scythians, more or lefs degenerated 
in perfon and manners. 

Hence we fee the reafon, why, among the 
ancients, the feveral people inhabiting different 
countries were more diftinguifhable from one 
another, in their perfons and characters, than ^ 
they can be at prefent, when their unfettled 
manner of living doth not give natural caufes 
time to makelaiting impreflions; even the coun- 
try and climate themfelves are deprived of their 
peculiar influence, by the cutting down forefts, 
draining marfhes, and an uniformity of cultiva- 
tion, which every where prevails. 

Thefe reflections will probably make us notfo 
ready to turn Herodotus, Ctefias, and Pliny into 
ridicule, for having given, to the inhabitants of 
different countries, thofe original and diftin- 
guifhing chara&erifticks, which are no longer to 
be perceived. It is neceffary that we fhould fee 
the fame individuals, in order to know them for 
the fame people. It cannot be doubted, that, 
if we could behold at one view all the people 
who have exifled in the world, we fhould find 
more difference between the fame nation at dif- 
ferent periods, than we find at prefent between 
any two that are cotemporary. 

At the fame time that fuch obfervations be- 
come daily more difficult to make, they are 
more fupeficially and negligently made : this 
is another reafon for the little fuccefs of our re- 

F 5 fearches 



106 EMILfUSj OR, A NEW 

fearches into the natural hiftory of mankind. 
The improvement which is deduced from tra- 
velling depends on the motives, for undertaking 
it. When the motive is the confirmation of a 
philofophical fyftem, the traveller never fees any 
thing but what makes for his theory : when the 
motive is intereft, it engages the whole attention, 
of fuch as are actuated by it. Commerce, and 
the arts, which bring people together, hinder 
them from ftudying each other's difpofition and 
chara&er. On thefe occafions, if they know 
how to make the mod of one another, it is all 
they defire to know. 

It is certainly ufeful for a man to be acquaint- 
ed with all thofe places where he might choofe 
'to live, in order to fix on fuch as are the moft 
fuitable to him. If men were independent of 
each other, they would require to know no 
other country than one, in which they might 
fubfift. The favage, who ftands in need of 
no one's afliftance, and is a ftranger both to 
avarice and ambition, neither knows, nor de- 
fires to know any country but his own. If he 
be obliged to hunt abroad for fubfiftence, he 
carefully avoids fuch places as are infiabited by 
the human fpecies ; he is defirous only of meet- 
ing with brute animals, which afford him fuf- 
ficient nourifhment. But as for us, to whom 
a focial life is become neceflary, and who can- 
not live without preying upon our fellow-crea- 
tures, it is our intereft to frequent the moft po- 
pulous countries. This is the reafon why all 
5 the 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 107 

the world flock to Rome, Paris, and London. 
It is in capital cities that human facrifices are fo 
frequent, and fo eafily effected. 

It is faid, that we have philofophers, who 
travel for inftrucSion? This is a miftake, there 
are no Pythagoras's, noPlatos in our times; or, 
if there be, they are far enough diftant from 
us. Our modern philofophers never travel, but 
by order of the court; their expenfes are defray- 
ed, they are expedited and paid to vifit fome 
particular object, which, we may be certain, 
is never a moral one. Hence all their time and 
attention are devoted to the immediate object of 
their journey; they are too honeft to beftow' 
either on any thing elfe. And though in fome 
countries there may be found fome curious' 
perfons, who travel at their own expenfe, they 
never trouble themfclves about the ftudy of 
mankind, but rather take upon themfelves to in- 
ftrucl: them. They are noc fond of fcience, but 
of oftentation. HovV mould they learn to caft 
off {heir prejudices by travelling, when they tra-^ 
vel only todifplay them? 

There is a wide difference between travelling 
to take a view of a country, and that of ac- 
quiring a knowledge of the people. The former 
is the main bufinefs of the curious ; the latter is 
but a fecondary confideration. The philofopher 
however fliould judge otherwife. Children take 
notice of things, becaufe they are incapable of 
.making obfervations on men. A man fliould 
begin by obferving his fellow creatures, and 

F 6 then, 



108 EMIEIUS; OR* A NEW 

then, if he has time, he may take notice of in- 
animate obje&s. 

x To infer that travelling is ufelefs, becaufe wc 
know not how to profit by it, is certainly a 
wrong conclufion. But fuppofing its utility in 
general admitted, does it thence follow, that 
it is ufeful for all perfons indifcriminately ? 
So far from it, that, on the contrary, it is ex- 
pedient but for few : it is proper only for fuch 
as have firmnefs enough to hear the maxims of 
error, without being deluded ; and to fee the 
examples of vice, without being feduced. Tra- 
velling ferves to increafe the bent of our natural 
difpofitions, and to render us completely good 
or bad. When a man returns from his travels, 
he has generally received that form which he 
will retain as long as he lives ; and more per- 
fons return bad than good, becaufe there are 
fewer fet out with good difpofitions than with 
bad, Young people ill-taught, and ill-condu£t- 
ed, contract, by travelling," all the vices of the 
people they vifit, but none of their virtues : while 
thofe who poflefs a good natural difpofition, 
well cultivated, and who travel with a real 
defign of improving themfdves, return much 
better and wifer than they fet out. 

Travelling, when looked upon as a branch of 
education, ought to be fubjc&ed to fome rules. 
To travel merely for the fake of travelling, and 
running from one country to another, is to 
3<S the part of a vagabond. Again, to travel 
for improvement in general, is too vague and 

2 indeter,- 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 109 

indeterminate a fcheme. Inftru&ions which are 
not calculated to fome particular end are futile 
and ufelefs. I would endeavour to intereft a 
young man in the means of his improvement; 
which. intereft, properly directed, would of itfelf 
determine the nature of fuch improvement. 
- Now, after having taken a view of himfelf, 
with regard to his phyfical relations to other be- 
ings, and thofe moral connections, which unite 
him to his own fpecies, it remains for him to 
confider himfelf with regard to the focial rela- 
tions, in which he ftands to his fellow citizens. 
To this end he muft firft ftudy the nature of go- 
vernment in general; next, its different forms 
in various countries, and then the particular form 
of that government under which he was 
born, in order to know whether it be agreeable 
for him to continue to live under its protection; 
every man, when he comes of age and is ma- 
iler of himfelf, having a right, which nothing 
can abrogate, of renouncing the adventitious 
contract made at his birth with the community * 
and of quitting the country in which he is 
born and educated. It is from the refidence he 
makes there, after having arrived at years of 
difcrction, that he is fuppofed tacitly to confirm 
the engagements entered into by his anceftors. 
In entering on a ftate of manhood he acquires 
a right to renounce his native country, as well 
as to the poffeflion of his father's eftate. Ac- 
cording to the ftri&eft principles of natural right, 

every man remains free a in whatever country he 

may 



HO EMIItlUS; OR, A NEW 

may happen to be be born, unlefs he makes a vo- 
luntary fubmiflion to the laws, in order to ac- 
quire aright to protection. 

Ifhould probably addrefs Emilius, therefore, 
on this £u<bje& in the following terms : — " Hi- 
therto, my young friend, you have lived altoge- 
ther under my direction, not being in afituation 
to dire6t yourfelf : but now you approach that 
term of life, at which the laws, giving up into 
your own hands the difpofal of your fortune, 
constitute youalfo themafter of your perfon. You 
will now find yourfelf dependent on every 
thing in fociety; even on your own patrimony. 
You are defirous of fettling yourfelf y this defire 
is a laudable one, its object is a duty incumbent 
on every man : but before you refolve on mar- 
riage, it is requifite for you to come toarefolu- 
tion concerning the rank and ftation you mean 
to hold in life, and to provide for the fupport of 
yourfelf and family; for although this ought not 
to be made the chief object of your confiderations, 
it ought neverthekfs to be thought on, previous 
to your eftablifhment. Would you make your- 
felf dependent on men you defpifef Would 
you lay yourfelf under fuch circumftanccs as to 
be made conflantly fubfervient to the will of 
others, and be obliged, in order, to fecure your 
fubftance from the knavery of others, to become 
a knave yourfelf?'' 

Here I would difplay to him the feveral methods 
in which he might turn his fortune to advantage, 
by difpofing it in the way of commerce, in the 

purchafe 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. m 

purchafe of a place, or in the funds ) reprefent- 
ing to him the rifks he mult in either cafe run, 
and that his fituation in all would be precarious 
and dependent; his manners, fentiments, and 
conduct being neccfiarily under the influence of 
the examples and prepoffeffions of others. 

I fhould alfo lay before him the more po- 
lite and and fafhionable way of difpofing of his 
perfon and fortune, by entering into the 
fervice, or, in other words, of becoming a man 
of great confequence, by accepting the place of 
a hireling mutherer, and arming himfelf for the 
destruction of harmlefs people, who never offend- 
ed him. I mould fay to him — " There is no 
profeffion held- in greater eftimation than that of 
the fword; mankind entertaining the higher! 
ideas of thofe military heroes, who are good 
for nothing but to knock one another on the 
head. This profeffion alfo, inftead of enabling 
you to difpenfe with other refources, will only 
render them the more neceflary; it being part 
of the honour attached to a military life to 
ruin thofe who profefs it. Not that all arc 
actually ruined by it: it is infenfibly becoming 
the falhion for foldiers to make fortunes as well 
as other people : but I have no thoughts of your 
having any defire to imitate them in the me- 
thods they take to accomplilh that end. 

4C You are to know alfo, that, even in the 
army, courage opens not the way to wealth or 
honours, unlefs, indeed, it be that kind of cou- 
rage which is difplaycd before the ladies: on 



m EMILIUSJ OR, A NEW - 

the contrary, the moft fervile anil meaneft 
wretch in the corps is always in the faireft road 
to preferment. If you are a foldier in good 
earneft, you will be defpifed, hated, perhaps 
difmifled, or at leaft loaded with the mortifica- 
tion of feeing your comrades preferred over your 
head, for rifking your fortune in the trenches, 
while they were more fuccefsfully employed in 
pufhing their's at the toilette." 

It is, indeed, much to be doubted whether any 
of thefe employments will fuit the tafteof Emi- 
lius. He will probably reply, that he hath not 
forgotten the amufements of his youth ; that 
he hath not loft his arms; that he is (till healthy 
and robuft and is able to work. " Of what 
confequence to me (might he fay) are all the 
fine employments you have been fpeaking of, or 
the ridiculous prepoffeflions of mankind concern- 
ing them ? I know no greater honour than that 
of being beneficent and juft; no other happi- 
nefs than that of living independent of the 
world, with her I love, and of procuring me 
an appetite, and preferving my health by daily 
labour. None of thofe . embarraflments you 
have intimated in the leaft affect me. Settle me 
with Sophia in fome little farm, in an ob- 
fcure corner of the world, and I fhall poflefs all 
that I can wifh for. There fhall I live content- 
ed and happy, nor envy others the riches of 
Crcefus." 

" Yes, my friend, a beloved- wife and a few 
acres to himfelf are fufficient to conftitute the 

happinefs 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 113 

happinefs of a philofopher : but this defire, how- 
ever, moderate it may feem, is not fo eafy to be 
gratified; nor are fuch.pofleffions fo common as 
you may imagine. The moft difficult to be 
met with indeed you have already found ; I fhall 
only fpeak, therefore, of the other. 

" You would have the poffefuon of a few acres 
to yourfelf, my dear Emilius ! Where will you 
obtain fuch a grant ? In what corner of the 
world wilLyou be retired enough to fay, — ' Here 
am I mafter ; the lands around me are mine.' 
It is well known there are many places where 
men may acquire fortunes ; but who knows the 
place in which he may live without one ? Who 
can tell a man where he may live free and inde- 
pendent, without being under the neceffity of in- 
juring others, or of fubmitting to be injured 
himfelf? Do you imagine the country in which 
it is permittted a man to be truely honeft is fo 
eafy to find ? If there be any virtuous and cer- 
tain method of fubfifting without intrigue or de- 
pendency, 1 own it is that of living by one's 
labour, and cultivating one's own eftate: but 
where is that eftate on which a man may truely 
fay — c The land I cultivate is my own ?' Be 
fure, Emilius, before you make choice of this 
happy fpot, to find there that peace and felicity 
you feck. Take care that no arbitrary govern- 
ment, no perfecuting religion, no libertinifm of 
manners, arc likely to difturb your repoVe. Take 
care to fecure yourfelf from theimpofition of 
thofe exorbitant taxes, which will deprive you 

of 



114 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

of j:he fruits of your labour ; and from being 
expofed to thofe endlefs law-fuits, which muft in 
time rob you of your fubftance. Take fuch 
precautions that probity in your own behaviour 
may be fufficientto prevent your being ever un- 
der the mortifying neceflity of paying court to 
governors or their fubftitutes, judges, priefts, 
powerful neighbours, and knaves of every kind, 
ever ready to harrafs thofe who ncglecl to pay 
them refpecl:. ., Above all, take care to fecure 
yourfelf from Ijaving any altercation with the 
rich and great, always remembering that where- 
ever you are, their poffeffions may happen to 
border on the vineyard of Naboth. If you fhould 
be fo unfortunate as to have a courtier purchafe 
cr build an houfe near your cottage, take care to 
be allured he will not, under fome pretext, find 
means to ftrip you of your patrimony, to add to 
his own conveniences - y or that you may not fee, 
perhaps the next day, half your farm converted 
into fpacious highways. 

c< I have, my dear Emilius, more experience 
than you, and therefore fee farther into the dif- 
ficulty attending your project. It is neverthelefs 
a commendable, a virtuous one, and will in ef- 
fect make you happy : let us, therefore, fee about 
putting it into execution. To this end, I have 
one propofal to make. Let us devote the 
two years we are to employ in travelling, to the 
fearch of an afylum, in fome part of Europe, 
where you may live happy with your family, fe- 
cure from thofe dangdrs and inconveniencies I 

have 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 115 

have mentioned. If we fliould fucceed in our 
fearch, you will have found that abode of happi- 
nefs fo vainly fought after by others, and will have 
no reafon to regret the time and pains you have 
taken. On the other hand, if we fhould fail 
of making fo defireable a difcovery, you will be 
cured of hunting after a chimera ; and will con- 
fole yourfelf under an inevitable misfortune, by 
fubmitting to the law of neceflity." 

I know not whether any of my readers per- 
ceive how far the propofed fearch may carry us $ 
this, however, I am certain of, that, if Emilius 
does not return from his travels, begun and con- 
tinued with this view, well verfed in the nature 
of government, in manners,and in political max- 
ims of every kind, either he muft have a very 
fmall {hare of underftanding, or I of judgement. 

The fcience of politicks is as yet in its infancy, 
or rather it is ftill in its birth, and, it may be 
prefumed, will never make its way into the 
world, .Grotlus, the greateft mafter among all 
thofe who have treated of the rights of civil po- 
lity, is but a mere child ; and, what is ftill worfe, 
a difingenuous one. When I hear this writer 
extolled to the fkies, and Hobbes loaded with 
execrations, I fee in what manner even fenfible 
men read and comprehend thefe two authors. 
The truth is, the principles of both are exactly 
alike; and they differ only in the manner in 
which they are expreffed. Thefe writers, indeed, 
differ alfo in their method of difcuffion ; Hobbes 
founding bis arguments on the fophifmsof phi- 

lofophers, 



Il6 EMILIUSj OR, A NEW 

lofophers, and Grotius on the chimeras of the 
poets : in every thing elfe they are exactly alike. 

The only*modern writer, capable of reducing 
politics to a fcience, was the celebrated Montef- 
quieu: but he was far from treating ftri&ly of 
the principles of civil polity ; contenting himfelf 
with fubftituting in the room of them, thofe po- 
fitive laws which government hath already efta- 
blifhed. Nothing, however, can be more dif- 
ferent than the ftudy of one and of the other. 

Whoever would form a right judgement, ne- 
verthelefs, of the prefent ftate of government, is 
obliged to unite both : it is requifite to know 
what ought to be, to judge of what is. But the 
greateft difficulty attending thedifcuffion of thefe 
important matters, is to intereft private perfons 
in the ftudy of them, and to give a fatisfa&ory 
anfwer to thefe queftions ; — " What is ittome?" 
or, "What fignifies what I think of them?" 
We have provided Emilius, however, with an 
anfwer to both thefe queftions, 

Thefecond difficulty arifes from the prejudices 
of infancy, the maxims in which we are edu- 
cated, and, above all, from the partiality of au- 
thors; who, while they are conftantly expatiat- 
ing on the truth, about which they give them- 
felves little real concern, are intent only on 
their own intereft, of which they fay nothing. 
Now the people have it not in their power to be- 
llow profefforflbips, places, and penfions; judge, 
then, if the learned are very affiduous to defend 
the rights of mankind in general. I have taken 

fuch 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. ny 

fuch meafures, however, that this difficulty, alfo 
hath no force with Emilius. At prefent he hard- 
ly knows what government is ; the only point 
of confequence to him is to difcover that which 
may be beft for himfelf. He hath no intention to 
become an author ; and though he ihould, he would 
not employ his talents to pay court to fovereigns, 
but to eftablim the rights and privileges of hu- 
manity. 

There remains yet *& a thirdjdifficulty, which, 
as it is more fpecious than folid, I fhall neither 
obviate nor propofe: let it fuffice to fay, if 
does not check my zeal; as I am well affured 
that, in refearches of this kind, great talents are 
not fo neceffary as a fincere regard for juftice, 
and a real love for truth. If matters of govern- 
ment, then, are in any cafe likely to be treated 
with fincerity, it is in the prefent. 

Before we begin, however, to make our ob- 
fervations, it is neceffary to lay down thofe rules 
by which they are made ; it is neceffary to fix 
on a fcale, by which to eftimate the feveral 
meafures we take. Our firft principles of go- 
vernment, or politic law, conftitute this fcale; 
and the eftabliflicd laws of different countries are 
the admeafurements to which it is applied. 

The elements we fhall make choice of will 
be clear, fimplc, and immediately deducible 
from the nature of things. They will confift 
of queftions to be difcuffed between us, and will 
be converted into principles, only when they are 

fatisfa&orily refolvcd. 

Thus, 



fig EMILIUS; OH, A NEW 

Thus, for example, fetting out from a ftate 
of nature, wefhall firft examine whether men 
are born flaves or free, focial or independent $ 
whether they are united by confent or com- 
pulfion; or whether that force which unites them 
can form any permanent obligation by which 
that prior force is binding, even when it is 
fupplanted by a former one: in other words, 
whether, fince the empire of Nimrod, who, it 
is faid, was the firft ruler, the power of fuc- 
ceeding fovereigns hath nor been the effedt of 
injufticeandufurpation, there being no legiti* 
mate kings but the defcendants.of the faid Nim- 
rod, his heirs and aligns? or whether, the au- 
thority of the firft ruler ceafihg, the fucceeding 
power did not become binding in its turn, and 
annul the obligations of the former ; fo that it 
is the duty of mankind to obey the laws wheri 
compelled to it, and that it is no longer a duty, 
when they can make head again ft the power 
impofing them ? If the latter be the cafe, the 
obligations we are under to refpect the laws had 
but little influence to the power enforcing their 
obfervance, and is little better than a play upon 
words. 

We fhall examine whether it may not be faid, 
that every difeafe comes from God, and whe- 
ther, taking this for granted 5 it be a crime to 
call in the phyfician ? 

We {hall, in the fame manner, enquire al fo 
whether a man is obliged in confcience to give 
a highwayman his purfe, when he might con* 

ceal 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 119 

ceal it from him 5 for, after all, the piftol which 
the robber prefents to his heart, lays him under 
the obligation exacted by fuperior force. 

It will be worth enquiry farther, whether pow* 
er, made ufe of in a political fenfe, means any- 
more than a legal authority, fubfervient of 
courfe to the laws on which it depends ? 

Again, fuppofingthe obligations enjoined by 
fuch fuperior force invalid, and that we admit 
the right of nature, or paternal authority, as the 
firft principle of fociety, we muft, in this cafe, 
inveftigate the bounds of that authority, as pre-* 
fcribed by nature ; and enquire whether it has 
any other foundation than the good of the child, 
its weaknefs^ arid that natural affe&ion which a 
parent entertains for his offspring ? whether this 
being the cafe, when the child grows up, and 
acquires ftrength and difcretion, he does not be- 
come the natural judge of what is conducive to 
his own prefervation ; and, of courfe, his own 
mafter, independent of every other man, and 
even of his own father ? For it is to be remark- 
ed, that we may be the more certain of a child's 
loving himfelf, than of a father's love for his 
child. 

We (hall next proceed to examine, whether 
when a father dies, his younger children are 
bound to obey the elder, or any other perfon 
who may not have for them the natural attach- 
ment of a parent; and whether there be, from ge- 
neration to generation, a her.d of a family, to 
which every other perfon in it owes obedience? 

In 



1 



120 EMILIUSJ OR, A NEW 

In which cafe, we (hall enquire how the authority 
of this head came to be divided, and by what 
right there came to be any morethan one fo- 
vereign over the whole race of mankind ? 

On the fuppofition, that focieties were formed 
by, choice we fhall diftinguifh between matter 
of right and of fact ; and fhall afk, whether, by 
mankind having thus at firlt fubmittedthemfelves 
to their brothers, uncles, or other relations, not 
becaufe they were compelled to it, but out of 
choice, their fubmiflion does not ftill remain 
free and voluntary ? 

Paffing hence to the right affumed over flaves, 
we fhall enquire, whether it be in the power of 
any man legally to alienate himfelf to ano- 
ther, without condition or referve?* That is to 
fay, whether he can renounce his natural right to 
his own perfon, life, and underftanding, ceafing, 
as it were, toexift even before his death $ when 
nature hath fo directly charged him with the care 
of his own prefervation, and both reafon and 
confcience dictate what he ought to do, and from 
what he ought to abftain ? 

Again, fuppofing there be any reflection or 
referve in the term of flavery, we fhall enter 
into a difcuflion, whether thofe terms do not 
form a real contract, in regard to which the 
contracting parties, having no common umpire* 
remain their own judges refpecting «4:he con- 
ditions of the contract, and of courfe are at liberty 
to break them, whenever they think themfelves 
aggrieved? And, if a flave cannot give himfelf 

up 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. j 2 l 

Up without referve to his mailer, how tan a 
whole people do the like with refpe& to their 
chief? If a (lave, alfo, remains the judge of his 
mailer's fulfilling his contrail, furely a nation 
muft be equally fo, with regard to the behaviour 
of their king 

Being thus reduced to return to our firft prin- 
ciples, and to confider the meaning of that col- 
le&iveterm, a people, we are led to enquire, 
whether, in order to eftablifh its propriety, there 
muft not have been fome contract, a tacit one 
at lead, prior to that here fuppofed ? 

Asa people muft have exifted as fuch, before 
they made choice of a king, by what means were 
they conjftituted a people, unlefs by focial con- 
trad ? A focial contrail is, therefore, the bafis of 
civil fociety; and it is in the very nature of this 
o£l we muft feek that of the fociety it conftitutes. 

We (hall now enquire into the tenour of this 
contrail, and fee if it does not run nearly in the 
following terms:— 4 ? The contracting parties do 
** mutually agree to put their lives and for- 
** tunes, as well as their perfons and intcreft, 
C4 under the fupreme direction of the general 
«« voice; receiving each member into their body, 
*' as apart infeparable from the whole." 

This fuppofed : in order to define the terms 
We (hall (land in need of to our farther enquiry, 
we (hall remark, that this a& of aflbciation pro- 
duces a moral and collective body, compofed of 
as many members as there are voices in the 
aflembly. This publick body takes, in general, 

Vol. IV, G the 



1*1 EMILIUS; OR, A Nfew 

the name of the body politick : it is called alfobjf 
the members of which it is compofed, ajtate, 
when it is paffive; afovereignty, when it is aftive; 
and fimply a power , when it is compared with 
other ftates ; with regard to the members them- 
felves, * they take the name of people collectively, 
and are called citizens feverally, as being mem- 
bers of the city 9 or partakers of the fovereigtt 
authority; and fubjecls, as being fubje&ed alfo 
to the fame authority. 

We fhall remark, that this acT: of aflbciation 
includes a reciprocal engagement between the 
publick body and its particular members; and 
that each individual, by thus making a con- 
tract, if I may fo fay, with himfelf, is laid 
under a two-fold engagement; viz. as a mem* 
ber of the fovereignty, towards his fellow- 
citizens, and as a member of the ftate, towards 
the fupreme head. We fhall obferve further, 
that the parties being bound by no other engage- 
ments than thofe they have entered into with 
themfelves, thofe publick refolutions which are 
obligatory on the fubjecl: refpe&ing the fovereigo. 
authority, becaufeof the two- fold engagement 
he has formed, are not equally obligatory on the 
ftate, with refpecT>to itfelf. Hence we fee there 
is not, nor can tnere be any other fundamental 
law of fociety, properly fpeaking, than focial 
compact. Not that it muft be here inferred, 
that the body politick cannot enter into engage- 
ments towards other bodies of the fame kind : for, 

with 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 123 
With regard to thefe, it is a Ample and individual 
objedt. 

The two contracting parties, however, to wit, 
the individual and the publick, having no com- 
mon arbiter of their differences, we muft enquire 
whether they are therefore at liberty to break the 
contract when they pleafe; that is, to renounce 
the obligation of it as foon as they think them- 
felves aggrieved ? To refolve this queftion, it is 
to beobferved, that, according to the fecial corn- 
pad, as the fovereign power cannot act other- 
wife than agreeably to the general voice, its ac- 
tions are directed to general and publick objects; 
whence it follows, that particular perfons can- 
not be directly aggrieved by that power, unlefs 
they are all fo; which is impofiible, becaufe in 
this the community would be defirous of its own 
deft ruction. Thus the focial contract requires no 
other guarantee than the publick ;' becaufe indi- 
viduals only can be guilty of violating it; in 
which cafe they are not fct free from their engage- 
ments, butare puni&ed for fuch violation of them. 
To determine all fuch queftions as thefe, we 
. fhall take care to remember, that the focial corn- 
pad is of a very peculiar nature; in that the 
people enter thereby into a contract only with 
themfelvcs; that is to fay, the people collective- 
ly, in quality of fovereign, with the people feve- 
rally and individually, as fubjects. It is in this 
circumftance of the compact, that confifts all 
the artifice of the great political machine of 

government; it is this which renders thofeen- 

G 2 gagements 



124 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

gagements rational, fafe and legal, which would 
©therwife be abfurd, tyrannical, and fubje& to 
the moit enormous abufes. 

Individuals being fubjeft only to the fove- 
reign authority, and this being nothing more 
than the general voice, we may fee hence how 
"every man, in paying obedience to it, is obe* 
dient only to himfelf, and by what means he en- 
joys a greater liberty under the influence of a 
focial compact than he would have done in & 
ftateof nature. 

After having thus made the com pari fon be- 
tween natural and civil liberty, in regard to per- 
fons, we (hall make the like comparifon, in re- 
gard to things, between the right of property and 
that of fovereignty, between the eftates of parti- 
culars and the territory of the ftate. If the fove- 
reign authority be founded on a right of proper- 
ty, fuch right ftould certainly be held in the 
higheft refpe&: it is inviolable and facred'fo 
long as it remains that of the individual; but 
when private property comes to be con fide red as 
only a part of the publick, it is fubjected to the 
difpofal of the general voice, which may alienate, 
or even annihilate it. Thus the fupreme autho- 
rity huth no right to touch the property of any 
partial number of individuals ; but it may legally 
poflfefs itfelf of the property of all ; as was done 
at Sparta in the time of Lycurgus; whereas the 
abolition of debts, as practifed by Solon, was 
contrary to the principles of natural juftice. 

3 As 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION, 125 

As the publick voice only is obligatory on the 
fobjeft, we {hall endeavour to trace the means 
whereby it may with certainty be known ; we 
ft&all enquire into the nature and charadteriftics 
of what is termed law. This fubje& is quite 
new 5 the term, law, having as yet never been 
properly defined. 

No fooner do a people give power and prefe- 
rence to one or more individuals among them, 
than they become divided; there arifes, between 
the party thus formed and the whole, a di func- 
tion, which makes them two feparate obje&s;, 
the one a part of the whole, and the other that 
whole, wanting the fubftra&ed part. But the 
whole wanting a part, is not the whole. While 
this diftin&ion therefore fubfifts, there exifts no 
longer a whole, but only two unequal parts. 

On the contrary, when the whole body of a, 
people decree concerning the whole, they prefer 
only themfelves; and if any diftin&ion is thus 
formed at all, it is only fuch a one as arifes from 
an entire object beheld in one point of view, a*:d 
the fame entire objeft beheld in another, without 
any partial divifion. In fuch a cafe, therefore, 
the objedt fubje£tcd to the decree is general, as 
well as the object iffuing fuch decrees. We 
fhall examine whether there be any other kind 
of a& in community which may bear the name 
of law. 

If the decrees of the fupreme power are laws,. 
and laws can have no object but what is gener.il 
and relative equally to all the members of a irate,. 

G 3 it 



126 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

it follows that fuch fupreme power can decree 
nothing concerning individuals*, as it is necef- 
fary, however, to the prefervation of the ftate, 
that it fhould decide in particular cafes, we fhall 
fee by what means this is affefted. 

The afts of the fupreme power being no 
other than general afts, , or laws ; to thefe muft 
fucceed particular afts, framed to put fuch 
laws in execution, and muft accordingly be 
directed to particular objects. Thus the aft by 
which the fupreme power direfts a chief to be 
$hofen, is a law; but the aft by which that chief 
is chofen in obedience to that law, is only an aft 
of government. And hence arifes a third rela- 
tion, under which the people collcftivcly may 
■ be confidered ; to wit, as the magiftracy, de- 
fined to execute thofe laws which they made 
in quality of fovereign. 

We fhall enquire whether it be poffible for the 
people to deprive themfelves of that right of fo- 
vereignty, which they collectively poflefs, in or- 
dc* to inyeft one man or more with that prero- 
gative ? For the aft of election not being a law, 
and the people themfelves not poffeffing that right 
in performing fuch aft, it is not to be conceived 
they can transfer a right which they do not them- 
felves poflefs. 

The effence of fovereignty confiding in the 
general voice of the people, it is alfo as difficult 
to be conceived, that the difpofition of an indi- 
vidual fhould always be conformable to that of 
the publick. On the contrary, it is rather to 

be 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 127 

be prefumed it will be often contradi&ory; for 
private intereft tends always to partiality, and 
the publick good to the reverfe : and though it 
were even poflible to reconcile thefe, its not 
being abfojutely neceflary and permanent as the 
nature of things, is fufneient to {how that no 
right of fovereignty can be founded thereon. 

We (hall endeavour to determine whether the 
chiefs of a people, under whatever title they 
pafs, can,, without violating the focial compact, 
be ever any thing more than fervants appointed 
to execute the laws ?• Whether thofe chiefs 
ought not to give an account of their aJminiftra- 
tion, and whether they are not themfelves fub- 
jeft to thofe laws which they are charged to fee 
dulyobferved? 

If the people cannot, however, entirely alie- 
nate their fupreme prerogative, may they not 
difpofeof it for a feafonr If they cannot give 
themfelves a mafter, may they not make choice 
of a reprefentative ? Thefe queftions are impor- 
tant, and merit a ferious difcuffion. 

If the people can neither make choice of a fo- 
vereign nor reprefentative, we (hall then enquire 
in what manner they can fupport the legiflative 
authority in themfeves; whether their laws 
fhould be numerous 5 whether they fhould be 
frequently altered; and whether it be eafy for a 
great nation to be its own legiflator? Whether 
the Romans were not a great people ; and whe- 
ther it be good for mankind in general, that a 
great people fhould exift ? 

G 4 It 



I2g EMILIUS ; OK, A NEW 

It follows, from the preceding confederations, 
that in e^very ftate there exifts an intermediate 
body between the fubjeft and the fovereignj 
which body being compofed of one or more 
members, is charged with the publick admini- 
ilration, the execution of the laws, and the con- 
fervation of civil and political liberty. 

The members of this body are called magif- 
trates or kings, that is to fay, governours. Now, 
if we confider the a&ion of the whole body of 
fociety, as operating on itfelf, in the relation of 
the whole to the whole, or as the fovereign to 
the Jlate, this relation may be faid to extend be* 
tween two extremes, of which the government ig 
the mean proportional. The magi ftf ate receives 
from the fovereign thofe orders which he del;> 
gates to the people; the intereft and authority 
of his office being proportional to the intereft 
and authority of the citizens as fubjefts, on on« 
fide, and as fovereigns on the other. It is impof- 
fible to vary thefe three terms, without deftroying 
their due influence and proportion. If, for 
inftance, the fupreme power would govern,, or 
the magiftracy make laws, or the fubject refute 
to obey them, diforder and confufion would 
always enfuc, the ftate would be difiolv^d, and 
defpotifm or anarchy fucceed. 

Let us fuppofe a ftate compofed of ten thou- 
sand citizens. Thofe, as fovereign, compofing 
a ftate, muft be confidered collectively, and in a 
body : but every individual, as a fubje&, hath a * 
Separate and independent exiftence. Thus the 

fovereign 



STSttM OP EDUCATION. n$ 

Ibvereign is to the fubject as ten thoufand to one;, 
that it is to fay, every member of that ftate pof- 
feffes only the ten thousandth part of that fu~ 
preme authority, to which he is altogether and 
entirely fubje&ed. Again, if the ftate confided- 
of an hundred thoufand people, the fubmiftioiv 
of the fubjedfc would be ftill the fame to thelaws,; 
though his intereft or fuffrage in the legislature 
would be reduced to an hundred -thou fandth part, 
viz. a tenth part lefs than before. Thus ther 
fubjecSt, always remaining an integer, the rela-* 
tion between him and the fu preme power 
increafes, in proportion to the number of citi- 
zens : and hence it follows, that as the ftate* is 
augmented, liberty is diminished. 

Now, the lefs proportion the wilt of indivi-r 
duals bears to the general will of the ftate; that- 
is to fay, the lefs the influence of manners, in 
proportion to that of the laws, the more ought 
die executive force to be augmented. On the 
Other hand, the gre"atnefs of a ftate giving to 
thofe, in whom the publick authority repofed, 
more temptations and opportunies of abufing 
it, the more power a government is poflefTed,of 
to reftrain the people, the more ought the legis- 
lature to have it in its power to reftrain the- 
government. 

It follows from this two- fold relation, that 
the proportion fubfifting between the legisla- 
ture, the magiftracy, and the people, is not a 
chimerical idea, but the natural confequence of 
fecial eftablifhment. It follows, alfo, that one 

G 5 ef 



130 EMILIUS; OR, A NES*' 

ofthefe extremes, that is, the people, being a 
fixed term, every time this two fold ratio is in- 
creafed or diminifhed, the fimple one increafes 
and diminifhes in its turn ; which could not hap- 
pen, unlefs the mean term alfo changed likewife* 
Hence we may deduce further the following 
conclufion, that there is no fuch thing in the 
world as a fimple and abfoluteconftitution of go- 
vernment j but that there muft be as many dif- 
ferent governments as there are ftates of different 
magnitudes. 

If the more numerous a people are, the lefs- 
proportion the influence of their manners bears to 
the laws, we fhall.go on to examine whether, 
by an obvious analogy, we may not affirm alfo 
that the more numerous the magiftracy, the more 
feeble is the government ? 

To illuftrate this maxim, we (hall diftinguifh 
between three interefts effentially different, in 
the perfon of each magiftrate. In the firft place, 
there is the private intereft of the individual, al- 
ways tending to his own particular advantage; 
in the fecond, there is the common intereft of 
the magiftracy, tending entirely to the advantage 
of* the government : this may be called the in- 
tereft of the whole body of governors, and is ge- 
neral with refpect to the government itfelf, and 
particular with regard to the ftate, of which the 
government is a part. Again, in the third place, 
there is the intereft of the people colle&ively, or 
of the fupreme power of the legiflature; which, 
. is general, as well with regard to the ftate, con- 

fidered 



v 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 131 
fidered as a whole, as with refpcdtto the govern- 
ment, confidered as a part of that whole. In a 
perfect fyftem of polity, the intereft of the indi- 
vidual fhould be almoft null, that of the magis- 
tracy very confined, and of courfe the general in- 
tereft will govern above all others. Whereas it 
is obferveable, on the contrary, that, according 
to the order of nature, thefe different interefts 
become more active, in proportion as they are 
blended together. The general intereft is leaft af- 
feding ; that of the governours bears the fecond 
rank, and that of the individual is the moft 
powerful of all : fo that each confiders, firft his 
own private advantage, next that of the magis- 
trate, and thirdly, that of the ftate : a gradation 
diredly oppofite to that which the order of Society 
requires. 

This being granted, let us fuppofe the admi- 
niftration of government placed in the hands of 
one man. Here we fhould fee the interefts of the 
magiftracy, and of the individual completely 
united, andof courfe as perfeel as pojlible. Now, 
as it is on this perfection that the exertion of power 
depends; and as the abfolute force of the govern- 
ment being that of the people, never varies, it 
follows, that the moft active of all governments 
is the defpotick or monarchical. 

On the contrary, unite the executive to the 
legiflative power ; make the magiftracy the Su- 
preme head, and the citizens magistrates ; in this 
cafe, the interefts of the governours being con- 
founded with the general one of the ftate, hath 

G 6 no 



* 3 2 EMILIUS; OR, AME# 

no morea&ivity than the latter, and leaves that 
of the individual to exert itfelf in all its force*' 
Thus the adminiftration, though ftill poflefled of 
the fame abfolute force, will poffefs the fmalleft 
poiEble degree of a&ivity. 

Thefe maxims are inconteftible, and ate con- 
firmed by other confiderations. It is obfervable, 
for example, that the magiftrates are more 
aftive in their fun&ions than the private ci- ' 
tizen in hisj fo that it is clear the intereft of 
the individual is more concerned, A magiftrate 
is almoft always charged with the execution ef 
fome particular part of government; whereas a 
citizen, confidered as an individual/is employed 
in no aci of fovereignty. Add to this, that the 
more a ftate incrcafes, the more is its real force 
augmented, although it is augmented in the exa& 
proportion of that increafe; but while the ftate 
remains the fame, it is in vain to increafe the 
number of magiftrates : the government will ac- 
quire no additional power by fuch increafe, as 
government is only the repository of the power 
of the ftate, which is fuppofed the fame. Thus 
by a plurality of magiftrates, the activity of go- 
vernment is diminiflied, without its force being- 
augmented. 

After having difcovered that government grows 
remifs and unwieldy, in proportion as the num- 
ber of magiftrates is increafed ; and that the more 
numerou s a people grow,the more powerful fhould 
be the hands of government to reftrain them, we 
fcouldconclude,that the relation in which the ma- 
giftrates 



rYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 133 

giftrates ftand to government, fhould bear an in- 
yerfe proportion to that of the fubjecfts to the le- 
giflature; that is to fay, the more extenfive a 
ftate grows, the more limited fhould be its go- 
vernment; fo that the number of its magiftrates 
fhould dimiriifh in proportion N to the augmen- 
tation of its people. 

In order to diftinguifli this variety of formsun- 
der more precife denominations, we fhall remark, 
in the firft place, that the fupreme power may 
commit the charge of government to the whole 
body of the people, or to the majority of them; 
fo that there may be more magiftrates than private 
citizens. Such a form of government is called 
a democracy. Again, it may confine that charge 
to fewer hands ; fo that there may be more citi- 
zens than magiftrates : this form bears the name 
of an ariftocracy: and, laftly, it may lodge the 
whole adminiftrationof government in the hands 
of a fole magiftrate. This third form is the moflr 
common, and is called the monarchical or regal 
form of government. 

We fhall readily obferve that all thefe forms* 
and particularly the two firft, are capable of be- 
ing more or lefs perfect, being fufceptible, in this 
refpeft, of great latitude. For a democracy may 
go fo far as to include a whole people, or may 
reftrain itfelf only to the half. An ariftocracy, 
alfo, maybe limited from half the people inde- 
terminately, toanylcfs number! and even mo- 
narchy itfelf is fometimes divided, either between 
father and fon, between brothers, or otherwife. 

Sparta 



134 EMILIUSJ OR, A NEW £ 

Sparta had conftantly two kings, and the Romans 
had once eight emperours at a time, without the 
Roman empire being in itfelf divided. There is. 
a certain point between each form of government, 
at which it begins to be confounded with that on 
which it borders : thus, under three fpecifick de- 
nominations, government is capable of affuming 
as many forms as there are citizens in the ftate. 

Again, each of thefe governments being ca- 
pable of fub-divifion, and of admitting in dif- 
ferent' parts different modes of adminiftration, 
there may refult from the combination of thefe 
three, a multiplicity of mixed forms, even to 
an endlefs variety. 

The world have long difputed about the beft 
form of government, without having conlidered 
that each form may be the beft in fome circum- 
ftances, and the worft in others. For our part, 
we muft conclude, that in all ftates the num- 
ber of magiftrates * ought to be inverfely, as that 
of citizens, the democratick form of government 
is, generally fpeaking, beft for fmall ftates ; the 
ariftocratick for thofe of moderate extent, and 
the monarchical for fuch as are very populous and 
extenfive. 

It is by the clue of thefe refearches that we 
fhall at length arrive at the knowledge of the 
duties and prerogatives of citizens; and whether 
it be poffible to feparate the one from the other j to 

know 

• It will be remembered, that I fpeak here only of 
fupreme magiltrates, or the rulers of a people; others 
being only local fubftitutes. . 



IY9TEM OF EDUCATION. 135 

know what is the precife meaning of the term 
.our country y and. by what means a man may know 
Vhether he can boaft a country or no ? 

After having thus taken a view of the feveral 
fpecies of civil fociety a-part, we fhall proceed 
to compare them with each other in order to ob- 
serve their difference and relations : the v |jreat 
with the little; the ftrong with the weak; reci- 
procally attacking, defending, and deftroying 
each other; while, amidft the conflict of this 
continual action and re-a£Hon, they involve 
mankind in greater mifery than they would have 
experienced in preferving their original liberty. 
We fiiall examine, therefore, whether focial 
inftitutions have done too much or too little; 
whether individuals, in being fubjeQed to laws 
of fociety, while fuch focieties preferve their 
natural independence among each other, are not 
thereby expofed to the evils both of nature and 
fociety, without reaping the advantages of either; 
and whether it would not be better that there were 
no civil fociety in the world, than that there fhould 
be feveral ? Is not this that mixed ftate of nature 
and fociety which partakes of both, and is really 
neither; per quern neutrum licet ^ nee tanquam in 
hello paratum effe, nee tanquam in pacefecurum ? Is 
not this that partial and im per fed aflbciation, 
which is productive of tyranny at home, and war 
from abroad ? and are not war and tyranny the 
greateft evils to which humanity is fubjeft? 

We (hall come, laftly, to take a view of thofe 
remedies, which are provided againft thefc evils; 

fuch 



T36 tfwriLnrsj or, a ne\** 

fuch are thofe of alliances and confederacies;, 
which, leaving every ftate its own mafter at 
home, arms it againft every unjuft aggreflbr 
from abroad. We (hall enquire by what means 
national confederacies may be formed ; by what 
mwis they may be rendered durable, and how 
fiMpe prerogative of entering into fuch confe- 
deracies may be extended without encroaching 
#n that of favereigrity ? 

The Abbe de St. Pierre formed a fcheme for 
uniting all the ftates of Europe in a general and 
perpetual peace. It is yet to be doubled, fup- 
pofing fuch a fcheme practicable, and actually 
entered into, whether the peace would be of long 
duration. Thefe enquiries lead us, however to 
difcufs all thofe principal queftions, whichremain 
to complete our refearches into the nature and 
principles of politick law. J hetranfition to thofe 
of war and peace is hence readily effected, and- 
wefhall enquire, accordingly, why Grotius and 
others have only laid down thofe which are falfe. 

In the midft of thefe arguments, however, I 
(hould not be furprifed if the good fenfe of Emi- 
lius fhould induce him to interrupt me with the 
following remark: — "One would think, Sir, 
you was building an edifice with materials of 
timber and ftone, and not with the inconftant 
difpofitions of mankind, you <ire fo exadl in mo- 
delling every part by rule " — " That is true, my 
friend ; but you are to remember, that natural 
right does not give way to the pafiions of man- 
kind, and that wc are firft of all to fettle the 

true 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. r# 

true principles of politick law. Now our foun- 
dation is laid, we will examine, if yoji pleafe, 
what a fuperftru&ure men have built on it, and 
you will find they have made fine work indeed !" 

I make Emilius now read his Telemachus, ftill 
purfuing our travels : we go in fearch of the hap- 
py Salentum and the good Idomeneus, made wife 
by misfortune. In our way, we find many a 
Protefilaus, and not one Philocles. But we (hall 
leave the various incidents of our travels to the 
reader's imagination. As Emili us is no monarch, 
and I have no pretenfions to divinity, we do not; 
reproach ourfelves that we cannot pretend to rival 
Telemachus and Mentor in the good they do to 
mankind: nobody knows better th <-n we how to 
maintain our characters and ftation, and nobody 
is lefs anxious after thofe which arc fuperior^ 
We know that the fame injunctions arc laid on 
all mankind ; whoever is iincerely in love with 
virtue, and docs all the good in his power, hath, 
difcharged his duty". We know that the charac* 
ters of Mentor and Telemachus are fabulous. 

tmilius doth not travel like a gentleman that; 
hath nothing to do; but docs mere good than if 
he were a prince. If we were kings, we could 
npt be mor£ benevolent than we are; and were 
*we even benevolent kings, we might be unde- 
signedly thecaufeof athoufand real evils for one 
apparent good. If we were, kings and philofo- 
phers the firft good adtion we lhould perform* 
both for ourfelves and others, would be to abdi- 
cate 



»3& EMILIUS; OR, A NEW* 

cate our throne, and to become private men at 
we are. 

• I have already given the reafons why travel- 
ling is in general fo ufelefs. It is rendered, 
however, ftill more fo, to young perfons, by 
the manner in which it is profecuted. Gover- 
JioMrs, ufually more defirous of amufing than in- 
ftru&ing their pupils, lead them about from 
city to city, from palace to palace, and from one 
affembly to another : or, if they are fcholars or 
virtuofi, they employ their difciples in running 
about to vifit libraries, galleries, and cabinets, in 
collecting antiquities, and copying inscriptions. 
In every place they come to, they trouble them- 
felves only about the manner of preceding ages, 
as different from the prefent as if they were thofe 
of another country; fo that after having, at a 
great expenfe, made the tour of Europe, they 
return without having made any observations that 
aie interefting, or having learned any thing 
that may be ufeful. 

All capital cities bear a great refemblance to 
each other, the people herding together, and 
forming a ftrange confufion of manners : fuch 
are not the places, therefore, in which to ftudy 
the chara&erifticks of nations. Paris and Lon- 
don are, in my eye, but as one city; their inha- 
tants, indeed, differ a little in their prejudices, 
but the citizens of one have as many as thofe of 
the other ; and all their practicable maxims are 
the fame. It is well known what kind of per- 
fons are ever about a court; what kind of man- 
ners 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 139 

ners the concourfe of people, and the inequality of 
fortunes, muft every where produce. You need 
but tell me of a city that contains two hundred 
thoufand fouls, and I can form an exact idea how 
they live there. As for any thing I could gain 
the knowledge of farther, by being on thefpot, 
it is not worth the pains of travelling for it. 

. To ftudy the genius and manners of a nation, 
wefliould haverefource to the feveral provinces 
at a diftance from the metropolis, where there is 
lefs buftle, fewer ftrangers, and where the inha- 
bitants do not fhift about or experience fuch 
frequent changes of fortune. Take a curfory 
view of the capital, as you pafs through it; but 
to make your obfervations on the nation, you 
•muft traverfe the different parts of the country. 
The Parifians are not Frenchmen; thefe are to 
. be met with in Touraine : the inhabitants of the 
•feveral counties in England are more truely Eng- 
lifhmen than the citizens of London ; and the 
Spaniards more charafteriftical I y brave and proud 
in Galicia than at Madrid. It is at a diftance 
from the metropolis, that the inhabitants bear 
the diftinguifhing marks of the national cha- 
racter, and difplay themfelves without mixture: 
it is there the good or ill efftcls of government 
are beft feen; as at the end of the greateft radiu* 
the admeafurement of the angle is the moft exact. 

The neceflary influence of manners on govern- 
ment, is fo welldifplayedin Montefquieu's trea- 
tife on the Spirit of Laws, thatwc cannot do bet- 
ter than to recur to that work, for a juft know- 
ledge 



A- 



140 EMILIUS; OR, A NEH 

ledge of thisfubjedt. There are, however, tw* 
rules, Very fimple and obvious; by which we 
may form a judgement of the relative merit of g<*« 
vernment in general. The one is population* 
In every country, where the number of people 
decreafes, the ftate is tending to ruin : on the 
contrary, where a nation grows populous, not- 
withftandmg it may be ftill poor, it is incon- 
teftibly tlie beft governed. That is, however^ 
on the fuppofition that this population is a natu- 
ral efll<ft of government and manners ; for if it 
be only the confequence of the introduction of 
foreigners, or by other temporary and adventi- 
tious means, the remedy is only a proof of th.e- 
difeafe. Thus, tVhen Auguftus made laws againft 
celibacy,thofe very laws plainly fhowed the Ro- 
man empire to be already on its decline. It is 
neceffary that the good order of government . 
fhould induce the citizens to marry, and not that 
the law fhould compel them : we muft not take 
into confideration fuch things as are effected by 
force and rcftraint ; for the laws that ad againft 
the constitution are impotent and vain ; but fuch 
as follow from the natural influence of manners 
and the fyftem of government. 

The good Abbe deSt. Pierre had this narrow 
method of rcafoning in politicks 5 he was always 
for applying fome temporary remedy to particular 
evils, inftead of recurring at once to their com- 
mon fourc^, to fee if they could not be rooted 
up all together* The bufinefs is, not to treat 
feparately every particular eruption of a difeafed 

body, 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 141 

body, but to correct the whole mafs of blood 
and humours, producing fuch effects. We are 
told that premiums are offered in England for 
the encouragement of agriculture ; I need no fur- 
ther information : this fufficiently proves to me* 
it will not flour ifh long in that kingdom. 

The fecond proof of the relative merit of a 
government is deduced alfo from population, 
but in a different manner; that is, from the di- 
ftribution of the people, and not merely from 
their multiplicity. 

Two ftates, equal in extent and number of 
inhabitants, may yet be unequal in force ; th^ 
moft powerful being always that in which the 
people are moft equally difperfed throughout its 
territory: thofe which have the feweft great ci- 
ties, and the greateft number of towns and vil- 
lages, being ftronger, though lefs fplendid than. 
the others. Great cities enervate and impoverifih 
tile ftate; the riches they produce are merely 
apparent; they abound in money, but are poor 
in fubftance. It is faid that the city of Paris 
alone is worth to the king a whole province: it 
is my opinion, however, that it rather cofts him 
feveral, that Paris is fupported by the provinces 
in more fenfes than one, and that the revenues 
of the latter are funk in the metropolis, with- 
out returningeither to the king or the people. It is 
inconceivable, that in this age of political arith- 
metic, not one of our calculators would be able 
to fee that France would be a more powerful na- 
tion if Paris was annihilated. The unequal di- 

ftribution 



1+1 EMlLIUS; OR, A NEW 

ftribution of the -people is, mqpover, not only 
fimply difadvantageous to the ftate; it is even 
more ruinous than depopulation itfelf, in that de- 
population produces nothing,or no pofitivegoodj 
whereas an unequal and deftru&ive consumption 
is productive of a negative quantity, or poiitive 
evil. When I hear an Englifhand a French man 
give themfelves airs about the grandeur of their 
refpefiive capitals, difputing which is the moft 
populous, London or Paris? they appear to me 
to be difputing which of the two people have the 
honour to live under the worft government. 

To know the real chara&eriftick of a people, 
you muft obferve them, therefore, in the coun- 
try. You will learn nothing by feeing the ap- 
parent form of government, dreffed up in the 
fplendour of adminiftration, and fet forth in the 
jargon ofminifters, unlefsyou ftudyalfo the na- 
ture of it in theeffe&s it produces on the people, 
and in every part of the adminiftration. The 
difference between the form and fubftance being 
divided among all the branches of government, 
it is only by acquiring the knowledge of them 
all, that fuch difference is to be ascertained. 

In one country, it is from the governors and 
intendants of the provinces, that one may difcern 
the temper of theminiftry : in another, it is ne- 
ceffary to be prefent at a borough ele&ion for 
members of parliament, to judge whether the 
people are really free; and, indeed, in every 
country, it is impofliblethat fuch as are acquaint- 
ed only with its great cities can know any thing 

X of 



SfttSftt- OF EDUCATION. i 4 j 

^T its government; the fpirit andefFe&of it be- 
ing ever different in the metropolis and in the 
provinces. Now, it is the provinces that con- 
ftitute a country, and it is the country people 
who constitute the nation. 

By thus ftudying the characters and genius of 
different people, living in the provinces diftant 
from the metropolis, in their primitive fimpli- 
city, we deduce a general obfervation, very 
favourable to my notions, and confolatory to the 
human mind: that is, that all nations, when 
thus obferved, appear much better than other- 
wife; the nearer they approach to thefimplicity 
of nature, the more goodnefs is obfervable in 
their character. It is only, by herding together 
in great cities, and by diverfifying themfelves by 
dint of cultivation, that they grow depraved, 
and change into pernicious and agreeable vices 
thofe failings, which were rather difgufting than 
deftruftive. 

From this obfervation there appears a new 
advantage in the method of travelling I propofe; 
viz. that young people, making a fhort ftay in 
great cities, where horrible corruption prevails, 
are lefs expofed to the corruption of vice ; and 
that they are likely to preferve, among men of 
Ampler manners, and in focieties lefs numerous, 
a clearer judgement, a morejuft tafte, and more 
virtuous manners. But, as to Emilius, he is in 
no danger of fuffering by fuch contagion, being 
in every refped provided againft it. Among the 

fcvcral precautions I have taken on this head, I 

build 



*44 SMIL1US ; OR, A NB9T * 

build much on the tender attachment which it 
rooted in his heart. 

- We are in general ftrangers to the effed of 
true love on the inclinations of young people. 
It is, however, neceflary that a young man 
fbould be a lover, or he wiH be a debauchee. 
We are eafily impofed on by appearances. You 
may bring inftances of a thoufand young-people, 
who are fakl to live very chafte, without any par- 
ticular .paffion : but {how me a man poflefled of 
all his natural ^faculties, and fufceptvble of 
paffion, who can truely after t that hehathpaffed 
his youth in fuch a manner. The world, in gene- 
ral, aim at nothing more than the appearance of 
Virtue : for my part, I am in fearch of the reality $ 
and am very much miftaken if there be any other 
means of arriving at it than thofe I have taken. 

The fcheme of engaging the affedions of 
Emilius, before he fets out on his travels, is not 
of my own contrivance. The following inci- 
dent fuggefted it : 

Being at Venice, on a vifit to the governour 
of a young Englifh nobleman, as we were fitting 
by the fire, it being winter time, the preceptor 
received fome letters by the poft; he read them, 
and in particular repeated one of them aloud to 
his pupil. As it was in Englifli, I underftood 
nothing of it; but, while it was reading, per- 
ceived the young gentleman tear away hid ruffles, 
and throw them by Health into the fire. Surprifed 
at the oddity of the action, I looked at him 
attentively, and conceived I faw the marks of 

ftrong 



SYSTEM Of EDUCATION. 14$ 

Arang emotion in his countenance; but the ex- 
terior figns of the paffions, although nearly alike 
in all perfons, have fome national difference that 
makes it eafy for us to be deceived. Different 
people exprefs themfelves differently by the 
countenance as well as by their lips. 1 waited 
till the governour had done reading, and then 
Slowing him the naked wrifts of his pupil, who 
ftrove to hide them, however, as well as he 
Could, I faid to him, " Pray, may one know the 
meaning of all this ?" 

The preceptor, feeing what had pafled, 
laughed heartily, and embracing his pupil with 
an air of fatisfa&ion, obtained his confent to 
explain what I defired. 

" The line pair of worked ruffles (faid he) 
which my Lord John hath been throwing into 
the fire, where lately prefented to him by a lady 
of this city. Now, you are to know that his 
lordfhip is engaged to a young lady in England, 
for whom he hath an ardent paflion, and who ia 
every way worthy of it. This letter is from 
the mother of the young lady : I will read to you 
that part of it which occafioned the little extra-* 
vagance you have been witnefs to. 

«« LIJCY is conftantly employed on the 
cc ruffles defigned for Lord John. Mifs Betty 
4€ Oldham was here yefterday to* fpend the after- 
€S noon, and infifted on working a flower in 
*• them. Understanding that Lucy got up 
u earlier to-day than ufual, I had a mind to 
*' know how fhe had employed herfelf, and 

Vox,. IV. H found 



J46 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

<c found (he had been picking out all . that Mifs. 
<c Oldham had done, being refolved that there 
" fhould not be a ftitch of any body's work but 
" her own, in her intended prefent." 

Lord John going foon after out of the room, 
to look for another pair of ruffles, 1 faid to his 
governour, " You have a pupil of a moft excel- 
lent difpofitipn i but, tell me, fincerely, is not that 
letter from the mother of Mifs Lucy, a con- 
trivance of your's, to fet him againft the Vene- 
tian lady who gave him the ruffles Ke hath 
burnt?" — " No (faid he) the letter is genuine: I 
have riot made ufe of fo much art j I have em- 
ployed only fimplicity and zeal for his welfare, 
and Providence hathblefied my endeavours. 
• This- incident [hath not efcaped my memory, 
being well calculated for the production of 
fomething in fuch a brain as mine. 

But it is time to draw near a conclusion. Let 
us : bring back Lord John to Mifs Lucy 5 that is, 
JDmiliusto his Sophia, 

My Emiiius returns with a heart no lefs fuf- 
ceptible and tender than before his departure, 
and with an underftanding much more enlight- 
ened : he returns to his own country, with the 
advantage of r having acquired the .knowledge of 
governments from tljieir ^efefls,. ; ancf of. people 
from their virtues. ' I fiqve ever) ■ taken care that 
he fhould forman intimacy, after the hofpitable 
manner of the ancients, with fome perfon of 
merit in every country through which he hath 

paused, and fhall not be difpleafed at his culti- 
vating 



SYSTEM OP EDUCATION. 147 

vating it by an epiftolary correspondence. For, 
befides that it may be ufeful to have a friendly 
acquaintance in foreign countries, fuch a cor- 
refpondence is an excellent remedy againft na- 
tional prepofleffions. Nothing is more falutary 
to this end, than a difinterefted intercourfe with 
fenfible foreigners whom weefteem; for thcfe, 
not having the fame prejudices as ourfclves, 
afford us an opportunity of deducing fromoppo- 
fite prepoffeifions a fecurity againft both. It is a 
very different thing to converfe with foreigners 
in our own country, to what it is when they have 
left it. In the firft cafe, they have always fome 
refpe& to the country in which they rcfide, 
which makes them difguife their real fentiments, 
or give them the moft favourable turn : whereas, 
a'ter their return home, they do not Hand upon 
fuch ceremony, and arc more impartial. I fhould 
always choofe that a foreigner, whole opinion I 
afked, fhould have {qqti my country; but I 
fhould never afk him his thoughts about it till he 
returned back to his own. 



i-aem*mm*mm9mm*mMm+m*m**m 



AFTER having employed almoft two years in 
vifiting the principal parts of Europe; having 
learned two or three of the moft ufeful languages 
and feen every thing really curious in natural 
hiftory, government, and the arts, Emilius grows 
quite impatient, and reminds me that our time is 
near expired. " Well, my friend (faidl) you 
doubtlefs remember the principal, caufe of our 

H2 travels; 



148 "EMIL1VS; OH, A NEW 

travels : you have feen the world, and, I fup- 
pofe, made your obfervations on it* Pray, what 
is the refult of them ? On what have you deter* 
mined ?" ^Either I am much miftakenin the me- 
thods I have ufed, or he will anfwer me jriearly 
in the following terais : 

c< On what have I determined !« — To remain 
fuch as you have made me, and to lay myfelf 
-willingly under no other reftraint than that which 
the laws of nature and of natural fociety impofe. 
The more I examine into political inftitutions, 
the more I fee that, by endeavouring to render 
themfelves independent, mankind become flaves; 
and that they even watte their liberty in vain 
efforts to maintain it, 

«' To prevent their being obliged tofubmit to 
the neceffity of things, they form athoufand dif- 
ferent attachments, which lay them under a ftill 
greater reftraint \ fo that they can hardly move, 
without finding themfelves dependent on every 
thing around them. It appears to me, that, 
in order to render themfelves free, it is fuffi- 
cient for men to perfevere in their resolutions 
to be fo. It is you, my dear preceptor, who 
have made me free, by teaching me always 
to yield to neceffity. Let it come when it will, 
I {hall fubmit to it without relu&ance; and as 1 
never defire to oppofe it, fo (hall I form no con- 
nexions to elude it. I have been looking out, 
during our travels, for fome corner of the world, 
in which I might be abfolutely my own matter; 
but in what part of the world are not men depen- 
dent 



SYSTEM OP EDUCATION* ttf 

dent on their paffions ? On a full examination I 
hare found that even my wifhe6, in this refpelt, 
were contradictory to themfelves ; for, though I 
fhould be dependent on nothing clfe, I fliould be 
attached to the fpot on which I had fixed my re- 
fidence, like the dryads to their refpe&ive trees : 
I have found that liberty and dominion are incom- 
patible, and that I cannot even be matter of a 
cottage, without ceafing to be mafter of my felf. 

Hoc erat in votis modus agri non ita magnus. 

" I remember, that my eftate and poflefEortf 
were the caufe of our making thefe researches ;. 
you gave me Sufficient reafons to prove, that I 
could not preferve both my wealth and liberty j. 
but when you wiflied me to be at once at liberty, 
and free from wants, you required two things to- 
tally incompatible; for I cannot entirely (hake off 
my dependence on mankind, unlefs by recurring 
again to a ftate of nature. What fhall I do, then, 
with the fortune my parents bequeathed me I 
I will begin, by making no dependence on it; 
by throwing off all thofe attachments which bind 
me to it : if it then be taken from me, it will not 
drag me after it ; and if it be left me, it is well; 
I (hall have it in poffcflion. I (hall never give my- 
felf the trouble to preferve it, but remain indiffe- 
rent concerning it. Rich or poor, I will be free; 
and that not only in this or that particular coun- 
try, but in every part of the world. I have bro- 
ken through all the reftraint of prejudice, and ac- 
knowledge no other ties than thofe of ncceffity. 
I have learned to fubmit to thefe, from rhy birth, 

H 3 and 



150 EMILIUS; QR, A NEW 

and 'fhall continue to do foj as long as I live. 
Being, a man, why fhould I not freely wear fuch 
chains, when, if I were a flave, I muft ftill wear 
them, and. tbofe of my bondage too? 

" Of what confequence to me is my filia- 
tion and rank in Jife? What fignifies where Hive? 
Wherever there are men, I (hall be among my 
brethren; and where there are none, 1 fliall be 
always at home. So long as I can preferve my- 
felf rich and independent, as I have the means of 
life in my power, I will enjoy them. But when 
I find my riches tend to cnllave me, I fhall give 
them up without regret. I have hands to work, 
and my labour fhalJ maintain me. When thefe 
fail, 1 will live on the humanity of the world, 
if it willfupportmy neceffities; if not, 1 will die. 
Nay, I muft die, whether I am thus abandoned 
or not; for death is not a curfe entailed upon po- 
verty; it is one of the unalterable laws of nature. 
Whenever death comes, therefore, he will find 
mc ready; he will not find me making prepara- 
tions to live; nor fhall he prevent my enjoying 
every fingle moment of my life. 

" Such, my dear governor, is my refolution. 
Were I free from paflions; I would be, even in 
my pre fen t fituation, as independent as Omnipo- 
tence itfelf ; for, defiring to be nothing more than 
I am, I mould never repine at my deftiny. At 
leaft I know of but one attachment that is bind- 
ing on my heart ;^ and this I fhall always glory 
in. Give me then my Sophia, and you will 
make me as free as I can defire," 

"I am. 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 151 

u I am glad, my dear Emilius (anfwercd I) 
to hear this manly difcourfe from you, and to 
find fuch noble fentiments cherifhed in your 
heart; Y6ur difintereftednefs, though a little ex- 
travagant, doth not difpleafe me when I confider 
your age. It will be corre&ed when you come 
to have children, and then I doubt not to fee you 
fuch as a prudent father and a good man ought to 
be. I even knew, before we fet out on our tra- 
vels, what would be the effe<St of them. I fore- 
faw that your obfervations on the facial inftitu- 
tions of life, would be far from inducing iYOu to 
place that confidence in them, which ttey.by 
no means deferve. It is in vain that mankind 
afpire after liberty, while under the government 
of laws. Laws ! do I fay ? May I not afk where 
the true fpirit of laws is to be found, and where 
they are refpc&ed ? Do we not every where fee 
private intereft and paffions prevail under that fa- 
cred name ? The fixed and eternal laws of nature 
and order, however, ftill exift. Thefe are the 
ftatutes of the wife* thefe are written in the 
heart by reafon and confidence; it is to thefe we 
ihould be fubfervient, in order to be truly free : 
the vicious man only being a. flave, as he is always 
vicious in fpite of his better reafon, and in con- 
demnation of himfelf. Liberty does not exift in 
any certain form of government, but in the heart 
of man. The wicked bear the chains of their 
bondage every where about them ; and it is pof- 
fible for one man to be a flave at Geneva, and 
for another to be free even in Paris. 

H 4 "If 



951 KMIJLIUS; OR, A NEW 

" If I fbould fpeak to you of the duties of a 
citizen, you , would afk me, perhaps, where i$ 
your country, and might think you had puzzled 
me. In this, however, my dear Emilius, you 
are miftaken ; for though a man may renounce his 
native country, he muft bear fame relation to 
that in which he refutes, and owe fome. obliga-t 
tions to that form of government, and thofe phan- 
toms of laws under which he lives with fecurity. 
It is nothing to him, whether the facial contract 
be obferved or not, in the model of fuch govern- 
ment, if his particular per fon and property are but 
prote&ed, if the publick oppreiSon be a fufficient 
check on the violence of individuals, if the evil he 
fees committed influences him to the love of good, 
and if the laws themfelves do but krve to roakfl 
us deteft the injufticeof them. G, my Emijius, 
you will find no man who is not in fome degree 
under obligations to the community. Whatever 
be his condition, he owes to it the mod refpeft- 
able efforts of humanity, vix. juftice, and th« 
love of virtue. Born and bred in the midft of a 
foreft, he might have lived, indeed, more happy 
and free ; but, being a ftranger to motives of 
felf-denial, he would have indulged his appetite* 
without merit, and have lived and died without 
virtue. In his focial ftate he is capable* of being 
virtuous, even in fpite of his paffions : the mere 
appearance of order leads him to ftudy and to ad- 
mire it. The publick good, which is fo often 
made a pretence of by others, is to him a real mo** 
tive. He learns to check, to overcome, himfelf ; 

ana 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 153 

and to facrifice his private intereft to that of the 
publick* It is not true, that we reap no profit by 
the laws; on the contrary, they encourage us to 
be juft, even among the wicked. It is not true 
that they have not made him free; they have 
taught him to have the command over himfelf. 

cc Say not, therefore, What is it to me where 
I live ? It is of confequence that you fhould 
live in that place, where you may discharge every 
duty that is incumbent on you; and one of 
thefe duties is an attachment to the place of your 
birth* Your countrymen afforded you protec- 
tion in your infancy; in return you ought to re- 
fped them, now you are grown up. You -ought 
to refide in the nvidft of them, or, at lead, fo 
near, as to be as ufeful to then) as poffible; and 
within their reach, if at any time they fhould 
ftand in need of your afliftance. Again, in fome 
cafes, a man may be more ufeful to his fellow- 
countrymen by refuting abroad than at 
bonne. In fuch circumftances he fhould attend 
only to the di dates of patriotism, and fupport 
bis exile with chearfulnefs; fuch exile is then 
bis duty. But you, my good Emilius, on whom 
no fuch rigorous obligations are impofed, go 
you, and live happy in the midft of your compa- 
triots; cultivate their friendfhip, be their bene- 
factor and guide ; your example will inftruft them 
better than books, and the good they fee you 
perform, will affe£t them more than whole vo- 
lumes of morality. 

H s "I 



154 'EMILIUS; OR, A NEW; 

"I do not ad vife you, however, to take up your 
relidertce in a populous city; on the contrary, 
one" of the 'firft examples -which the virtuous 
ought to fet the reft of mankind, is to prefer a 
e6untry life. This patriarchal ftate is the moft 
n natural,] the moft peaceful, and the moft agree- 
, able of all others to an un^epravedmincL Hap- 
py, my friend, is that country, where peace is 
to be found,, without burying ourfelves in a de- 
fert.- But where (hall we find fuch a country ? 
A benevolent mind can ill gratify its difpofition 
in the midft of large cities, where it finds hardly 
any other objects of companion than knaves and 
cheats. The reception which is there given to 
thofe numerous, adventurers, who come thither 
to feek their fortunes, depopulates the provinces} 
whereas the provinces ought, on the contrary, 
to be peopled at the expence of the towns. 
Thofe who retire, therefore, from great cities, 
are even ufeful in the circumftance of their re- 
treat; becaufe all the vices of fociety arife from 
its being too numerous. They are further ufe- 
ful alfo, when they carry back into the country 
the feme turn for their former ftate, the fame 
tatte for a country life. With what pleafure 
do I anticipate the fcenes of benevolence that 
will furround the ilmple retreat of Emilius and 
Sophia ! with what joy will they infpire the in-, 
digent peafants, fpreading chearfulnefs and plen- 
ty around ! I fce the people already increafe, 
their fields bear more plenteous harvefts, and 
their meadows arc covered with new verdure. 

The 



$¥$TEM Otf EDUCATION. 155 

The multitude of hands, and the plenty with 
which they are provided, convert their labour 
into amufement ; while amidft their rejoicings 

• they fend forth the loudeft acclamations in praife 
of the amiable pair, to whom they are indebted 

• for the caufe of their happinefs. The golden 
age is ufually treated as a chimera, and will 

'always continue fuch to thofe whofe tafte is 
vitiated, and whofe hearts are corrupt. It is not 
even true that men regret its lofs, their pre- 
tended regret being always vain and infincere. 
What method then can be taken to renew it ? 
-One only, and that I defpair of; mankind 
muft love and wifh for it. Something in- 
deed appears like it, round the prefent habita- 
tion of Sophia; you will only have the honour 
of completing what her worthy parents have 
begun. But let not fo happy a life give you 
a difguft to the lefs pleafing duties of fociety, 
when they are impofed on you ; remember 
that the Romans left the plough to aflume 
the confulfhip. When the prince or ftate call 
you forth to the fervice of your country, leave 
every thing elfe behind, to fill the poft that is 
affigned you, and difcharge the honourable func- 
tions Of a good citizen. If fuch a poft ftiould 
prove too burthen fome, you have a fure and 
honourable method of getting rid of it; this is 
to difcharge your office with too much inte- 
grity for it to be left long in your hands* 
You have little reafon, however, to apprehend 
any fuch embarraffment ; there are fo many 

H 6 bufy 



1£& EMII/IUSj QR, A NEW 

bufy people io the world, ready to accept of fuch 
employments, that the ftate .will ftand in little 
need of you." 

What an afFedi&g defcription might I not give 
of the return of Emilius to his Sophia, and the 
happy completion of their loves, or rather rile 
beginning of that conjugal affe&ion which is 
hereafter to unite them ? an affefikion founded 
on eftcem, and as durable as life; on virtues 
which are not tranfitory like beauty, and on 
that conformity of difpofttion and chara&er, 
which will prolong the charms of union to old 
age. Such a defcription, however^ would pro- 
bably be more entertaining than ufeful, and? hi- 
therto' I have not indulged myfelf in expa- 
tiating on matters of mere amufement. Shall I 
break through this rule fo near the end of nay 
work ? Not fo : I perceive, befides, that I be- 
gin to grow weary of my tafk. Incapacitated 
for an undertaking of fo coniiderable an ex- 
tent, I fhould even how throw up that which 
I have been fo long engaged in, if it were not 
near a conclufion. Not to leave it imperfect, 
therefore, 1 fhall haften to clofe it. 

In a word, then: I behold, at length, my 
Emilius happy in the pofleflion of his Sophia^ 
and begin myfelf to reap the fruit of my labours. 
This amiable couple are united by indiffoluble 
ties; their lips pronounce the terms of the facred 
engagement, and their hearts confirm their truth. 
In returning from the church, they hardly know 
where they are, what they fee, or what is dqin^ 

around 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 157 

ground them. They hardly underftand any thing 
that is faid to them, but make confufed replies* 
and appear to be wrapped in the moil delightful 
delirium. Such is human weaknefs ! we are unable 
even tp fupport the weight of our own happinefs* 

There are very few perfons who know how 
to behave properly to a new-married couple. The 
formal folemnity of fome, and the pleafant rail- 
lery of others, are equally unfeafonaJMe. I had 
piuch rather leave their young hearts to unfold 
tfcemfeives, and give them up to that pleafing 
agitation of mind, which is natural on fuch an 
occaikm, than fo cruelly to diftrefs them by the 
gloom of a falfe decorum, or to embarrafs them 
by impertinent pleafantries ; which, however 
agreeable they might prove at any other time, 
are Aire to be difplcafing on their wedding-day. 
I* who aim defirous they fhould be happy every 
hour of their lives, can I think of interrupting 
them in the enjoyment of fuch precious mo- 
ments as thefe i No ! I would have them expe- 
rience all that felicity fo interefting a fituatibn is 
capable of bcftowing. To this end, I take an 
opportunity of detaching them from the com- 
pany of indifcreet people, and taking a walk 
with them apart, induce them to recollect tbem- 
fclves, by talking of their own. affairs. It is not 
to their ears only I addrefs myfelf, but to their 
hearts ; for I am not ignorant of the only fubjeft 
they can attend to at this crifis. 

" My dear children (faiJ I, taking each by 

the band) it is now three years fince I firft be- 

4 heM 



* 



158 EMILItfSj'oR, A NEW^ 

held that kindling paffion, whofe flame hath con- 
tinued to burn with the utmoft purity, and which 
conftitutes your prefent happinefs. I fee it now 
blaze with the utmoft ardour of afre£rion ; it is 
arrived to that height which it cannot exceed, 
but muft ever after be on the^decline." — Imagine, 
reader, the extafy, the tranfport, the vows of 
Emilius; the difdainful air of Sophia, difengaging 
her hand from mine, and the tender proteftations 
which their eyes reciprocally made each other, 
to love till death ! I took ho notice, however, 
but proceeded, 

<c I have often thought, that if two perfons 
could prolong the happinefs of love after mar- 
riage, fuch a ftate would refemblea heaven upon 
earth. This, however, hath been never yet ef- 
fected : but if the thing be not abfolutely im- 
ppffible, you are both worthy to fet an exam- 
ple which you have not taken . from others, 
and which few will be able to copy from you. 
Shall I tell you, my children, what method I 
think you might take to accomplish this end, 
and that alone by which I think it poffible to 
be done?" 

They looked at each other; and, fmiling at 
my iimplicity, Emilius politely thanked me for 
my recipe, but told me he believed Sophia had 
a much better; and that as for his part he need- 
ed no other. Sophia aflented, and feemed equal- 
ly confident. I imagined, however, that I faw, 
beneath the air of raillery fhe affedted, fome 
tokens of curiofity. I looked at Emilius, but 
he was fo taken up in contemplating the charms' 

of 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 159 

oE his amiable bride, that he gave little, heed 
to my difcourfe. I fmiled in my turn, and 
thought to myfelf, I fhould foon render him 
more attentive. 

The almoft imperceptible difference between 
their fecret emotions on this occafion clearly 
difplayed the diftindt characters of the two fexes, 
■and that in a manner directly contrary to com- 
mon opinion : viz. that, generally {peaking, 
the men are lefs conftant than women, and are 
fooner difgufted in a fuccefsful amour. The 
woman forefees the inconftancy of man, and 
is fearful of it : and this alfo renders her more 
jealous. When his paffion begins to cool, 
fhe finds herfelf under the neceffity of taking 
the fame pains to keep him conftant as he 
before took to engage her affections : hence {he 
weeps, and is as humble in her turn, but very 
rarely with the fame fuccefs. Love and affiduity 
may win a heart, but it feldom or ever regains 
one. I return, however, to my recipe to prevent 
indifference in love, after marriage. 

44 It is very eafy and fimple (faid I : ) only con- 
tinue to be lovers when you are hufband and 
wife." — " We fhall find great difficulty in that 
truely !" returned Emilius, with a fmile. 

44 More difficult, at leaft, on your part (faid 
I) than perhaps you imagine; but give me leave 
to explain myfelf a little. 

44 The knot which is drawn too tight is ever 
in danger of breaking. This is precifely the thing 
that happens in matrimony, when we lay a 
greater ftrefs on its engagements than they will 



%6& EMILItJS; OR, A NEW 

£ear. That fidelity, which is hereby impofed 
en both parties, is certain! y x the moft iacred of 
obligations ; but the power which it gives to 
each party over the other is too great. Love 
and npflralnt never go well together, nor fhould 
its pleasures be fubje& to command. Nay. bluHk 
*ot, Sophia, nor think of running away from 
me $ God forbid that I Ihould fay any thing to 
offend your modefty : but what I am going to 
fay concerns the future happinefs of your life* 
When fuch an objed: is at flake you may be 
permitted to attend to fuch difcourfe between a 
bride and her father,, as might be improper on 
;my other occafion. , 

" It is not fo much the pofleffion as the fub- 
je&ion in marriage, which gives rife to difguft, 
men frequently preferving a more durable affec- 
tion for a kept miftrefs than for a wife. 

4< How can we reconcile the tendernefs of love, 
with the notion of duty, or the exquifite grati- 
fications of that delightful paffion with the ideas 
of right and obligation ? it is natural defire only 
that constitutes right in love ; nature knows no 
other obligation. The laws may reftrain this 
rights but they cannot annihilate it. 

" €i NojraydearchUdren^inmarriageyourhearts 
only are united, your perfons are not enflaved* 
You owe: fidelity to each other, but not fcrvi- 
lity. Your mutual attachment is indeed exclu>- 
five, with regard to every other perfon in the 
world j but your command over each other de- 
pends on voux reciprocal concurrence* 

!< If 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. *6l 

** If then, Emilius, you would continue to be 
really Sophia's lover, permit her to be always 
her own miftrefs as. well as your's ; be happy, but 
refpc&ful. ' Owe every thing to love,, without 
exading any thing of duty, nor charge even the 
flighted favours to the fcore of obligation. I 
know that modefty avoids formal conceffions, 
and experts follicitation and gentle compulfion;, 
hut can a lover of the leaft .delicacy, be miftaken 
in interpreting the language of the eyes ? Can he 
be ignorant when the heart confents to what the 
lips but faintly deny? Each, therefore, fhould 
be at perfect liberty to difpenfe their carefles, or 
meet thofe of the other, at pleafure. Forget not 
that, even in marriage, it is mutual defire only 
that gives fandion to delight. Fear not, how* 
ever, that this injunction fhould keep you at a 
diftance or eftrange you from each other ; on 
the contrary, it will make you both more intent 
to pleafe, and will prevent fatiety. While faith- 
ful to each other, both love and nature will Ef- 
ficiently unite you." 

At thefe and fome other flmilar expreffions, 
Emilius began to grow angry j while the blujChr 
ifig Sophia held her fan before her face; and was 
ftlent. Without pitying them, however, 1 pro- 
ceeded; I upbraided Emilius with his want of 
delicacy, and undertook to anfwer for Sophia, 
that (lie would alien t to what I had declared. 
The impatient yourig bridegroom watched, in 
tho mean time, the looks of his lovely bride ; 
reading in her eyes that innate fenfibility which 
allured him, he would run no riflt by confiding 

YCv. 



162 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

in her generofity. Throwing himfelf at her feet, 
he then kiffed her hand in the utmoft tranfport, 
protefting that he renounced every prerogative 
over her. «' Be thou (faid he) my dear Sophia, 
the arbiter of my pleafures, as thou art of my life 
and fortune. Should thy cruelty coft me ever fo 
dear, I would yet refign myfelf folely to thy will 
and pleafure. I will be indebted for nothing to 
thy complacency, but for every thing to thy 
heart." 

" Come, come (faid I) allure yourfelf, my 
dear Emilius, that Sophia has too much genero- 
iityherfelf to let you fuffer by your's." 

Juft before I took my leave, of them in th« 
evening, I reminded them, in a very grave and 
ferioiis manner, that, though married, they were* 
ftill free, and that neither fliould pay a falfe de- 
ference to the other : after which I took Emi- 
lius by the arm, and afked him if he would go 
along with me? " Come (faid I) Sophia will 
permit you." At this he turned from me in a 
rage. " Nay (faid I) are not you willing, So- 
phia ? fhall I not take him with me?" — "Ay, 
do," faid the blufhing little deceiver; uttering a 
falfehood, infinitely more amiable than the truth. 

The next day— But pictures of true felicity 
no longer give pleafure to mankind; a corrup- 
tion of manners hath no lefs depraved their 
tafte than their hearts. They can no longer fee 
what is amiable, or feel what is truely affe&ing. 
How imperfect are the pictures of thofe, who, 
in describing the pleafures of love, can only paint 
the happy pair diffolving in mutual tranfports of 

delight* 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 163 

.delight. Thefe are only the grofler touches of 
their fublime felicity; the moft delicate, the moft 
exquifite ftrokes are wanting. Who hath not, 
at fome time or other, beheld an happy young 
couple, come forth from the nuptial bed, with 
all that languifhing tendernefs in their looks, 
which is ever confequent on the chafte delirium 
of fuch genuine delight; a tendernefs, which is 
the amiable fecurity of their innocence, and the 
pledge of their future felicity ? 

Such a light is the moft afteclingly delightful 
that can poffibly offer itfelf to our regard. Such 
is the true picture of r^al pleafure! But the having 
feen it, is not enough ; the hearts of mankind 
are no longer formed for love; they are no 
longer capable of fympathifing with thofe whom 
it makes happy. The amiable Sophia paffed the 
day in the peaceful arms of her mother ; a moft 
agreeable place of repofe, after having fpent the 
night in the fond arms of her hufband. 

On the following day, I perceived fome change 
in the fecne. Emilius affected to appear a little 
di fcon tented ; I remarked, through this affecta- 
tion, however, fuch tender follicitude, and fomuch 
fubmiffion, that I gueffed nothing of confequence 
was the matter. As to Sophia, fhe was more 
chearful than fhe had been the day before; an air 
of plcafing fatisfaefcion appearing in her looks. 
Her behaviour to Emilius was charming; and 
even mixed with fome agreeable provocations 
that only irritated his impatience. 

Thefe incidents, indeed, were not very per- 
ceptible to everyone, but they did notefcape me. 



164 EM1LITJS; OR, A KEW 

I began to be fbmewhat uneafy, therefore, and 
queftioned Emilius apart y of whom I 1 earned r 
that y to his great regret, and in. fpite of his 
moft preffing remonft ranees, he was obliged to 
ileep in a feparate bed the preceding night. The 
little imperious fair was in hafte to claim her 
'privileges* I chofe • ta clear up this matter 
in the prefence of both; when Emilius com- 
plained moft heavily, while Sophia only treated 
him with raillery • At length, however, feeing 
iim juft ready to grow angry in good earnefly 
£he caflr a look on him, full of lpve and fweet- 
nefs - y at the fame time taking hold of my hand y 
and exclaiming in the moft pathetick tone and 
manner.. Ob ! the ungrateful creature I Emilius 
was fo dull as not to comprehend the meaning 
of this exclamation. For my part, I under flood 
it in its full extent ; I fent Emilius away, there- 
fore, and took Sophia to tafk alone, 

" I fee (faid I) my dear Sophia, the reafon 
of this caprice. It is impoflible for any one to 
have more delicacy, or to difplay it more unfea- 
fbnably. But be affured your motives are vain 
and groundlefs; Emilius has not lavifhed the 
ftrength of his youth on others, but has pre- 
ferved its firft-fruits for the lawful objeft of his 
affe&ions; you need not fpare him, Sophia, or 
be under any apprehenfion on account of his 
conftitution. 

" I mull explain to you, my dear child, my 
defign in the conversation, which I held with 
you three days ago. You feem to have drawn 
no other leflbn from it than that of managing 

your 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 165 

Tyour pleafures, in order to render them durable. 
I had a worthier end in view* Emilius, in. 
becoming jour hufband, is become your mailer; 
and claims your obedience. Such is the order of 
nature* When a man is married, however, to 
fucha wife as Sophia, it is proper he mould be 
di reded by her : this is alfo agreeable to the order 
of natures it is, therefore, to give you as much 
authority over his heart as his fex gives him over 
your perfon, that I have made you the arbiter of 
his pleafures. It may coft you, perhaps, fome 
-difagreeable felf-denial ; but you will be certain 
of maintaining your empire over him, if you can 
preferve it over yourfelf — what I have already 
obferved, alfo, (hows me, that this difficult 
-attempt does not furpafs your courage. 

" Would you have your hufband conftantly at 
your feet ? keep him at fome diftance from your 
perfon. You will long maintain the authority in 
love, if you know but how to render your favours 
rare and valuable: But, let modefty and not 
caprice influence your feverity; let him fee 
you are referved, but not fantaftical ; and above 
all things, take care, that, in the management of 
his love, you give him no reafon to doubt of 
your's. Take care that he may have reafon to 
love you for your complacence ; and to refpeft 
you for your feverity; that he may honour the 
chaftity of his wife, without having caufe to 
complain of her indifference. 

" It is thus, my dear Sophia, that you may 
induce him to truft with confidence on your love, 
to hearken to your advice, to confuk you in all 



3^66 EMILIUS; OR, A NEW 

his affairs, and to refolve on nothing without 
your concurrence. It is thus that you may 
-awaken in him the fuggeftions of prudence; when 
he goes aftray, recall him by gentle perfuafion, 
and render yourfelf at once amiable arid ufeful. 
It is thus you may employ even the arts of 
coquetry in the fervice of virtue, and thofe of 
love in that of reafon. 

c< And yet you muft not imagine, that even 
fuch management will always fuffice. What- 
ever precaution be taken, enjoyment will, by 
degrees, take off the edge of pafiion. But when 
love hathiafted as long as poffible, a pleating 
habitude fupplies its place, and the attachment of 
a mutual confidence- fucceeds to the tranfports 
of paflion. Children often form a more agreeable 
and permanent 'connection between married peo- 
pie than even love itfelf. When you ceafe to be 
the miftrefs of Emilius, you will contitvie to be 
his wife and friend, you will be the mother of 
his children. Inftead of keeping him, then, at 
his former diftance, proceed to confirm the mo ft 
eftablifbed intimacy between you ; ufe no longer 
feparate beds, nor ftand on referve. On the con- 
trary, endeavour to unite yourfelf fo clofely to 
his perfon, that he may not be able to live with- 
out you j let the fame charms, which you have 
diffufed thoughout the domeftick ceconomy of 
your father's houfe, prevail alfo throughout your 
own. Every man who takes delight in home, 
muft of courfe have a regard for his wife: Re- 
member alfo, that if your hufband be happy in 
his family, you muft be an happy woman. 

"At 



SYSTEM OF EDUCATION. 167 

* c At prefent, I would not have you be too 
fevere on your lover j he deferves more complai- 
fance; he may alfo be ofFended at your appre- 
henfions for him; be not fo careful of his health 
at the expence of his happinefs and your own. 
You mould not refufe merely for the fake of 
refilling, but only to enhance the merit of your 
favours." 

Then, leading her to Emilius, I told him, in 
her prefence, that he ought to fupport, without 
murmuring, the feverity me had impofed. " You 
have only (faid I) to endeavour by your beha- 
viour, to fhorten it. Sacrifice, in particular, to 
the graces and think not to render yourfelf ami- 
able by appearing gloomy and difcontented." It 
was by no means difficult to reconcile them; the 
treaty of peace being foon completed, figned, 
and fcaled with a kifs. After this, addreffing 
myfelf to my pupil, " My dear Emilius (faid I) 
.the tafk I undertook in your education being 
completed I now refign my authority over yoij. 
into the hands of another: as you will always 
find the advantage of a friend and advifer, the 
gentle Sophia will be your beft preceptor." 

The firft tranfports of our young lovers fubfTd- 
ing, they were left at liberty to the peaceful en- 
joyment of their new fituation. Happy lovers ! 
amiable pair ! To do fufficient honour to their 
virtues, or to defer ibe their felicity, were to write 
the hiftory of their lives. How often, in con- 
templating the happy effe&s of my labours, have 
I been feifed with fenfations of inexpreflible de- 
light ! How often have I joined their hands in 

mittc 



l68 - EMILIITS; Oft, A tffcW 

mine, and poured forth my grateful tranlport, l% 
fee them thus united ! How often have I kifled 
thofe united hands and bathed them with tears 
of joy; while equally effe&ed hi their turn, this 
virtuous couple mixed their tears with mine. 
Their refpe&able parents, alfo, {hare their joys, 
and grow young again in their children, exclaim* 
ing againft their former wealth, that prevented 
their tafting eqtial delights, at the fame age. In 
a word, if there be a lituation in life truely happy, 
is to be found in the afylum we now inhabit. 

At the end of fome months, Emilius entered 
my apartment, one morning, and, embracing me, 
bid me wifli him joy, on the happy occafion of 
^becoming a father. " O, my friend (faid he) 
what new obligations (hall we now be foon laid 
under! How greatly fliall we ftand in need of 
your affiftance ! yet God forbid I fhould trouble 
you too much with the education of the fon, 
who have taken fo much pains in educating the 
father! God forbid that fo pleafing, fo facreda 
duty fhould be difcharged by any other man than 
amyfelf, were I but as well capacitated for it as 
yqu ! Remain, however, the preceptor of your 
young preceptors. Advife, direfl: us j we will be 
ever docile and tradable. I fhall require your 
affiftance as long as I live; and. have even more 
need of it now than ever; now that I am called 
upon to difcharge the more important duties of 
man. You have difcharged your's; aflift me 
therefore, to imitate my faithful governour, 
while he indulges himfelf in thatrepofe he hath 
So amply deferred." 

THE 



EMILIUS and SOPHIA 5 



O R, 



THE SOLITARIES. 



BY J. J. ROUSSEAU. 



BEING 



A SEQUEL TO EMILIUS 



FOUND AMONGST THE AUTHOR'S PAPERS 
AFTER HIS DECEASE. 



Vol. IV. I THE 



I 

t 






m 



THE 



EDITOR'S preface. 



IT muft be acknowledged that the only trea- 
fures to be confided in, with fafety, are thofe 
which we lay up within our own minds ; and 
the only method, perhaps, of enfuring our hap- 
pinefs, is fo to arm us againft the attacks of 
adverfity, as to be able either to repel them by 
our talents, or withstand them by our virtues. 
This was the great end which Roufleau pro- 
posed to himfelf in his Treatife on Education $ 
the following work was defigned to prove that 
he bad attained it. By fctting Emilius to corn- 
feat with fortune, by placing him in a variety of 
fituations, which the mod intrepid mortal could 
not behold without horrour, he meant to (how 
that the principles, inftilled into him from his 
infancy, were alone capable of carrying him 
through fuch tryals. Nothing could be more 
noble than this plan ; nothing more interesting 

* I 2 « 



lj% EDITORS PREFACE. 

or more ufeful than its execution would have 
been : it was reducing the moral of Emilius to 
pra&ice, and, by juflifying, rendering it the ob- 
ject ofourefteem; but death prevented Rouf- 
feau from raifing this new monument to his 
glory ; and this work, which he had interrupted 
for his CcnfejJionS) was never refumed. 

All he wrote of it is here given to the pub- 
lick, and given, we own it candidly, with a 
degree of "repugnance. The impreffions it is 
calculated to raife are of the moft painful kind, 
and the genius of its fublime authour only ferves 
to make them more fo* Sophia difhonoured ! 
Emilius in defpair ! Who could fupport thefe 
horrid images ! When I fee virtue weep, it is a 
confolation to weep with h«r ; but what interefi: 
can I take in the fufferings of guilt f Befides, 
what confidence is to be put in precepts that 
lead to adultery ? Yet if it be true that the 
more rigid modes of education can give at befl: 
but an appearance of virtue, Sophia's education 
alone could beftow the reality $ but is virtue in 
the maid followed by infidelity in tl)e wife? We 

, muft by no means impute thefe. contradictions 
toRoufleauj they appertained not to his pjan, 

and would not have appeared in its execution. 
Could he confent to disfigure his own faireft 

work ? 



, EDITOR S PREFACE. 173 

work i . Sophia was guilty, but not depraved ; 
to imprudent connexions (he owed her faults 
and her misfortunes- — A vile woman, jealous of 
her virtues, triumphed over her fimplicity with- 
out altering the purity of her foul: the drugs, 
which took from her the command of her fenfes, 
had firft deprived her of the ufc of her reafon - 9 
fhe admitted an odious feducer to the privileges 
of the hufband, .whom in her delirium (he ima- 
gined him to be ; and if £he refembled Clarifla 
in her fall, fhe difplayed ftill greater magnani- 
mity in her rife. But to render Emilius un- 
happy, was it not necefTary that Sophia mould 
be unfaithful? With her he could never be 
wretched : and what had power to feparate them ? 
The world — Death — No! — Sophia's infidelity. 
Why did not Rouffeau complete the hiftory 
of thefe fad events ? Why can we not trace the 
long fucceffion of melancholy objects, of dif- 
appointments, calamities, faults, remorfe, de- 
fpair, repentance, till wc reach thofe days of 
peace and glory, when Emilius and Sophia, 
triumphant over fortune, the world, and them- 
felves, radiant with virtues, and intoxicated 
with love, recovered, at a diftance from man- 
kind and in the calm of innocence, the happinefs 
of their early days. Then would the foft ac- 
cents of their felicity drop like balm into the 
heart, that' bled at the ftory of their fufferings, 

I 3 while 



174 editor's preface. 

while Emilius thus improves his prefent blifs by 
the recolle&ion of paft misfortunes. 

Yes, my Sophia, let us recall the memory of 
our happy days; after filling our hearts with fen- 
fations fo delicious, never fliall we fuffer them 
to efcape our rememberance. Let us recoiled 
the tranfports they gave birth to — the raptures 
that attended them : above all let us not forget 
the misfortunes that interrupted them, and the 
time fo fatally diftinguifhed by your fault and 
my defpair. Time of ineffable torments, which 
love, virtue, and happinefs, have fo richly re- 
paid ! Who on thefe conditions would not have 
fuffercd, have defpaired, have curfed his exift- 
ence, and retained while he curfed it . K 

Tears of grief and rage, fwallowed up now 
in torrents of joy, how little do you appear ! 

Painful yet delicious ideas, remain for ever 
with us, and be as lading as our happinefs ! 

Be to us all we have loft, now that confined 
for ever to each other, we are alone in the uni- 
verfe, and that mankind exifts no longer for us. 

Sophia ! dear, dear Sophia ! why can I not, 
every day I pafs with you, recommence my ex- 
iftence ! though extended to ages it would ftill 
be too fhort for my happinefs. 

EMILIUS 



EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 



/ 



O R, 



THE SOLITARIES. 



LETTER I. 

I WAS free, I was happy. O guide of nrty 
youth! proteftor of my infancy ! you made 
me fufceptible of happinefs — and you gave me 
Sophia. To the fweets of love r to the over- 
flowings of friendfliip — a growing family added 
the charms of paternal tendernefs : every thing 
prom i fed me a life of content, a happy old age, 
and a tranquil death in the arms of my children. 
Alas I what is become of that happy time of en- 
joyment and hope, when the future gladdened 
theprefent; when my heart, in the intoxica- 
tion of its joy, exhaufted every day the felicity 
of ages? All is vanifhed like a dream: as yet 
in the vigour of manhood, I have loft all that 
was dear to me — wife— children — friends, every 
thing, in fhort, even the intercourfe of men. 

I4 The 



176 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

The ties, by which my heart was united to every 
thing that rendered exiftence valuable, are dif- 
folved for ever, and the faint love of a life, 
without pleafure, but without remorfe, is all 
that binds me to exiftence. If I long furvive 
my lofles, my lot is to grow old and die with- 
out ever feeing the face of man, and Providence 
alone will clofe my eyes. 

Thus circumftanced, what delight can I have 
in the care of a miferable life, which I have fo 
little reafon to love i Thoughts of the paft, and 
the confolation of afiing rightly the part affignr 
ed me, in fubmitting without murmur to the 
decrees of Heaven. I am dead to every thing 
that was dear to me. I wait without impatience 
and without fear till that which remains of me 
be re-united to that which I have loft. 

But, my dear friend, do you exift ? Are you 
ftill mortal? Are you yet on this land of banifli- 
ment with your Emilius ? or are you with So- 
phia in the regions of blifs ? Alas ! wherever 
you are you are dead to me; thefe eyes will ne- 
ver behold you$ but you will be ever prefent to 
my mind. I never knew fo well the value of 
your inftru&ions, as fince hard fate fo cruelly 
opprefled me, and robbed me of every thing but 
rnyfelf. I am forfaken, I have loft all, but I 
yet remain, and defpair has not been able to an- 
nihilate me. Thefe letters will never reach youj 
at leaft, I cannot hope it. No doubt they will 
be loft without having been feen by any one; 
no matter, they are written, I collect them, I 

bind 



. OR, THE SOLITARIES. 177 

bind them together, I continue to write, and it 
is to you I addrefs them. I wifh to pi&ure to 
you thofe dear ideas which nourifh and wound 
my heart. I wilh to give you an account of 
myfelf, of my fentiments, of mycondudt, of this 
heart which you have given me. I will dif- 
clofe every thing to you — the good — the bad— 
my forrows — my pleafures — my faults; but I 
believe, I have nothing to fay that can dlfhonour 
your work. 

My happinefs was premature; it began with 
my birth, and was to end before my death. 
All my infant days were days of blifs, fpent in 
freedom, in joy, and in innocence. I never was 
taught to perceive any difference between my 
inftru&ions and my amufements. All remem- 
ber with delight the /ports of their childhood, 
but I am perhaps the only one whofe infant days 
were unclouded by forrow or reftraint. O ! that 
I had died when a child, I fhould then have en- 
joyed life, and not have known its calamities. 

I grew up and continued to be happy : at an 
age when the paffions are moft violent, I formed 
my reafon by my fenfes. What leads others 
into errour, led me into the path of truth. I 
learned to form a true judgement of all obje£rs 
that furrounded mc, and of their relation to my- 
felf. I judged of them on true and fimple prin- 
ciples; authority, opinion did not change my 
decifion^. In order to difcover the relation of 
things to one another, I ftudicd the relation of 
each to myfelf. By two known terms, I learned 

I 5 to 



178 EMfLIUS AND SOPHIA; 

to find the third. Td know every thing in the 
univerfe that could intereft me, it was fufficient 
that I knew myfelf ; my place being affigned, 
every thing elfe was found. 

I was thus taught that the greateft wifdom is 
to like that which is, and to regulate ourwifhes 
by our condition. This, you told me, is all 
that is in our power — the reft depends on Hea- 
ven. He, that ftruggles moft againft fate, is 
leaft wife, and always the moft unhappy 5 the 
greateft change he can effeft in his fituation is 
always lefs than the torment it cofts him. He 
feldom fucceeds, and gains nothing by fuccefs. 
But what feeling being can live always without 
defires, without attachments? It cannot be 
man, it muft be a brute or a god. Not being 
able to guard againft all the affe&ions which 
bind us to things, you taught me however to 
choofe among* them, not to open my mind but 
to the moft noble, not to attach it but to the 
moft worthy obje£t, to man; to multiply myfelf, 
as it were, in each of my fellow- beings, and 
thus to guard againft thofe degrading paffions 
which would confine me to my own perfon. 

"When my fenfes, awakened by age, ren- 
dered a companion neceflary, you tempered their 
violence by the delicacy of fentiment; imagi- 
nation, which inflames them in others, taught 
me to fubdue them. I loved Sophia even before 
I knew her : this love preferved my mind from 
the fnares of vice, gave it a tafte for the beau- 
tiful and becoming, and engraved on it, in in- 
delible 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 179 

delible chara&ers, the holy laws of virtue. 
When I afterwards beheld this dear obje& of my 
worfhip, when I felt the power of her charms,, 
all the plealing, all the ravi(hing ideas that can 
enter into a mind inflamed mine with fenfations, ; 
not to be exprefled. Happy days of my youthful 
loves, delicious days, why cannot you be for 
ever recommencing, and fill the whole mea- 
lure of my exiftence ! 1 would afk no other 
eternity.. 

Vain forrows! idle wHhes! All is gone,. 
gone without hope of return .... I obtained 
at laft the reward of fo many ardent fighs; all 
my wifhes were crowned. Though a hufband, 
ftill a lover, I found in the pofleffion of Sophia's 
charms, happinefs of another kind, but not lefs 
real- than in the delirium of defire. My friend 
you think you knew this enchanting girl. O 
how you have been miftaken ! You knew my 
miftrefs,my.wife; but you knew not Sophia. Her 
charms of every kind were inexhauilible, they 
feemed toincreafe every inftant, and the laft day 
of her exiftence difclofed many of which I was 
ignorant before. . 

Already father of two children, I divided my 
time between an adored wife, and the dear fruits 
of her tendcrnefs : you afiifted me in preparing 
for my fon an education like my own, and my 
daughter under the care of her mother would 
have learnt to refemble her. All my bufinefs 
confifted in the care of Sophia's patrimony ; I 
negle&ed my fortune to enjoy happinefs. De- 

I 6 ceitful 



180 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

ceifful happinefs ! thrice have I experienced thy* 
inconftancy. Thy zenith is but a point, and 
when our happinefs is at the higheft, then begins 
its declenfion. Cruel father! was it through you 
that this fatal declenfion was to begin? By 
what fatality could you quit the peaceable life we 
led together ? Vas my eagernefs to pleafe you 
difagreeable ? You were pleafed with your 
work ; I faw it, I perceived it, I was certain of 
it. You feemed to enjoy my happinefs; the 
tender carefles of Sophia feemed to folace your 
paternal heart ; .you loved us, you were happy 
in us, and yet you^forfook us! Had you not 
quitted us, I fhould ftill have been happy ; my 
fon perhaps would have lived, or other hands 
would not have clofed his eyes. His virtuous 
and beloved mother would alfo have lived in the 
arms of her hufband. Fatal reparation which 
has abandoned me without hope to all the 
rigours of fate! No, were you with u% 
.guilt and its punifliments had never approached 
my family; in this dreadful inftance your ab- 
fence was more fatal to us than your prefence 
had ever been falutary. 

Heaven foon ceafed to blefs a houfe in which 
you no longer refided. Calamities and afflic- 
tions fucceeded each other without intermif- 
fion. We loft, in a few months, the father, 
the mother of Sophia, and at length her daugh- 
ter, her charming daughter whom fhe fo ardent- 
ly longed for, whom fhe idolized, and whom 
fhe wifhed to follow* Her conftancy, unequal 

to 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 181 

to fo many fhocks, left her at this laft ftroke* 
Till now, content and quiet in folitude, fhe 
lad been ignorant of the forrows of life, (he 
had not armed again ft the attacks of fortune 
that heart which was fo fenfible, and eafily af- 
fected. She felt . thefe lofles, as firft misfortunes 
are felt; nor were they, indeed, any other than the 
beginning of our's. Nothing could dry up her 
tears : the lofs of her daughter made her feel more 
fenfibly that of her mother; calling continually 
on one or the other, £he made every place, where 
formerly fhe enjoyed their innocent carefles, 
refound with their names and her own afflic- 
tions : whatever objects recalled them to her 
mind increafed her grief. I refolved to remove 
her from this forrowful retreat. I had bufinefs 
in the capital, but which till then had never 
been fuch to me. I propofed to her to follow 
a female friend whom fhe knew in the neigh- 
bourhood, and who was obliged to go thither 
with her hufband. As fhe did not fee my 
motive, fhe con fen ted rather than be feparated 
from me. Her affliction was too dear to her 
to endeavour to affuage it. The only confolation 
that could be given her, was to fympathife— ta 
Weep with her. 

. On drawing near to the capital, my min^ was 
filled with fatal impreflions which I never expe- 
rienced before. The moft gloomy prepofTeffions 
arofc in my bofom All I had feen, all you 
had told me of great cities, made me tremble for 
my abode here. I was frightened at expofing fo 

pur* 



lga EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

pure an union to fo many furrounding dangers*. 
I trembled to think, on beholding the melan- 
choly Sophia, that I was precipitating fo much 
virtue, and fo many charms, into that gulf of 
prejudice and vices, where innocence and happi- 
nef9 are fure to be fliipwrecked. 

Certain, however, of her and of myfelf, I 
defpifed, contemned the remonftrances of pru- 
dence, and looked on my fears as groundlefs : 
while I fuffered them to torment me, I confi- 
dered them as illufions. Alas ! I did not expert 
to fee them fo foon and fo cruelly verified. I 
little imagined, that, infteadof finding danger in 
the capital, it followed me thither. 

How (hall I tell you of the two years we 
remained in that fatal city, and the cruel effe&- 
which that infe&ious refidence had on my mind,, 
and on my fortunes ? You know too well thofe 
fad calamities, rememberance of which, effaced 
by happier days, now doubles my forrows, by 
bringing me back to their fource. What a 
change was wrough in me, through myweak- 
nefs for two agreeable connexions, which habit 
began to change into friendfhip ! How did 
example and imitation, againft which you had 
fo ftrongly armed my mind, give it infenfibly a 
tafte for thofe frivolous pleafures, which,, when 
younger, I had defpifed ? How different is it 
to fee things by themfelves, and when our minds 
are diftra&ed by other objefts? The time was 
nowpaft, when my glowing imagination only 
defired Sophia, and fpurned every thing elfe. I 

was 



OR, -THE SOLITARIES. 183 

was no longer follicitous about her; I pofiefled 
her, and the power of her charms caft a 
luftre on thofe objects, which, in my youth, it 
had obfcured. But thefe objects foon weakened 
my defires by dividing them. My heart, gradu- 
ally relaxed by thefe frivolous amufemcnts, 
infenfibly loft its firft fpring, and became inca- 
pable of warmth or ftrength; I roved reftlefsly 
from pleafure to pleafure ; I fought after every 
thing, and grew tired of every thing; I liked 
only thofe places where I was not, and endea- 
voured to forget myfelf in diffipation. I expe- 
rienced a revolution, of which I wiflied not to 
convince myfelf ; I did not give myfelf time to 
return to myfelf, through a dread of not finding 
myfelf. All my attachments were leflened, all 
my affc&ions were cooled. I had fubfti- 
tuted a jargon of morality and fentiment in 
the place of truth. I was a gallant without 
paffion, a ftoick without virtue, a philofopher 
bufied about trifles. — I had nothing of your 
Emilius but the name, and fome profeflions. 
The freedom of my difcourfe, the independence 
of my fpirit, my pleafures, my duties — you— - 
my fon, even Sophia herfelf ; all that before ani- 
mated, that elevated my foul, and conftitutcd 
the plenitude of my exiftence, quitting me by 
degrees, feemed to make me quit myfelf, and 
left in my depraved mind only a troublefome 
fenfation of vacancy and abje&ion. In a word, 
I no longer loved, or at leaft thought fo. This 
violent flame, which feemed aim oft cxtinft, lay 

hid 



184 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

hi4* under the embers only to blaze forth fhortly 
with more fury than ever. 

But what is infinitely more inconceivable: 
how came it that fhe, who was the pride and 
happinefs of my life, now formed its lhame and 
defperation ? How fhall I defcribe fo deplorable 
a change ? No! the dreadful ftory fhall never 
come from my mouth nor my pen ; it is too inju~ 
riousto the memory of the beft of wives, too 
grievous, too horrible for my recollection, too 
difcouraging to virtue; I fhould die a hundred 
times over before I could finifh it. Morality of 
the world, ye fnares of vice and example, trea- 
chery of falfe friendship, inconftancy and weak- 
nefs of humanity, which of us is proof againft 
you? Oh! if Sophia has Ail lied her nature; 
what woman dare rely upon her's ? But what 
a foul muftthat have been, which, having fuch 
a heighth to fall, was able to recover herfelf. 

It is of your regenerated children that I am 
about to fpeak to you : all their errourshave been 
known to you: I fhall only fpeak of what 
regards their return to virtue, and is neceffary to 
throw light on the ftory of their repentance. 

Sophia confoled, or rather diflipated by her 
female friend* and by the focieties into which 
fhe led her, had no longer that decided tafte 
for private life and retirement; fhe forgot all 
fhe had loft, and almoft all that was left her. 
Her fon, as he grew up, became lefs dependent 
on her, and fhe by degrees learnt to be happy 
without him. I was myfelf no longer her Emi- 

lius: 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 185 

litis: I was but her hu {band, and the hu (band of 
a fafhionable woman in great cities is a man 

_ whom flie treats in publick with all poflible re- 
fped and attention, but whom me fees not in 
private. Our focieties were for a confiderable 
time the fame. They changed infenfibly. Each 
of us hoped to be more at eafe when at a 
diftance from the other's infpecYion. We were 
no longer one, we were two diftinct perfons; 
the tyranny of fafhion had divided us, and our 

' "hearts fought no re-union. We never faweach 
other, but when our country neighbours, or 
town friends brought us together. The wife, 
after feveral. advances, ■ which I had fometimes 
no fmall difficulty to refift, was at length dif- 
gufted, and attaching herfelf entirely to Sophia, 
they became infeparable. The hufband paffed 
much of his time in company with his wife, 
and of confequence with mine. Their exte- 
rior deportment was regular and decent, but 
their maxims fhould have alarmed me. Their 
harmony proceeded lefs from a real attachment, 
than from a mutual indifference to the duties of 
their ftate. Little jealous of their reciprocal 
rights, they pretended their love was the greater, 
as they impofed lefs reftraint on each other; and 
neither was offended in not being the object of 
the other's attention. " Above all (faid the wife) 
letmyhulband live happy." — " Provided my wife 
be my friend (I am contented faid the huflband). 
Our fentiments, continued he, do not depend on 
©urfelvcs, but our actions do; each contributes 

as 



186 EMIL1US AND SOPHIA* 

as much as poffible to the happinefs of the other.. 
Can we better fliow our love for thofe who are 
dear to us, than by agreeing to all they defire? 
We avoid the cruel neceffity of flying from 
each other." 

This fyftem, abruptly laid open, fhould have 
{hocked us. But it is not eafy to imagine* 
what power the overflowings of friendfhip have, 
in reconciling us to things which otherwife 
would difguft us; nor how much a philofophy*. 
fo well adapted to the vices of human nature — 
a philofophy which, inftead of thofe afFe&ions 
we are no longer capable of entertaining — inftead 
of that inward duty which torments and bene- 
fits no one, prefents — Nothing but politenefs* 
refpeft, complaifance, attention — Nothing but. 
freedom, liberty, fincerity, confidence. :. it is not 
eafy, I fay, to imagine what charms every thing 
that maintains an union between the perfons, 
when the hearts are no longer united, has for the 
beft difpofitions, and how attractive it becomes 
under the mafk of propriety. Reafon would 
with difficulty defend herfelf, if confeience did 
not come to her aid. It was this that made 
Sophia and me afhamed to fhow a fondnefs 
which we had not. Our two friends, who had 
fubjugated us, quarrelled without reftraint, and 
thought they loved one another. But an. 
habitual, refpedt which we could not lay afide, 
made it impollible for us to give mutual pain. 
without fhunning each other. Though we 
appeared to be a burthen to each other, we were 

nearer 



OR, THE SOLITARIES^ 187 

jiearer a reconciliation than thofe who were 
always together. Not to quit one another when 
in anger is a fure fymptom of eternal difunion. 

But when our difunion was moft evident, 
every thing changed in the moft extraordinary 
manner poifible. Sophia, on a fudden, became 
as fedentary and retired as (he was before diffi- 
pated. Her temper, naturally unequal, became 
* continually fad and gloomy. Shut up from 
morning to night in her chamber, without 
fpeajcing* without weeping, without regarding 
any one, (he could not bear to be interrupted. 
Even her female friend became infupportable to 
her: (he told her fo, and gave her an ih Recep- 
tion without preventing her return : fhe befought 
me more than once to deliver her from her. I 
quarrelled with her for this caprice, which I at- 
tributed to jealoufy. I even told her of it one 
day in jeft. " No, Sir, lam not jealous (an- 
fwered (he, with a cold and decided air) but I 
deteft that woman, and all I afk of you is, that 
I may never fee her." Struck with thefe words, 
1 deli red to know the caufe of her hatred : fhe 
refufed to anfwer me. She had already denied 
admittance to the hufband; I was obliged to 
treat the wife in the fame manner, and we faw 
them no more. 

Her melancholy, however, continued and be- 
came alarming. I began to be difturbed by it ; 
but how fhould I find out the caufe which fhe 
perfifted in concealing? I could not pretend to 
di&ate to fo haughty a foul : we had ceafed for 

fo 



tiS EMILIUS AtfD' SOPHIA; 

fo long a time to be the confidents of each other, 
that I was little furprifed fhe difdained to unbo- 
fom herfelf to me. It was neceffary to merit 
that confidence; and whether her afflidking me- 
lancholy had rekindled an extinguifhed paifion, 
or that the flame only waited an opportunity of 
blazing out afrefli, 1 perceived no great effort 
was neceffary on my partj to {how her all the 
attentions by which I hoped to conquer her fi- 
lence. 

I quitted her no more : but it was. in vain 
that I returned to her, and marked my return 
with the moft tender anxiety ; I faw with for- 
row that I made no advances. I attempted to 
refume the privileges of a hufband, which I had 
too long renounced : I experienced the moft in- 
vincible refiftance. It was no longer thofe fti- 
mulating denials given to enhance the value of 
what is granted, nor yet thofe tender and mo- 
deft, but abfolute refufak which intoxicated me 
with love while I was forced to rcfpe£ them. 
They were the ferious repulfes of a decided mind 
which confiders doubt as an infult. She re- 
minded me with vehemence of thofe engagements 
formerly entered into in your prefence. " How- 
ever it may be (faid fhe,) with regard to me, you 
fliould fet a proper value upon yourfelf, and re- 
fpe£t for ever the promife of Emilius. My 
faults do not authorife you to violate your own 
promifes. You may punifh me, but you cannot 
force me, and be affured I fhall never admit your 
embraces." What could I anfwer, what could 

I do, 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. jgg 

I do, but try to move her, to foften her, to con- 
quer her obftinacy by perfeverance ? Thefe 
vain efforts at once excited my love and my 
pride. Difficulties inflamed my heart, and I 
made it a point of honour to furmount them. 
!Never, perhaps, after ten years of marriage, and 
^ after fo long an eftrangement, did the paffion of 
Plfc hufband blaze forth with more violence. I 
never, during the firft ardour of my paffion, fhed 
fo many tears at her feet ; yet all was in vain — • 
fhe remained inexorable. 

I was as much furprifed as afflicted, knowing 
well that this inflexibility of heart was not na- 
tural to her. I was not difheartened ; and, if I 
did not overcome her obftinacy, I imagined I 
faw in it lefs averfion. Some figns of forrow 
and pity tempered the bitternefs of her refufals ; 
I fometimes thought it was with pain fhe de- 
nied me — her languid eyes let fall on me fome 
looks not lefs forrowful, but lefs wild, and which 
feemed to indicate companion. I fuppofed that 
the fhame of fuch exceffive caprice rendered her 
fo obdurate, that fhe perfevered as not being able 
to excufe herfelf, and that perhaps fhe waited 
only for a little compulfion, that fhe might feem 
to give to force what fhe dared not now beftow 
of herfelf. Struck with an idea which flattered 
my defires, I gave myfelf up to it with tran- 
fport; I wifhcd to pay this additional attention 
to her that I might fpare her the embarraflment 
of yielding after fo long a refiftance. 

■ 

One 



*9& , EMlLltTS AND SOPHIA* 

One day, 'when carried away by defire, I 
joined, to the moft tender Applications the moft 
ardent careffes ; I faw fhe was moved, I endea- 
voured to complete my vi&ory. Opprefled and 
palpitating, fhe was neat yielding ; when on a 
fudden, changing her air and whole deportment, 
(he puflied me back with inexpreffible violence ^_ 
and agitation, and beholding me with an eye- 
Which fury and defpair rendered dreadful— 
** Hold Emilius (faid Che) and know that I am 
no longer your's ; another has defiled your bed— 
I am with child — our perfons fhall never be 
united— " and, rufhing with impetuofity into 
lier dofet, fhe fhut the door. 

I remain confounded.—— 

My friend, this is not the hiftory of the 
events of my life; they are little worthy to be 
related ; it is the hiftory of my paflions, of my 
feelings, of my ideas. Suffer me to fpeak at 
large of the moft terrible revolution that evef 
my heart experienced. 

The greater Wounds of the mind, as well as 
of the body, do not bleed the moment they are 
given, nor is the pain they occafion immediately 
felt. Nature colle&s all her force to fuftain 
its violence* and the mortal wound is often given 
before it is felt. At this unexpe&ed fcene, at 
fhefe words which my ears feemed to fhut out, 
t remain motionlefs, annihilated; myeyesclofe, 
a deadly cold runs through my veins ; without 
fainting, I feel all my fenfe's benumbed, all my 
faculties fufpended; an univerfal anarchy reigns 

5 in 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 



igt 



Iti my mind, like the chaotick appearance of a 
changing theatre, when the prefent fccne dif- 
appears to give place to a new creation. 

I am ignorant how long I remained in this 
fituation, on my knees, and without daring to 
move, left I fliould difcover that all which had 

ppened was not a dream, I wifh that this 
e of ftupefa&ion had lafted for ever. Being 

ufed at length, my firft fenfation was an in- 
explicable horror for every thing that furrounded 
me. I rife immediately, I rufti out of the room 
and down flairs, without feeing any thing, with- 
out fpeaking to any one; I get out into the 
ftreet, and, with hafty ftrides, fly away with 
the rapidity of a flag, which thinks to avoid, by 
his velocity, the dart he carries buried in his 
fide. 

Thus I ran without flopping, without mode- 
rating my flight, into a publick garden. The 
fight of day, and of the heavens, was a burthen 
to me ; I fought for darknefs under the trees : 
at length, being out of breath, I let myfelf fall, 
balf dead, upon the grafs — Where am I? What 
is become of me ? What have I beard ? What a 
cataftrophe? Madman! what a chimera have 
you followed r Love, honour, faith, virtue, 
what is become of you r The elevated, the no- 
ble Sophia, is nothing but a proftitute ! This 
exclamation, extorted by defpair, was followed 
by fuch agonies of mind, that, choaked with my 
fobs, my breath and utterance remained fufpend- 
ed. Had it not been for the ftorm of pallion 
that 






1 9 2 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

that followed, this agony would have ftrangled 
me. O who could cxprefs that conflict of dif- 
ferent fenfations, which fhamc, love, rage, for- 
row, pity, jcaloufy, raifed all at once in my 
mind. No, fuch actuation, fuch awarofpaf- 
fions, cannot be described. The intoxications 
of extreme joy, which by an uniform progreffion 
fecms to dilate-, and, as it were, rarefy our 
. whole being, wceafiJy conceive. But when ex- 
ceflivc anguiih affembles in the breafl of a fingle 
wretch all the furies of hell; when, wounded on 
every fide by a thoufand different flings, he feels 
all without being able to diftiuguifli any; when 
torn a hundr«d different ways, by a hundred 
different cords — multiplied in his fufferings, he 
feems to lofe the unity of his being, and every 
fingle torment takes up his whole exiftence. 
Such was my fituation, and fuch it remained 
during feveral bouts — How flial] I picture it to 
you? Volumes would be necefTary to defcribe 
the fufferings of every fingle inftant. Happy 
mortals ! you, whofe narrow and frozen minds 
are infenfible to every thing but the viciflitudes 
of fortune, undifturbed by every paflion but the 
defire of gain, may you always confider this 
dreadful ftate as a fiction, and never experience 
the cruel torments, which thedifunion of more 
worthy attachments occafions, in hearts capable 
of feeling them. . 

Our powers are bounded, and all violent emo- 
tions have their intervals. In one of thofc mo- 
ments of fufpenfion, when nature prepares hcr- 
felf 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 193 

fclf for new fufferings I happened to think on 
a fudden of my youth — of you, my friend — of 
your inftrudions. I recollected that I was a 
man, and I afked myfelf immediately, What 
injury have I fullered in my perfon ? What crime 
have I committed? What part of myfelf have 
i I loft? If at this moment I were to fall, fuch 
L^.M I am, from the clouds to commence my ex- 
P?iftence, could I confider myfelf as an unhappy 
I being? This reflexion, quicker than lighten- 
ing, illumined my mind for an inftant: I foon 
I loft this light, but it was fufficient to difcover 
me to myfelf. I faw myfelf clearly in my place : 
the ufe I made of this moment of reafon was to 
learn that I was incapable of reafoning. The 
dreadful agitation that reigned in my mind pre- 
vented me from taking notice of any object : I 
was not in a condition to fee any thing, to com- 
pare, to deliberate, to refolve, to judge. All 
attempts, therefore, to difcover by deliberation 
w hat was beft to be done, would have been but 
*n ufelefs torment > they would have aggravated 
toy fufferings to no purpofe, and my only care 
^as to gain time, that I might compofe my 
| e nfes and fettle my imagination, I believe this 
,s the only thing you could have done yourfelij 
***d you been prefent to inftruA me. Deter- 
"^ined to let the fury of thofe paflions fubfiJe 
^hich I could not overcome, I fet about this 
r ^folution with a kind of voluptuous dtfpcration, 
as having removed all the obilaclcs to my giief. 
1 rife with precipitation, I proceed to walk as 
Vol. IV. K before 



1^ + feMltltJS AND SOPHIA) 

before without following any determinate path : 
I run, I Wander different ways ; I give up my 
body to all the agitation of my mind ; I follow 
its fuggeftion without reftraint ; I put myfelf 
out of breath* and, increafing the difficulty of 
refpiration by the frequency of my fighs, I feel 
myfelf at times on the point of fuffocation. 

The violence of this exercife diverted my 
painj by fufpending my feelings. Inftincl, in 
violent paflions, fuggefts certain exclamations* 
motions, and geftures, which give vent to the 
fpirits, and turn the tide of paffion another way. 
Agitation is but a fymptom of rage. A gloomy 
filence is more to be dreaded $ it is the neighbour 
of defpair. That very night, I experienced this 
difference in a manner almoft to be laughed at 5 
if any thing* that fhows the folly and mifery of 
mankind, could appear fo to man. 

After innumerable wanderings, of which I 
was altogether unconfeious, I found myfelf m 
the middle of the city, furrounded by carriages, 
in the neighbourhood of a theatre, and about the> 
hour of its opening. I fhould have been tram- 
pled upon by the crowd, if fomebody, who pull- 
ed me by the arm, had not told me of my dan- 
ger: I throw myfelf into a door that was open; 
it was a cofFee-houfe. I was there accofted by 
people of my acquaintance, who, after telling 
me I know not what, carry me I know not 
where. Struck with the found of mufick and 
the fplendour of the lights, I come to myfelf, 
I open my eyes and look about me : I find my- 
felf 



CRj THE SOLITARIES. 195 

felf in the pit, on the night of a ftrft reprefenta- 
tion, prefled by the crowd, and unable to get 
tout. 

I trembled; but I refigned myfelf to my fitua- 
tion ; I faid nothing ; I preferved an air of ap- 
parent tranquillity 'however dear it coft me. 
The noife was great, and of the perfons fpeak- 
ing on all fides of me, fome addreffed themfelves 
to me; underftanding nothing, what anfwer 
could I give ? But one of thofe who had brought 
me there, having accidentally mentioned my 
wife, at this fatal name, I fent fotth a piercing 
cry which was heard by all the affembly, and 
occafioned much noife. I quickly compofed 
myfelf, and every thing was quiet. However, 
having by this cry attra&ed the attention of thofc 
who. flood round me, I fought the moment of 
•efcape, and, drawing near the door by degrees, 
I at length got out before they had finifhed. 

On entering the ftreet, happening to look at 
my hand, which I had kept in my bofom during 
the whole reprefentation, I faw that my fingers 
were ftained with blood, and I thought I felt 
fome trickling down my breaft. I open my bo- 
fom, I look, I find it bloody and lacerated like 
the heart it encloled. You may eafily imagine 
that a fpeclator, undiflurbed, in fuch circum- 
ftances, was no very good judge of the piece he 
had fecn performed. 

1 quickened my pace,, trembling left I fhould 
be again met with; night favouring my wander- 
ings, I fet about walking the ftreets a fecond 

K 2 time, 



f 9 6 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

time, as if to make amends for the reftraint I 
had juft experienced. I wandered for feveral 
hours without refting one moment ; at length, 
being hardly able to fupport myfelf, and finding 
that I was near home, I enter, not without a 
dreadful palpitation of the .heart. I aflc where 
my fon is, 1 am told he is afleep ; I remain filent 
and figh ; my fervants wifli to fpeak to me ; I 
command them to be filent; I throw myfelf on 
my bed, and defire them all to go to reft. After 
a few hours repofe, worfe than the agitation of 
the preceding day, I rife before it is light, and 
croffing the apartments without noife, come to 
Sophia's chamber, there, unable to reftrain my- 
felf, with the moft defpicable meannefs, I cover 
with a thoufand kifles, and bathe with a torrent 
of tears., the thiefhold of her door; retreating 
then with the fear and precaution of a guilty 
perfon, I walk quietly out of the houfe, refolved 
never to re-enter it. 

Here ended my violent but fhort-lived folly, 
and I again recover my fenfes. I even believe 
that I did right in yielding in the beginning to 
a pafiion which I could not conquer, that I might 
govern it afterwards when its firft violence fhould 
be fpent. The impulfe, by which I was now 
governed, difpofmg me to compaflion, rage was 
fucceeded by melancholy, and I faw too plainly 
the profoundeft affliction engraven in indelible 
characters in the bottom of my heart. I ad- 
vanced, however, and removed from the dread- 
ful place, lefs rapidly than the day before, but 

more 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 197 

more diredly. I got out of the city, and follow- 
ing the firft high road journeyed on with flow 
and faultering fteps, which mowed weaknefs 
and dejeftion. As the day began to difcover 
the. objects around me, I thought I faw another 
fky, another earth, another world ; to me every 
thing was changed. I was no longer the fame 
- pcrfon as the day before — or rather I was no.v 
no more; it was my own death I had to lament, 
O! how* many delicious recollections beficged 
my afflicted heart, and forcing it to give place 
to their delightful images, ended in all the bit- 
ternefs of unavailing regret! All my paft enjoy- 
ments aggravated the fenfarion of my prefent 
loffes, and tormented me more now than thev 
had ever given me pleafure. Ah ! how dreadful 
thfe change experienced by him who falls in an 
inftant from the height of blifs to the deepeft 
abyfs of mercy, and paflcs that immenfe inter- 
val without a moment's preparation ! Yefter- 
day, even yefterday, at the feet of an adored 
wife, I was the happieft of mortals ; it w;;s love 
that fubjecled me to her laws— that kept me in 
her dependence : her tyrannick power was the 
effect of my paffion, and I was even happy in 
her cruelties. 

Why was it not given me to pafs the courfe 
of ages in this too charming ftatc — to efteem — 
to refpect — tochcrifh her — to deplore her tyran- 
ny — to endeavour to move her, without ever 
fucceeding— to demand, implore, fupplicate — to 
afk without end, and never to obtain any thing. 

K 3 Thofe 



198 . EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

Thofe times, thofe delicious times of expected 
kindnefs, of deceitful hope, were equal to the 
days of certainty and enjoyment, Now, hated, 
betrayed, difhonoured, without hope, without 
refource* I have not even the confolation of 

daring to wifli that I flopped, feifed 

with horrour. at the object to be fubftituted in- 
the place of her whofe charms had filled my 
foul. To hehold Sophia difhonoured and defpi- 
cable ! What eyes could bear fuch a profana- 
tion ? My moft cruel torment was not the con- 
templation of my own mifery, but the neceflity 
of affociating with it, the infamy of her who had 
caufed it : this diftre fling idea was the only one 
I could not fupport. 

The wild infenfibility of my fofrows had fe- 
cured me the day before from this dreadful 
image; I thought of nothing but of Tuffering, 
But in proportion as the reflexions that torment- 
ed me arranged themfelves in my mind, com- 
pelled to trace them to their fource, I pictured 
to my lei f, againft my will, this fatal object. 
The weaknefs I difcovered in departing, too 
well fhowed the unworthy defire I had to return. 
The hatred file merited required not fo great an 
effort, as thedifdain which muft accompany it; 
to renounce her would have been eafy, had I 
not been obliged to defpife her. 

My firft reflexions on her were fevere : if the 
infidelity of an ordinary woman be a crime, 
what name fhall we give it in her? Low minds 
arc not debafed by vile actions, they remain the 

fame; 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 199 

« 

fame; they cannot be difgraced, becaufe they 
cannot fink lower than they are. The adulte- 
ries of the women of the world are no more than 
gallantries ; but Sophia an adulterefs is the mod 
odious of all monfters; the diftance between 
what (he was, and what fhe is, is immenfe. No! 

. there is no difgrace, no crime equal to her's. 

44 But I who ace ufe her (refumed I) and that 
but too juftly, as it is mc (he has offended; as 
it is to me fhe has ungratefully given a mortal 
ftab, what right have 1 to judge her fo feverely, 
before I am judged myfclf, before I know what 
fliare of her faults I fhould reproach myfelf 
with ? You accufc her of being no more the 
fame! O, Emilius! and are you not changed ? 
How different from your former was your late 
behaviour to her! Ah! her inconftancy has 
been occafioned by your's. She fvvore to be 
faithful to you; and did not you fwear to adore 
her for ever ? You abandon her, and you ex- 
peel that fhe will be faithful; you defpife her, 
and you wifh to be always honoured by her. It 
is your coldnefs, your forgetfulnefs, your indif- 
ference that have torn you from her heart ; to 
be always loved it is neceflary to be always amia«* 

. ble. She only violated her engagements by 
your example; you fhould not have neglefted 
her, and fhe would never have betrayed you. 

■ What caufeof complaint did fhe give you, in 
that retreat, where you found her, and where 
you fhould always have left her? What' cool - 
nefs did you remark in her affections ? Was it 

K4 at 



200 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA) 

at her rcqueft you removed her from that happy 
fpot? She quitted it, you know, with mortal 
regret. The tears fhe flied there were more 
pleafing to her than the idle amufements of the 
city. She there pafled her innocent life in 
making your's happy : but flie loved you better 
than her own tranquillity; after having endea- 
voured to keep you, (he quitted every thing to 
follow you. It is you, who, from the bofom 
of peace and virtue, drew her into that abyfs of 
vice and mifery, into which you plunged youj;- 
felf. Alas! her fidelity and your happinefs de- 
pended on yourfelf alone. 

O, Emilius ! you have ruined her ; you (hould 
hate yourfelf and pity h*r j but what right have 
you to defpife her? Are you yourfelf without 
reproach ? Has the world made no change in 
your mind ? You have not fhared her infidelity, 
but have you not prepared an excufe for it by 
ceafing to honour her virtue ? Did you not oc- 
cafion it by living in a place where virtue is held 
in derifion, where women would blufh to be 
chafte, where the only reward of female honour 
is to be laughed at and difbelieved? Was the fi- 
delity, which you have not violated, expofed to 
the fame dangers ? Have you, like her, that 
conftitution of fire, which gives birth to the 
greater! weakneifes as well as to the greateft 
virtues? Have you the excufe of a frame, the 
workmanfhip of love, expofed to dangers by its 
charms, and to temptations by its feelings ? O 
now the fituation of fuch a woman is to be pi- 
tied ! 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 201 

tied ! How muft not flie combat, without breath- 
ing, without ceafing, againft others, againft her- 
felf ! What invincible courage, what obfiinate 
rcfiftance, what heroick firmnefs are necciiary 
to her! What chingerous victories has not fhe 
to gain every day, without any other witnefs of 
her triumphs than Heaven and her own heart ! 
And after fo many glorious years thus paficd in 
fufrerings, in ftruggles, in inceflant victories — 
one moment of weaknefs — one iingle inftant of 
remiffnefs anJ inadvertency — fullics for ever that 
fpotlefs life, and diflionours fo many virtues. 
Haplefs woman ! Alas! one moment of errour 
is the caufe of your misfortunes and mine. Ye?, 
her heart remained uiidcfiled, every thing con- 
vinces me of it. I know it too well to be mif- 
taken. Ah ! who knows into what fnares the 
perfidious artifices of a vicious woman, jealous 
of her virtues, may have drawn her innocent 
fimplicity? Did I not perceive her regret, her 
repentance in her eyes ? Was it not her melan- 
choly that brought me to her feet ? Was it not 
her moving forrows that rcftored me all my ten- 
derness ? Ah ! this is not the artful conduct of 
an unfaithful woman, that deceives herhufband, 
and triumphs in her treachery ! 

Reflecting afterwards on ail the particular 
circumftanccs of her conduct and her aftonifhing 
declaration, what were my fenfations to fee the 
molt timid and modeft of her fex overcome 
fhame by candour — rejet an cft-jem which her 
heart belied — difdain to prefcrve n.y confidence 

K 5 and 



2©2 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

and her reputation by hiding a fault which no- 
thing obliged her to difclofe — or by covering jt 
with careffes which fihe rejected, and afraid to 
ufurp my paternal tendernefs for a child that 
was not mine? How I admired the invincible 
haughtinefs of courage, which, at the price of 
honour and life, could not defcend to a false- 
hood, and preferved, even in guilt, the intrepid 
audacity of virtue! Yes (faid I to myfelf with 
fecret approbation) though covered with infamy, 
this exalted foul preferves all her vigour, {he is 
guilty without being vile; fibe has committed a 
fault, but could never defcend to meannefs. 

Thus, by degrees, the inclination of my heart 
brought me to pafs a judgement in her favour, 
more mild and more fupportable. Without justi- 
fying, I excufed her 5 without pardoning her 
faults, I applauded her good conduit. I pleafed 
myfelf with thefe fentiments ; I could not get 
rid of all my love, and to retain it without eftecm 
would have been cruel. As foon as I thought 
I owed her any, I felt an unexpected relief. Man 
is too weak to fupport emotions of extreme vio- 
lence for any confiderable time. In the height 
of defpair Providence prepares for us fome par- 
ticle of confolation. Notwithftanding the hor- 
rour of my fituation, I felt a kind of joy in con- 
fidering Sophia as eftimable and unhappy; un- 
able to confider her with indifference, I em- 
braced with pleafure every reafon that feemed to 
juftify my partiality. Inftead of the gloomy 
forrow which before preyed on me, I had the 

pleafure 



-OR, THE SOLITARIES. 203 

pleafure of melting into tears. She is loft to 
me for ever: I know it (faidl;) but at leaft I 
{hall dare to think again of her, 1 (hall dare to 
mourn for her, I fhall dare, at times, to lament, 
and figh without blufhing. 

However, I had continued my journey, and, 
diftra&ed with thefe ideas, I had walked all day 
without being confciouus of it; till coming 
at length to myfelf, and not being fupported by 
the refentment of the preceding day, I perceived 
myfelf fo weak and fpent, as to require nourifh- 
ment and reft. Thanks to the exercifes of my 
youth, I was robuft and ftrong. I dreaded, 
neither hunger nor fatigue; but my affli&ed 
mind had tormented my body, and you had 
guarded me tetter againft violent paffions than 
you had taught me, to fupport them. It was 
with difficulty I reached.a village, which was yet 
a league off. As it was near thirty fix hours fince 
I had tafted any thing, I fupped, and with appe- 
tite ; I went to reft, delivered from thofe hor- 
rours which had tormented me, conftant in dar- 
ing to think of Sophia, and almoft joyful in 
imagining her lefs disfigured, and more worthy . 
■of my regret than I had hoped. 

My fatigues gave way . to a found fleep, 
which lafted without interruption till morning. 
The pangs of forrow, the attacks of misfortune, 
refpe£t the hours of repofe ; remorfe alone for- 
bids, or poifons that necefiary relaxation. 
When I arofe, I felt myfelf in a ftateof mind 
fufficiently calm for deliberation, and haftened 

K 6 to 



204 EMIL1US AND SOPHIA; 

to confider what refolution I (hould take. This 
was the mod memorable, as well as the morft 
cruel period of my life. Every tie broken, 
every duty transferred, every relation altered, 
nothing remained, with regard to me, of what 
it was before, and I became in a manner a new 
being. That a determination of fo much impor- 
tance might not want fufEcient time for reflec- 
tion, I continued my journey to the next town, 
and finding out a mafter carpenter began to 
work at my trade, till the fermentation of my 
fpirits (hould totally fubfide, and the medium 
be removed through which I at prefent faw 
every objeft. 

Never did I more ftrongly feel the power of 
Education than at this dreadful moment. Born 
with a fenfibility yielding to the flighteft attack, 
with a mind open to every alarm, and irrefolute 
under every preffure, I became, after the fir ft 
fhock was over, fully mafter of myfelf, ami 
capable of confidering my own fituation with 
as much tranquillity as that of any other perfon. 
Docile to the law of necefiity, I for bore all una- 
vailing murmurs; I bowed my will beneath the 
inevitable yoke ; I renounced all relation to every 
thing that was pad, I confidered my prefent 
fituation as the commencement of a new life, 
and looking up to it for the rules of my future 
conduft, in hopes that a little time would 
rn^ke me acquainted with them, I betook my- 
felf quietly to work, as if I had been the hap- 
pieft of men. 

To 



" OR, THE SOLITARIES. 205 
To give up . myfelf entirely to whatever 
obje& I am employed upon ; never to do one 
thing and let my thoughts wander to another, 
which indeed is no better than doing nothing 
and being nowhere; this, of all your falutary 
leflbns, made the greateft impreflion on me 
even from my infancy. All the day therefore 
I attended to nothing but my work; at night 
I refumed my reflexions, and by this alternation 
of mental and corporeal exercife, I employed 
all the foUrccs of both, without exhaufting the 
vigour of either. 

The firft night, purfuing the thread of my 
ideas of the evening before, I examined whether 
I might not lay too great a ftrefs on the crime of 
a woman, and whether what I conceived to be 
an irremediable calamity was not an accident too 
common to call forth emotions fo violent. "It 
is certain (faid I ) that wherever any attention is 
paid to the morals of the people, the wife's infi- 
delity reflects diflionour on the hufband: but 
"it is no lefs certain, that in great cities, and 
wherever clfe men think themfelves more 
enlightened, only becaufe they are more depra- 
ved, fucha punishment appears ridiculous and 
unjuft." Is the hufoand's honour, fay they, in the 
pofleiTioncf his wife? Can his misfortune ren- 
der him criminal, or the vices of another perfon 
involve his difgrace? The contrary opinion 
may boaft fupcrior ftri&nefs; this is more con- 
formable to rcal'on. 

Be fides j 



a o6 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

Befides, what judgement foever may be pafled 
upon my a&ions, was I not, fyftematically 
and by principle, above publick opinion? what 
fignified to me the approbation of others, fo 
long asbyjuftice, honour, humanity, I merited 
rny own ? Was it a crime to be mercfful ? a dif- 
grace to pardon an offenfe ? What new rule of 
action was I gojng to adopt ? Had I fo long 
defpifed the prejudices of the world, to make a 
facrifice to it at laftof myhappinefs. 

And though thefe prejudiced were never fo 
well founded, how could they take effect in a 
cafe fo different from all others? What refem- 
blance between the felf-de voted victim of de- 
fpair in one, from whom remorfe alone extorts 
an avowal of her crime, and thofe unprincipled 
females, who cover their guilt with hypocrify 
and fraud ; or, exchanging candour for effron- 
tery, make a boaft of their diflionpur ? The 
woman who is depraved in principle, and who 
defpifesher duty at the fame time that {he violates 
it, is unworthy of the flighted indulgence, and 
to tolerate her infamy is to fhare in) it. But 
file who, though fullied with the crime y is not 
degraded by the habit, and whofe fault is ex- 
ceeded by her repentance, is an object rather of 
companion than of hatred : we may both pity 
and pardon her without reproach: nay, her 
tranfgreflion in one inftance will be her fecurity 
in all others. Sophia, refpectable in fpite of her 
crime, will be venerable in her repentance ; the 
pangs a heart like her's muft have felt, in its 

departure 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 207 

departure from virtue, will infure her future 
fidelity; to the firmnefs which preferves female 
honour, fhe will add the modefty that makes 
it amiable ; the bitternefs of repentance will 
bumble that proud heart, and lighten the weight 
of that authority, which love gave her over 
me; fibe will be at once more gentle in its 
exercife, and more ftudious of its maintenance : 
in a word, . the commiffion of a fingle fault will 
ferve to cure her of an habitual defect. 

When the heart is bajred againft the paffions, 
while they prefent themfelves in their own form, 
they put on the mafk of wifdom, and attack us by 
furprife ; they borrow the language of reafon 
to feduce us from her maxims. Their fophi- 
ftry in the prefent cafe impofed on me, only 
becaufe it flattered my inclination. I wifhed 
to find or make a return to Sophia poflible, 
guilty as (he was ; and whatever feemed to au- 
thorife the degenerate wifli was heard with 
complacency; ftill my reafon, lefs tractable 
than my heart, refufed to adopt thefe illufions. 
I was confeious that I fought fuch arguments 
to cloud my underftanding, not to enlighten it. 
Refuming my fortitude, though with many pain- 
ful efforts, I recollected that the maxims of 
the world have no authority over the man who 
Conftitutes himfelf the judge of his own actions, 
and that if a choice mult be made between con- 
tradictory prejudices, thofe which favour virtue 
have an additional prejudice on their fide : 
that the wife's irregularities are juftly imputable 

to 



2C8 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

to the hufband, either for having made an ill 
choice of his partner, or an ill ufe of his autho- 
rity ; that the juftice of fuch an imputation 
was confirmed by my own example, and that if 
Emilius had never erred, Sophia had never fallen; 
that it is juftly to be prefumed that the woman 
who refpe&s not herfelf will refpeft her hufband 
if he merits it, and knows how to preferve his 
authority; that his fault in not preventing the 
diforderly conduct of his wife is aggravated by 
the infamy of tolerating it ; that impunity in 
fuch inftances draws after it confequences the 
molt fatal, and betrays in the perfon who allows 
it a ftupid difregard of all that is valuable, 
and a meannefs of fpirit deferving univerfal 
contempt. 

Above all, when I brought thefe confiderations 
home to my own cafe, I perceived that what 
rendered it defperate, was not fo much what 
Sophia had loft of her worth, as what £he re- 
tained of it : fhe whom weaknefs betrays, or 
forgetfulnefs leads ailray, may acquire force 
from her hufband's fupport, or recover her rea- 
fon by his remonftranccs ; but how reclaim her, 
whofe fpirit is unbroken by her crime, who is 
confeiousof the merit (he retains, as well as of 
the virtue (he violate?, and who errs only in 
fuch manner and meafure as (he pleafes. Yes, 
Sophia is guilty, becauie (he wiftied to be fo. 
Since that proud heart has triumphed over (hamc, 
it might have conquered any other paiiion : it 
would not have required a greater effort to 

per- 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 209 

pcrfcvere in fidelity, than to confefs the viola- 
tion of it. 

In vain (hould I return to my wife ; fhe can 
never return to me. If the woman who loved me, 
and whom I loved fo ardently, fo fondly, has 
been capable of injuring me in this point — if 
my Sophy has torn afundcr the firft attachments 
of her heart — if fhe has made the firft breach in 
the nuptial faith till then whole and unvio- 
lated — if the fervour of love unoffended, the 
-pride of virtue unreproached, have not been able 
to prevent her firft fault, what will prevent her 
relapfe i In the path of vice the firft ftep is the 
only painful one; the reft are not only without 
remorfe, but almoft without reflexion. She 
has nothing now to preferve ; neither love, nor 
virtue, nor efteem; nothing to lofe by offending 
me, not even the regret that accompanies a firil 
offenfe. She knows my heart ; £he knows fhe 
has already made me as wretched as I can ever 
be; what matters it then to her how often fhe 
repeats the blow. 

Ah ! I know hcr's too: No ! never will So- 
phia love the man whom fhe has furnifhed with 

a right of defpifing her She loves me, then, 

no longer — No! ihe foid fo herfelf. — Ah falfe 
one ! there, there is the worft and grcateft of 
all your crimes! All the reft I could have for- 
given ycu ; but that I never can. 

Alas! refumed I, in all the bitternefs of re- 
collection, I talk of forgiving, and reflect not 
that the offender never can forgive, though 

the 



21© EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

the offended may. If her hatred is proportioned 
to the mifery fhe hath brought on me — : heavens ! 
what muft the extent of that hatred be ! 

Ah, Emilius! you judge of the future by the 
paft ; but how much are you miftaken ! Every 
thing is changed : in vain would you take her 
again to your bofom; the happy days you gave 
each other are fled for ever. You can no more 
find your Sophia, nor your Sophia her Emilius. 
Our fituations are what the mind makes them; 
or, if things remain the fame, the eyes with, 
which we foe them are different. 

Her heart is not corrupted ; I know it : fhe 
may yet merit my efteem, poffefs all my tender* 
nefs, and reftore me her whole affections ; but 
fhe cannot undo what {he has already done, nor 
blot out her crime from my memory and hec 
own. Fidelity, virtue, love, every thing may 
return except that unbounded confidence without 
which regret, difguft, and defpair are theinfepara- 
ble attendants of the marriage ftate. The charm 
of innocence is fled; it is over; whether with 
me or without me happinefs is for ever fled 
from Sophia, fjpm me who can be happy only 
while fhe is fo. This fingle confideration deter- 
mines me; better be wretched at a diftance than 
fuffer in her prefence; better lament her abfence 
than be the caufe of her mifery. Yes, every 
tie that united us is broken, and broken by 
her. When fhe violated her own engagements 
fhe cancelled mine ; fhe is no longer mine; did 
fhe not fay this, too, herfelf ? She is no longer 

my 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 2 II 

my wife ; and can I bear to fee her any thing 
elfe? No! never will I again behold her. I am 
free ; at leaft fhould be fo : why is not my heart 
as much difengaged as my faith ? 

And yet fhall my wrongs go unrevenged? If 
the faithlefs woman loves another, can I gra- 
tify her more than by ridding he* of myfelf? 
It is myfelf I punifh, not her: I fulfill her 
wi flies at my own expence. Is this the rcfent- 
ment of injured honour? Is this juftice? Is 
this vengeance? 

Vengeance ! Ah, wretch ! on whom ? On her 
whofe unhappinefs alone forms your defpair. 
Be not the victim of your own refentment. In- 
flict: on her, if you can, any punifhmentx. that 
will not reach yourfelf. There are crimes for 
which no penalty is fevere enough, except the 
rcmorfe that attends them; to punifli is in fome 
fort toauthorife them. Would not the cruelty 
of thehufband abfolve the fidelity of the wife? 
Befides, by what right, . or what title, could you 
punifli her? I^o longer her hufband, how can 
you be her judge? When fhe violated the duties, 
fhe renounced the privileges, of a wife. By 
forming new connexions, fhe has difiblved 
your's: nor did flic in this defcend to anydif- 
guife; fhe fcorned to affect a virtue fhe no 
longer pofleffed : you can neither accufe her of 
hypocrify nor deceit; when fhe ceafed to be 
Wholly >our , s, fhe avowed a total feparation from 
you; what further authority can you have over 
her ? If you had any, you fhould renounce it 

for 



. 



212 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

for your own fake. No! be kind through policy, 
and merciful out of vengeance : guard againft 
your refeiumcnt, or it will lay you in chains 
at her feet. 

Thus goaded atonceby vengeance, and foothed 
by lovcj what ftruggies had I to engage with, 
before I could formany rdblution; and when 
I thought myfelf firmly and finally determined, 
a new reflection overturned all. The idea of 
my fori awoke all my tendernefs for his mother, 
and wound it up to a pitch it had never reached 
before, I perceived that this common centre 
of both our affections would for ever make a 
fcparation between us impoffiblc, that children 
form an indififoluble tie between the authors of 
their being, and conftitute a natural and invin- 
cible barrier againft divorce. When both 
remain for ever bound to the fame dear object, 
how can cither be detached from the other? 
United, then, in one common intereft, they are 
focieiy fuflicient to each other, if they have 
nofociety befides. But, fince this con fide ratio o 
pleads fo powerfully for the mother of my fon, 
let me apply it to the mother of an infant in 
when* 1 have no inane-. What! ftiall nature 
herfelf lend a famftion to guilt, and ftiall my 
wife, by dividing her tendernefs between her 
two fons, be forced to divide her attachment 
between rheir two fathers! This reflection, 
more dreadful than all the reft, raifed a new 
flame in my bofom ; the furies again took pofl'ef- 
fian of my heart, and tortured me with the 
idea 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 213 

idea of this horrible partition. Yes ! punifh my 
fori, rather than {hare Sophia's tender nefs with 
the child of another! Stung by this confidera- 
tion, and at laft entirely alienated from her, £ 
formed a refolution never to be recalled, and, 
to preclude all doubt, put an end to all delibe- 
ration. 

This determination extinguifhed totally my 
refentment. Confidering her as dead to me, I 
forgot her guilt, to think only of her fufferings 
and her worth : I overlooked her crime, to con- 
template with a melancholy fatisfa&ion the 
happinefs I had loft. Confirming myfelf in 
thefe difpofitions, I refolved to foften my treat- 
ment of her with every circumftance that could 
confole a forfaken wife; for let my thoughts, 
imder the impulfe of paffion, or her declarations 
in the moment of defpair, be what they might, 
I knew I ftill poffefleda place in heart, and that 
my lofs would be her greateft affliction. The 
firfl: effect of our feparation fhould be the 
removal of my fon. 1 fhuddered at the thought, 
and, after having fearched in vain for a punifh- 
ment fufficiently fevere, the very thought of 
4is one overpowered me. In vain did I infift 
that my child would foon be replaced by ano- 
ther, in vain turn the whole current of jealoufy 
on the odious intruder ; all this was nothing 
when oppofed to the defpair of Sophia torn 
from her darling. I triumphed however over 
toyeompaffion; I formed, after many a heart- 
ending ftruggle, the cruel refolution, and 

conii- 



214 EMllttJ'S AND SOPHIA J 

tiering it as a necefiary co»feq.uence of my flrft 
determination, of the propriety of which I was 
convinced, would fcave carried it, in fpite of 
my own repugnaftW, into execution, had not an 
unforefeen incident forced me to examine it 

One thing more remained to be confidered, 
but that I loolftkl upon as nothing, after the dif- 
cuffion I had gone through. Fixed, with re- 
gard to Sophia, I had only to determine with 
regard to myfelf, thus caft out to folitude, and 
ftanding finglein the imiverfe : I had long ceafed 
to be a folitary being: my heart, bound, as you 
foretold me, in the chains it forged for itfelf, 
was accuftomed to compote along with my fa- 
mily but one individual whole, I found it now 
neceffary to burft thofe bonds afunder; in part 
at leaft, and that was worfe than a total de- 
ftruiftion. What a defert in the bofom, wheji 
the heart, after rcflkig fo long on lb many dif- 
ferent objects, finds nothing at laft to repofe 
upon but itfelf; or, what is worfe, when fome- 
what remains which inceflantly reminds us of 
what we have loft. This was the time to mow 
whether I could tlill fill as I ought my place in 
the world, now when no one was intcrefted in 
my being but myfelf. 

But, connected no longer by any relation, 
how could I have any place? What mould I 
do, whither mould" I go, how employ a life that 
could no longer be a fource of happinefs to my- 
felf or aught dear to me; a life curfed by fate 
5 with 



Oft, THE SOLITARIES*. 2 *5 

with the incapacity of contributing, even in 
hope, to the advantage of any one? For if the, 
means of happinefs with which I was furnifhed 
had only worked my ruin, could I expe& to 
Succeed better for another, than you had for me ? 
I loved my duty Hill* but I knew not yet what 
that duty was. To col left its rules, determine 
its principles , and to apply them to my new 
exiftence, was not the bufinefs of a moment^ 
and after fo much fatigue my mind required 
feme little repofe^ before it launched out intd 
new meditations. 

I had made no inconfiderable advance towards 
tranquillity. Relieved from the anxiety of hope*, 
and Aire foon to be fo from that of defire, con- 
fidering the paft as having no relation to me, I 
endeavoured to put myfelf entirely in the filia- 
tion of a man who begins to live. I reminded 
imyfelf that in reality we never do more than be- 
gin, and that our exiftence is nothing more than 
*fucceffion of prefent moments, each of which, 
irhile it partes, is the firft. We die and are born 
*very moment of our lives, and what connexion 
can death leave behind it. If nothing exifts for 
tw but that which has not yet exifted, we can 
fce happy or unhappy only by the future, and to 
tc wretched for what is paft, is to call forth oc- 
"cafions of mifery from the abyfs of non -exiftence. 
Re-commence your exiftence, Emilius, and you 
ftall have as little to reproach fortune with, as 
Mature. Your misfortunes are annihilated; they 
ccafe to exift ; but what exifts, what, furvives, 

what 



ai6 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

what acquires new vigour, if you will, is, you 
life, your health, your youth, your talents, you -^ 
knowledge, your virtues, and of confequenc « 
your happinefs. 

I refumed my work, till my ideas fhould W « 
fo far fettled, as to point out to me the path 1 
had to purfue; yet, to compare my prefent corx — 
dition with that which preceded it, I was in per~- 
fc£t tranquillity; an advantage which, inde- 
pendent of external circumftances, the man wrio 
conforms his a&ions to the dictates of reafo*i 
muft always enjoy. When you fubmit yo«-*r 
heart to this falutary reftraint, if you are ncz>t 
happy in fpite of fortune, you will at leaft t^e 
compofed. But, alas ! how flight the founda- 
tion of that compofure, in a heart fo little maft^ r 
of its feelings as mine ! To reach it is eafy ; tl^e 
difficulty is to keep it. I had like to have fe& & 
all my refolutions overturned, the moment I 
thought them fettled moft firmly. 

1 had excited little notice at my enterance in^° 
the family of my new mafter. I always pr^^" 
ferved in my drefs that fimplicity of which yc^ u 
had taught me the value : my manners were n 
lefs plain j and the unembarreffed air of a m 
who, fitted for every fituation, finds every fitu 
tion his own, was lefs ftrange to a carpent^^ r 
than it would have been to a nobleman. Sti ^ 
it was eafy to fee, by my appearance, that I wr^~ s 
not a common hireling ; but from the manner i 
which 1 fet about my work, they concluded 
had formerly been one, and that, after bein 



M I « ll 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. ^17 

raifcd to fome little place, I had fallen from it 
to refume my trade. When the petty favourites 
of fortune return to their primitive obkurity, 
they feldom meet with much compaflion; fo I 
was without difficulty admitted to the terms of 
equality I demanded. On a fudden, I obferved 
the behaviour of the whole family change. Their 
_ familiarity was checked by referve ; at work they 
gazed on me with a kind of aftonifhmentj all I 
did in thework-fhop (and I did everything bet- 
ter than the mailer himfelf) excited admiration; 
every motion, every gefture had its obfervers. 
They ftroveto refume their ufual behaviour, but 
it had no longer the fame eafe as before, and one 
might have faid it was their incrcafing refpect 
that hindered them from being more refpectful. 
My whole mind being occupied with my own 
1 ideas, I did not fo foon perceive the change as 
I mould otherwife have done; but the habit of 
confining my attention to whatever I am em- 
ployed upon, bringing me quickly back to the 
objects around me, foon gave me to underftand 
that I was become to thefc good folks an object 
of curiofity not a little interefting. 

I obferved in particular, that the woman of 
the houfe never took her eyes oft* me. An ad- 
Venturer, being in fome fort the property of the 
other fex, has a fupcriour claim to their atten- 
tion. At every motion of my chifel fhe fcemed 
affrighted, and was not a little furprifed to fee 
*hat I efcaped without hurt. " Miftrefs (faid 
1 to her once) I fee you have an ill opinion of my 
Vol. IV. L dexterity^ 



5ti8 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

dexterity ; are you afraid I am not mailer of my 

trade ?"•— 4< You are a complete maft6r (faid fhe) 

of our's j one would fwear you had done nothing 

elfe all your life*" Finding myfelf deteded, I 

^ifhed to know what gave birth to the drfco- 

very* After numberlefs evafions, I learned that 

two days before, a young lady, alighting at the 

door, defired to fee me, but charged them by no 

tnean6 to inform me of her arrival* that, placing 

herfelf behind a glafs door, through which (he 

had a view of me at the Other end of the work- 

ihop, (he fell on her knees, with a little boy by 

her fide) whom {he clafped fFom time to time in 

her arms in all the agonies of defpair; fobs, 

which fhe ftruggled in vain to reprefs, and tear* 

that burft from her in torrents, were accompa* 

nied with other violent expreffions of grief, 

which melted all who faw her; feveral times 

they faw her on the point of burfting into the 

work-fhop, and reftraining herfelf merely with 

the utmoft violence; at laft* after gazing on me 

fome time with greater recollection, fhe got up 

fuddenly, and, preffing the child to her bofom* 

" No; never (whifpered fhe, in a broken voice*) 

he will never confent to rob you of your mother. 

Come, we have no further bufinefs here." At 

thefe words fhe retired with precipitation; then, 

after obtaining their promife to fay nothing to 

me, fhe got into her coach, and was out of fight 

in an inftant. 

They added, that the compaflion with which, 
in fpite of themfelves* the amiable ftranger had 

infpired 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 219 

infpired them, kept them faithful to their pro- 
mife; that fhe had urged them fo earncftly to an 
obfervance of it, they could not depart from it 
but with regret; that they faw eafily by her 
equipage, and ftill more by her manner, that fhe 
was a perfon of diftin&ion ; from her appearance 
and difcourle they could form no other conclu- 
fion but that fhe was my wife : " It was impof- 
fible (fa id they) (he could be the mother of my 
child in any other way." 

• Judge of what paffcd within me during this 
recital ! How much did all this exprefs ? How 
much more did it imply ? What anxieties to 
fuffer, what refearches to make, in thus tracing 
out my retreat J Is this the proof of indifference 
or-hatred? Her arrival how unaccountable, and 
the motive of her journey how much more fo ! 
In what a fituation did fhe find me ! Alas ! this 
wa9 not the firft time fhe caught me at the fame 
employment; but then her knees did not prefs 
the hard earth, then fhe was not drowned in 
tears ! Oh ! happy, happy time ! Whither is 
the angel that made it fo fled? — What brought 
the woman who robbed me of it here ? — Her fon 
too— alas! my fon J — and why? — Did fhe come 
to fee me, to fpeak with me?— Why then that 
abrupt departure? — Did fhe come to brave me? 
—Why thofe tears ? — What is her purpofe?— 
Does fhe come to infult my mifery? Has fhe 
forgot that fhe and I are no more one? I ftrove 
to find'fault with her journey, dreading the force 
of the tender emotions it railed, dreading the 

L 2 violence 



220 EMILIAS AND SOPHIA; 

violence of the temptation I felt, which in fpite 
of my re fen t men t, urgfrd me to return to my 
forfaken Sophia* I continued there, however. 
I faw that her prefent conduct proved nothing 
elib but that flic ft ill land me, and this confi- 
deration, added to thofel had entertained before, 
could make no change in my decifion. 

Examining then more at leifttre all the cir- 
cumftances of this-journcy, dwelling above all 
on hcrlaft words at parting, I thought I difco- 
vcrcd in them the motive of her coming, and the 
reafon of her abrupt departure without being 
fecn. Sophia's language was plain and unftu- 
died; yet every word ih^t fell from her was a ray 
of light to my foul : now in particular I found 
it fo: " he will never rob you of your mother," 

• were her laft words. It was therefore the fear 
of that fcparation which brought her, and the 
removal of that fear which made her return. 
How then were her appruhenfions removed? 
What had (he feen r Emtlius undifturbed — Emi- 

' lilts at work. What concluiion could flic draw 
fromfuch a fight, except that Emilius, in that 
frame of mind, was not mattered by his paffions, 
nor capable of funning any other than a reafon- 
able determination. To feparate the infant and 
his mother was then unreafonablq and unjuft in 
herjudgement, though not fo in mine; which of 
us was wrong? Sophia's laft words decided this 
doubt too; and indeed could it ever have been 
one, if the child's advantage alone was attended 
to? I had only confidered the feparation of the 
child 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 221 

child from his mother, and I fhould have confi- 
deredthe feparation of the mother from her £hild. 
I then was wrong. To deprive a child of his 
mother, at that age efpecially, is to take from 
him more than you can ever give him; it is fa- 
crificing the infant to your hatred of the mother : 
it is an acl: of paflion, never of reafon, unlefs 
the mother is an ideot or unnatural. But Sophia 
is fuch a mother as my fon might adopt, though 
he had another. Either fhe or I muft educate 
him feparately, fince we cannot together, orelfe, 
tofatisfy my vindictive rage, I muft rob him of 
both. But what could I do with him in my 
prefent fituation? My reafon is fufficient only 
to fliow me what I can or cannot do, not to ena- 
ble me to do what I ought. Shall I drag an in- 
fant at that age after me to other climates; or, 
flull I keep him here to infult, by a cliftant fight 
. of him, a wife whom I ought to avoid ? Alas ! 
for my own fafety, I can never be far enough 
from her ! Let me leave her the child, or he 
*ill bring her back the father. Let him ftay to 
a Venge me of her; let him recall for ever to the 
**lfe one's memory the happinefs of which he 
**as the pledge, and the hufband fhe has loft. 

The refolution of taking away my fon from 
**is mother was evidently the effeft of refent- 
^ent. In this point only had paffion blinded 
^c, and it was therefore the only point of my 
^termination from which I receded. If my fa* 
***ily had thought like me, Sophia fhould have 
Educated the boy, and perhaps would be ftill 

L 3 living; 



222 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

living^ perhaps too fhe would thence forward 
be dead to me; confoled thus in the dear half 
of her hufband, fhe might lofe all defire of re- 
joining the other, and 1 fhould thus have loft 
the happieft hours of my life. By what a fuc- 
ceffion'of fufferings were we to expiate our 
faults, before our re-union fhould make u« for- 
get them ! 

We knew each other fo well, that in order 
to guefs the motive of her fudden retreat, it wa9 
neceffary for me only to refletSr, that (he had 
forefeen what the confequence would be had 
, we met. She knew the propriety of my inters 
tions, but doubted my firmnefs ; on the other 
hand, I knew equally well the ftubborn inflex- 
.ibility of that haughty and fublime foul; an 
inflexibility which fhe maintained even in her 
faults. The image of Sophia received back 
into favour was unfuppor table to her. Her 
crime, fhe knew, was of a nature never to be 
forgotten; fhe would rather be punifhed than 
pardoned : fuch a pardon was no pardon to her; 
punifhment itfclf debafed her lefs in her own 
*cyes. She thought fhe could no otherwife ef- 
face her crime than by a full expiation of it, 
nor discharge what fhe owed tojufticebut by 
fuffering all fhe had merited. Hence it was, 
that with an intrepid but barbarous difregard of 
her fex's decorum, fhe declared her crime to 
you, to all my relations; concealing at the fame 
time the circumftances which excufed, which 
juftified it, perhaps; concealing this, I fay, with. 

fuch 



OR, THE SOLITARIES* 223 
fuch unrelenting obftinacy, that fhe never men- 
tioned it even to me, and that I was acquainted 
with it for the firft time after her death. 
- Befides, her fears of the lofs of her fon being 
removed, (he had nothing to afk for herfelf. Our 
reconciliation would be ray difhonour; and (he 
was the more careful of my honour, becaufe 
flie had now none but what flie derived from it. 
Sophia might be guilty, but the hufband of her 
choice fhould be above all mcannefs. Thefe 
refinements of felf-love were peculiar to herfelf, 
vfts to trace them through all their windings was 
perhaps peculiar to me. 

Another obligation I had to her, even after 
our feparation j and that was, her inducing me 
to give up an improper refolution, which re- 
venge had fuggefted. She thought more fa- 
TouraWy of me in this refpeft than I deferved ; 
but I juftified her good opinion (however erro- 
neous at firft) as foon as I refle&ed a little. To 
confider the intereft of my child only, I faw it 
was neceflary to leave him with his mother, and 
I determined to do fo. Confirmed as to every 
other point in my former fentiments, I refolved 
to remove his wretched father from the danger 
■ lie had fo lately efcaped. As we were to fepa- 
rate, could I make the terms of that feparation 
fufficiently diftant? 

Th*6 falutary leffon too I owed to her; I de- 
rived it from her journey ; to make any advantage 
of it, it was necefifary I fhould not run the ha- 
zard of receiving it twice. 

L 4 Fly 



224 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

Fly then I muft; this was the end of all my 
deliberation, the confequence of all my argu- 
ments. But whither? This was the confide- 
ration that flopped me; nor did I fee that no- 
thing could be more indifferent than the place 
of my exile, fo that it was fufficiently remote. 
Why deliberate fo long on the choice of a re- 
treat, feeing I could every where find the means 
of living or of dying, to which two points all 
my future views were confined? Is it not the J 
very ideotifm of fclf-love to paint to us the fate. ■ 
of all nature hanging on every petty incident of 
our futile lives? To obferve the fufpenfe in 
which I fo long wavered, would not one be 
tempted to think all -mankind interefted in the 
choice of my retirement, and that my fingle 
weight thrown into the fcale of the univerfe* 
would be fufficient to deflroy its equilibrium* 
If I eftimated my exiftence only by its utility t& 
my fellow-beings, I mould have no doubt o* 
finding every where duties to fulfil. For whi-^ 
thcr can we fly where our obligations will not 
purfue us? Where is the man who loves hi^ 
duty, that is at a lofs for objects of its exercife? 
I mould rather remind myfelf, that in all places 
and fituations, the tafk of humanity awaited me, 
and that no perfon would have need of another, 
if every one lived as he ought for himfelf. 

The wife man, attached to his prefent duties, 
with a noble improvidence fcorns to look far- 
ther. Let us not anticipate our exiftence, nor 
attempt any thing beyond our powers. My 

duties 



OR THE SOLITARIES. 221 

duties of to day. are my only tafk ; thofe ol 
to-morrow are not yet come. My prefent bufi- 
nefs is to fly from Sophia, and the road bj 
which I can do that moft effectually is the roac 
to be preferred. With this then I clofe my deli- 
berations. 

Having taken this final refolution, I fettlec 
in the beft manner I could the affairs I lefi 
behind me $ I wrote to you, I wrote to mj 
family, I wrote to Sophia herfelf. I regulatec 
every thing, and forgot only the preparations foi 
my intended journey ; but I wanted no prepa- 
rations; and without fervant, without money, 
and without equipage, but alfo without defirci 
and without care, I fet out alone and on foot 
During an exile of fo many years, among the 
nations I vifited,. on the feas I crofled, in the 
deferts I traverfed, I regretted but one thing 
and that was, her whom I had undertaken tc 
£y from. If my mind had fuffcred me to be al 
cafe, my body had wanted nothing. 



l *i, 



L5 



LETTE 



226 EMIXIUS AND SOPHIA; 



■MM 



L E T T E R II. 

1HAVE drunk of the waters of oblivion, the 
paffed . is effaced from my memory, and a 
new world opens to my view. Thefe 'were my 
words on quitting the country of my birth, a 
country I blufhed to acknowledge, and to which 
I owed no other return than contempt and 
hatred, becaufe, though entitled of myielf » 
happinefs and refpe&, I derived from her and 
her vile inhabitants nothing but the anguifh 
which devoured me, and tku ignominy that 
accompanied it. By renouncing my attachments 
to a fingle fpot, I extended them to the whole 
earth, and, while I ceafed to be a citizen, be- 
came truely a man. 

In all my long travels, I have obferved, that 
the difficulty of a journey confifts only in the 
diftance of its termination. We think nothing 
of going a day's journey from the place where 
we at any time are ; and why need we look for- 
ward to any thing more, fince, by repeating our 
diurnal expeditions, we can get to the world's 
end? But while we compare both extremities, 
we are affrighted at the fpace between - y the 
parts of which it is compofed are formidable 
only by accumulation; feparate them, and the 
longcfr expedition confifts not of journeys, but 
jaunts. The generality of travellers enveloped 

for 



OK, THE SOLITARIES; 227 

for ever in cuftoms, habits, prejudices, and wants 
peculiar to themfelves, move, as it were, in an 
atmofphereof their own, which divides them 
from the places through which they pafs, as 
from fo many different worlds. 

A Frenchman would fain carry all France 
along with him; as foon as he mi lies the final - 
left of his accuftomed conveniences, he over- 
looks its equivalent, and believes himfelf loft. 
Comparing continually what he fees with 
what he has quitted, he thinks it worfe only 
becaufe it is not the fame, and cannot ilcep in 
the Indies if his bed is not made as it was at 
Paris. 

As to myfelf, making the fame ufe of the 

object I had to ihun, as formerly of the fhadow 

in the foreft of Montmorency, I purfued the 

oppofite direction. 1 advanced flowly; but the 

fmalleft advance is con lider able in a perfon 

. determined not to go back. The diftance I had 

reached in two days travelling precluded my 

return, becaufe it gave me time to reflect on my 

Way back, in cafe I fhould be tempted to take 

fjuch a refolution. 1 felt my mind more at 

liberty, and my body more at eafe, the farther 

1 removed from the danger I had efcaped. Hav-. 

ing but one objefi: to purfue, and one direction 

to follow, I continued my iirft courfe,. fome^ 

times flowly, fometimes with greater, expedi-. 

tion, according to my convenience, my health, 

my inclination, my ftrength. Carrying not 

abgut rae/but within me, greater refources than 

JL 6 were 



228 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

were neceffary for my fubfiftance, I was under 
no anxiety either for the means of travelling 
or the neceflaries of life. I had no fear of rob- 
bers \ my purfe as well as my paffport was in the 
ftrength of my arms. The clothes I wore, decent 
and fuited to a working man, formed my whole 
wardrobe. As faft as they were worn out, I 
replaced them without difficulty. As I carried 
along with me none of the ufual incumberances 
of travelling, and had none of' that uneafy 
impatience which diftinguifhes travellers, T 
attracted no attention : I paffed every where 
for an inhabitant. On my arrival at the fron- 
tiers of anyftate, I was feldom refufed a rjaflage, 
and when that happened it made but little diffe- 
rence to me : I fhowed no marks of impatience, 
but fet me to work as I would have done" any 
where elfe ; they might have kept me my whole 
life without any unwillingnefs on my partj 
and the little defire I exprefled of going never 
failed at laft of procuring me a permiflion. 
Nothing is fo fufpicious as an air of bufirrefs 
and follicitude; an unconcerned appearance 
infpires confidence; I paffed unqueftioned be- 
caufe every one faw that it made no difference to 
me whether I was queftioned or not. 

W henever I found no employment at my own 
trade, which feldom happened, I turned my 
hand to fomething elfe. You made me in fome 
meafure jack of all trades. At one time huf- 
bandman, at another handicraftsman, here 
pradtifing fome ingenious art, there exer- 

cifinz 



. OR, THE SOLITARIES. 22g 

cifing fome liberal profeflion, I had always a 
talent to ferve the prefent turn, and becaufe I 
never preffed myfelf on any one I wanted no 
other recommendation. One of the advantages 
of my education was, to be always taken at my 
word for what I profefled to be, and nothing 
more; becaufe I was unaffected in every thing, 
and becaufe while I occupied one place I afktd 
for no other. Thus I was envied in no fitua- 
tion, and acquitted myfelf well in all. If I 
fell fick, an accident feldom to be dreaded by a 
perfon of my conftitution, who avoided excefs 
in every thing, in food, in anxiety, in work, 
in repofe, I lay ftill, and waited for my reco- 
very without impatience, or my diflblution 
-without fear. The brute, when fick, falls, 
remains quiet, and recovers or dies; I followed 
the example, and had no reafon to repent it. 
Had I given vent to loud lamentations, had I 
difturbed all around me with my complaints, in- 
ftead of the commiferation I met with, 1 fhould 
have excited nothing perhaps hut impatience or 
difguft. My wants were prevented, becaufe I 
avoided m exprefiing them, and that attention 
was given to my filence which wourd perhaps 
have been refufed to my follicitations. 

I have a thoufand times remarked, that the 
more earned any perfon is in his requefts, the 
lefs likely is he to obtain them : we diflike every 
thing that refemblcs compulfion, and when we 
determine to do a kindnefs, we love to have all 
the merit of it. To a(k a favour is to acquire a 

kind 



230 EMILIUS AND* SOPHIA; 

w 

kind of right to it, and to grant it becomes 
then a fort of duty; but it flatters our felf-love 
more to confer an obligation than to pay a. 
debt. 

During thefe pilgrimages, which would have 
pafled in the world for the wanderings of a. 
vagrant,' becaufc unattended by the glare that?' 
blazes around the excurfions of the opulent, 
if in the hour of felf-examination I fometirnetf 
afked, what am I doing ? Whither am I going? 
What is myobjed? I anfwered: what did I; 
do in coming into the world, except begin a 
journey which is to- finifli only with my life? 
I perform the tafk, and occupy the pface aifigned 
me; I pafs in innocence and fimplicity through 
this fhort life ; the good I do to my fellow crea- 
tures in not doing them harm is no fmail me- 
rit ; I provide for my own wants by providing 
fortheir's; I help without injuring them; I fet 
them the example of being good and happy 
without difturbance or difficulty; I have re- 
nounced my patrimony, yet I live; I commit 
no injuftice — yet 1 live ; I am no burthen to the 
charity of others, yet I live. My utility then 
to my fellow creatures is in proportion to the 
fubfiftence I derive from them, for among men 
nothing is given for nothing. 

As I have not undertaken to give you a hi- 
ftory of my travels, I omit every thing that i9 
mere incident. Arriving at Marfeilles, I em- 
bark for Naples, to purfue my firft diredlion. 
To pay my paffage in the coin with which 

you 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 231 

you .provided me when you taught me to work 
a veffd, 1 became a failor. The fame fkillthat 
fervesoathe ocean is fufficient on 'the Medi- 
ferranean ; the alteration of a few terms is the 
whole difference. The Captain of the veffel, 
or patron, was a reclaimed renegado. He had 

''been taken once by the Moors fince his re-ad- 
mi&tm into his native country, and faid he 

t made his efcape from among them without 
being known. Some Neapolitan merchants 
entrufted him with another veffel, and this was 
his fecond voyage in it. He told his adventures 
to any one that would liften to them, and, 
while he amufed his hearers, had the talent of 
acquiring their confidence. His pleafures were 
as- out of the way as his adventures. He 
thought of nothing but of diverting his crew; 
he had two wretched fwivels on board, which 
he kept firing all the whole day; all the night 
he played off fky-rockets ; never was fecn fo 
chearful a commander of a veflel. 

For my part, I amufed myielf in acquiring 
the practice of the feaman's art; and even 
when my watch was over, attended the fails 
•r obferved the helm. Attention, f up plied the 
place of experience, and it was not long before I 
fufpe&ed that we had driven confide r ably to the 
weft. The needle, however, was at the right 
point, but the courfe of the fun and ftars was 
^contradictory, that 1 concluded the variation 
muff have been prodigious. 1 told the captain 
What I thought > but ioftcadof answering me 

dire&Iy, 



232 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

dire&ly, he pretended to turn my opinion into 
ridicule, and as the fea grew rough and the wea- 
ther hazy, it was impoflible for me to verify 
my*obfervations. A ftrong gale fpringing up 
drove us out to fea, and lafted two days; the 
third we faw land to our left. I afked the cap- 
tain what land it was ; he replied the Pope's 
territories. One of the failors would have it 
that it was the coaft of Sardinia ; he was hooted 
for his pains, and this was the welcome he 
received, for though an old feaman, this was 
his firft voyage on board that veffel as well as 
mine. 

It made no difference to me what direction 
we were failing in; but what this man faid 
having revived my curiofity, 1 fet about rum- 
maging the binnacle, to try whether fome piece 
of iron, thrown by accident, might not be the 
caufe of th6 needle's variation. How great 
was my furprife, to find a large loadftone con- 
cealed in a corner. I no fooner removed it, 
than I faw the needle refume its proper direc- 
tion. At the fame inftant fome body cryed, 
a fail. The captain looked through his glafs, 
and faid it was a fmall French veffel ; as they 
had doubled the cape, and we made no fail to 
ihun them, they foon came near enough to be 
defcried by the naked eye, and every one then 
faw it was a Moorifh veffel. Three Neapoli- 
tan merchants, who were on board with all their 
property, filled the air with their cries. The " 
myftery was now cleared up, I went to our 

commander, 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 233 

commander, and whifpered in his ear, " Cap- 
tain, if we are taken, you are a dead man," 
I appeared fo cool and pronounced thefe. words 
with fo little vehemence, that he did not feem 
much alarmed, and even pretended not to hear 
me. 

He made fome preparations for defence, but 
there was not a fmgle mufitet in order, and he 
had wafted fo much powder, that on going to 
charge the two fwivels, we found fcarce fuin- 
cient for two rounds. It would have been how- 
ever quite unneceffary ; for as foon as they 
came along fide of us, they cryed out to us to 
ftrike, and we were boarded almoft at the fame 
inftant. Till then the captain without feeming 
to take? notice had his eye fixed on me, miftruft- 
ing my intentions : but as foon as he faw the 
Moors on board us, he paid no more attention 
to me but advanced towards them without any 
apprehenfion. At this moment confidering 
myfelf as both judge and executioner, 1 deter- 
mined to avenge my companions in flavery by 
ridding the fea of a monfter, and mankind of 
a traitor. I ran up to him, and crying out, 
" I promifed you this, and I keep my word" with 
afabre which I feifed I fevered his head from his 
body. At the fame inftant, obferving the 
Moorifh captain advance in a rage, I waited 
without recoiling, and prefenting him the fabre 
by the handle, faid to him in lingua Franca , 
" Here captain, I have done an acl: of juftice, 
you may, if you plcafe, do another." He topk 

the 



234 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA'; 

the fabre, and raifed it to ftrike; I waited the 
blow in filence : he fmiled, and taking me by the 
hand ordered that I fhould not be put in irons 
with the reft : but he faid nothing to me of 
what he had juft feen me do, a fufficient proof 
that he knew the reafon of it. My exemption 
however continued only till we reached the port 
of Algiers, and as foon as we landed we were 
fent into the city coupled together like hounds. 

Hitherto taken up with what parted around 
me, I had paid but little attention to myfelf. 
At length my agitation fubfiding left me at 
liberty to reflefi on this change in my prefent 
condition, and in the warmth of my firft feel- 
ings, I faid within myfelf, with a fort of fatis- 
fa&ion, what will this event deprive me of? 
The power of committing a fault. I am now 
freer than before. Emilius a flave! continued 
1 5 in what refpefl: ? What have I loft of my 
original liberty? Was I not born the flave of 
neceflity ? What new yoke can man lay on me? 
Labour! Did I not labour when I v/as free? 
Hunger! How often have I fubmitted to it 
voluntarily? Pain! All the powers of man 
cannot make me feel more than a grain of fand 
has made me feel. Confinement! Can it be 
greater than that of my firft captivity, which 
I re fu fed to quit? By nature the flave of the 
paflions of humanity, whether the yoke be 
impofed on me by another or myfelf, mufti notat 
any rate bear it, and who knows which way it 
is the more fupportable. I fhall at leaft retain all 

my 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 235 

my reafon to moderate them in another; how 
often have I wanted its afliftancc againft the ty- 
ranny of my own ? Who can make me bear 
two yokes ? Did I not carry one before ? There 
is no real flavery but the flavery of nature, and 
men are only the inftruments of it. Whether 
I fall by the blow of a tyrant, or the defcent of 
a foek, it is the fame thing in my eyes, and the 
worft thar^can happen to me in flavery is to find 
a maffer as inflexible as a flint. Nay, if I had 
my liberty, what could I do with it? In my 
prefent ftate, can I have any will ? No ! Left 
I fink into annihilation, let me be animated by 
the will of another, having no longer any in- 
, duration of my own. 

The confequence to be drawn from thefe re- 
flexions was, that this change in my fituation 
was more apparent than real; that if liberty con- 
fifts in doing that only which we will, no one 
is free; that all men are tied "down by neceflity 
to a fcrvile dependence on the things which fur- 
round them; that he who can beft bring himfelf 
to will that which is, is moft free, becaufe his 
a<SHons and his will go infeparably together. 

Yes, my more than father, I am not afraid to 
aflTert it; the time of my flavery was the epoch 
of my empire, and my authority over myfelf 
was never fo abfolute as while fubfervient to 
Moorifli tyranny. Subjected to the paflions of 
others without partaking them, I learned to 
know my own. Their faults carried with them 

more inftruclion than your leftures, and under 

thefe 



236 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

thefe rough profeflbrs, I went through a courfe 
of philofophy more ufeful than all yourkindnefe 
had taught me. 

I did not, however, experience at their hands 
all the fe verity I expecled. I fometimes met 
with ill treatment, but lefs, perhaps, than they 
might have fuffered among us, and I found that 
the terms Moor and Pirate are accompanied by 
certain prejudices, againft which I had not 
kept myfelf fufficiently on my guard. They 
are not companionate, but they are juft; and, 
though you mult not hope for clemency or kind- 
nefs, you have nothing to fear from ill-nature 
or caprice. They require of you to do all you 
can, but they afk no more, and punifh a want 
of inclination, but never a want of power. 
The negroes would be but too happy in Ame- 
rica, if the colonift treated them in a manner 
equally equitable; but while he confiders thefe 
poor fufferers as the mere mechanical inftru- 
ments of a lucrative trade, the treatment they 
receive is regulated by the advantage they pro- 
cure ; and the matter is juft, fo far as the flave 
is ufeful. 

I often changed matters ; they called that fel- 
ling me, as if man could ever be the objedk of 
fale. They fold indeed the work of my hands; 
but my will, my underftanding, my being, all 
that by which I was myfelf and no other, was 
never fold: and the proof of this is, that the 
firft time my will and that of my fuppofed 

matter 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 237 

matter were in oppofition, mine preponderated. 
This incident is worth relating. 

In the beginning I had had no hardfhip to 
Complain of; concluding that I mould be ran* 
fomed, they luffered me to live feveral months 
in a ftate of ina&ion that would have been tire*- 
fome to me if any fituation could be fo. At 
laft* feeing that I paid no court to the European 
confuls or the friars, that no one fpoke of my 
redemption, and that I feemed not to think of it 
myfelf, my mafter determined to make fuch ufe 
of me as he could, and fet me to work. This 
alteration neither furprifed nor difpleafed me. 
Though little afraid of the hardeft labour, I pre- 
ferred work of a lefs toilfome kind, only becaufe 
it was more amufing. I found my way into a 
carpenter's work-fhop, and the mafter of it foon 
perceived I was qualified to teach him his own 
trade. This employment proving more lucra- 
tive to my owner than my former, he fet me up 
in the bufinefs and found his account in it. 

By this time, almoft all my old companions 
of the Bagne* were difperfed different ways; 
all who were able to get ranfomed, were already 
releafed : thofe who could not, were difpofed of 
like me, but few of them with a fimilar allevia- 
tion of their fufFerings. Among the latter, were 
two Knights of Malta. Their relations were 
poor; the order redeems none of its captives, 
and the friars, not being able to ranfom all that 

have 

* A place where galley- (laves are confined after work. 



238 EMIttfrS AND SOPHIAJ 

have recourfe to them, give, as well as the con- 
fute, a natural and very excufable preference to 
thofe whofe gratitude is likely t« be of moft 
fervice to them. Thefe two Knights, one of 
whom was old, theother young, were perfons 
of information and merit; but 'their merit was 
ufelefs in their prefcnt fituation. They were 
mafters of tactics, the engineer's art, Latin, 
and the bettei Itttres; qualified to fhine or to 
command, their talents were thrown away upon 
Caves. This was not all; they ftruggled againft 
their fate with fruitlefs impatience, and the phi- 
lofophy of which (hey were fo vain, had not 
taught thefe high-fpirited fuldiers to pay a chear- 
ful obedience to ragamuffins and banditti, for 
thefe were the names they gave their mafters. 
I pitied them with all my heart; becaufe they 
were gentlemen, they f corned to be men, and 
becaufe in Algiers' — nothing; nay lefs, for a 
corfair made a Have among corfairs is much Ids 
than nothing. The only afliftance 1 had to offer 
the elder, was my advice, and this he found al- 
together fuperfluous; for being much more 
learned than myfelf, in that learning I mean 
which ferves for thow; he was a complete maf- 
ter of moral philofophy, had all its precepts at 
his fingers ends, and was deficient in no part of 
it but the practice : indeed it was hardly poffible 
to bear the yoke of neceffity with a worfe grace 
than he did. The younger, ft ill more impatient, 
and of a fiery, active, intrepid fpirit, exhaufted 
all the energy of his faculties in plans of confpi- 
racy 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 239 

racy and revolt, as impoffible in the execution 
as wild in the project, and which, certain to be 
dete&ed, only ferved to aggravate his fufferings, 
I would fain have brought him to make an effort 
after my example, and to ufe the ftrength which 
nature gave him to the emolument of his matter 
and the alleviation of his own fufferings; but 
he defpifed my advice, and told me haughtily 
that he knew how to die. " To know how to 
live, Sir (replied I) would be a much more va- 
luable qualification." I fucceeded, however, in 
procuring him fome little relief 5 but though he 
demonstrated all the gratitude of a noble mind, 
he remained deaf to my admonitions. He con- 
tinued his machinations for recovering his li- 
berty by one bold ftroke, till the patience of his 
mafter and mine, for we were fellow-flaves* 
was worn out by repeated provocations. I had 
an equal (hare in his refentment, for obferving 
the frequency of our meetings, he concluded 
that I employed in encouraging his mutinous 
difpofition thofe converfations by which I en- 
deavoured to wean him from it. We were fold 
to an undertaker of puhlick works, and con- 
demned to labour under the dire&ion of a bar- 
barous infpe&or, a (lave like ourfelves, who, to 
ingratiate himfelf with our common mafter, im- 
pofed talks upon us too great for human ftrength 
to perform. 

To me it was at fir ft no more than an amufe- 
ment. As our work was equally divided among 
4is» and as I was ftronger and more alert than 



240 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 

any of my companions, I always bad my taft 
finifhcd firft, after which I affifted thofe who 
flood moft in need of help, and eafed them of a , 
p2rt of 'their's. But our tyrant, obfervingmy 
extraordinary diligence, and the fuperiority of 
my ftrength, prevented me from employing it 
to the relief of others, by doubling my taft; 
and, incrcafing it continually in proportion to 
my exertions, at laft fo overcharged me with la- 
bour and blows, that I muft fhortly have funk 
under my burthen; all my companions, the 
(Iron per as well as the weaker, from bad food, 
worfe treatment, and exceffive labour, were waft- 
ing vifibly away. 

1 his condition becoming altogether infup- 
portable, I refolved to extricate myfelf from it 
at all hazards, and the young Knight, to whom 
I communicated my refolution, joined in it with 
eagernefs. I knew him to be a man of courage 
and perfeverance, provided he had witneffes of 
his conduct ; and that in brilliant exploits or 
heroick achievements 1 could have no doubt of 
him. 

My whole dependence, however, was on my- 
felf, nor was the participation of any other per- 
fon neceflary to the fuccefs of my project; it 
is true, that being executed in concert with my 
companions in misfortune, its effect would be 
much more beneficial, and I refolved to propofe 
it to them in conjunction with the Knight of 
Malta. 

It 



6ft, THE SOLITARIES. 24.1 

' It was with difficulty he confented that this 
pfopofition fliould be made openly, and without 
the preliminary intrigues. As we were mom 
tdgethe*!" and lefe watched at meal -time than any 
DtheYp&rt of the day, this was the time we fixed 
upon to harangue them. I addreffed myfelf at* 
fiVft in my oWn language td ten or twelve of the 
ifiimber who were my countrymen, not choofing 
td exprefs myfelf in lingua Franca^ left I fliould 
be under flood* by fome'of the natives. " Com- 
rsfdes'^faid' I) lifteh to me". The fmall remains 
offtrength left me' are not fufficient to hold out 
another fortnight againft the fatigues with which 
I am over-burthened, although there are few 
amongft us of vigour equal to mine; a fituation 
fd violent muft come to a quick conclufion, 
either by a total extinction of my powers, or by 
a refolution which may prevent it. I prefer the 
latter, and am determined to refufe working > 
from this day forward, at the rifque of my life* 
and in fpite of whatever treatment my refufal 
iriay bring upon me. This determination of 
mine is grounded upon a Ample calculation: if 
Iftay as I am, I muft perifh in a fhort time 
and without a poflibility of efcape ; by facrificing 
a few days I acquire at leaft a chance of avoid- 
ing the fate with which I am threatened. My 
behaviour may perhaps alarm our infpector, 
may fhow our mafter his true intereft. But if 
that is not the cafe, my fate may be accelerated 
but cannot be rendered worfe. Should I defer 
Vol. IV. M my 



242 EMILIUS AND SOPHIA; 
my attempt till my ftrength is entirely wafted, 
it can be of no ufe ; by fparing me they will 
then have nothing to gain, by difpatching me 
they may fave the ex pence of my keeping, I 
muft not therefore let the time pafs, during 
which they cannot hurt me without hurting 
themfelves. If any of you approve my reafons, 
and, after the example of this brave man, wifh 
to join in the prefent undertaking, our .number 
will produce a greater effect, and render our ty- 
rants more manageable. But fhould he -and I 
be alone, we are not the lefs determined to per- 
Tift in our refufal, and we take you as witneffes 
of the manner in which we fliall fupport it." 

My difcourfe, plain in itfelf and. as plainly 
pronounced, was heard without much emotion. 
However, four or five of the number defired me 
to rely on them, and faid they would do as I 
fhould. The reft were filent, and all appeared 
undifturbed. The Knight, irritated by their 
ihfenfibility, fpoke to his countrymen, whofe 
number was considerable, in his own language, 
with extraordinary vehemence; he raifed his 
voice, and drew a lively picture of the extremi- 
ties to which we were reduced, and of the cruelty 
of our tyrants. By a difplay of our fufferings 
he roufed their indignation, and inflamed their 
courage by the hope ,of revenge ; fet on fire at 
length by their admiration of that ftrength of 
mind which laughs at pain and triumphs over 
force, they interrupted him by their fliouts, and 

4 fwore 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 243 

fwore to a man they would follow our example 
and perfevere 'till death. 

■ The next day, on our refufal to work, we 
were treated with the cruelty we expefted, but 
without producing any effeft on my Maltefe 
friend or me, or on my three or four difciples 
of the preceding evening, from whom our tor- 
mentors could not extort afingle groan. Thole 
wrought upon by the Knight did not hold out 
fo well 5 the refolution of his eager countrymen 
was exhaufted in a few minutes, and after a 
fhort application of the cat-o'nine-tails, they 
were led back to their work filent and unrefift- 
ing. Enraged at this want of firmnefs, the 
Knight, infenfible to his own fufFerings, loaded 

' them with reproaches, nor could he check the 
torrent of his indignation even when they were 
out of hearing. I endeavoured to calm his re- 

- fentment at an event which I had foretold to 
him as well as forefeen. I knew that the effe&s 
of eloquence are violent but momentary. Thofo 
who are heated without difficulty, cool with 
equal eafe. A ftrong but fimple argument ex- 
cites no tumult; but where it takes effeft, it 
finks deep, and its impreflion is never to be 
effaced. 

The defertion of thefe poor fellows produced 
an effe£t which I had not expelled, and which I 
attribute more to the impulfe of national rival {hip 
than to the example of our firmnefs. Thofe of 

.my countrymen who had not joined us, feeing 
them return to their work, hooted them, and, 

M 2 out 



244 EMIL1US AND SOPHIA; 

out of contempt as it were for their paltroonery, 
threw down their tools, and drew up in a circle 
round me; their example brought others* and 
the revolt became quickly fo general, that our 
mafter, alarmed by the noife and fhouts, came 
to put an end to it* 

Our infpe&or^ you may imagine, left nothing 
unfa id to excuse himfelf, and bring down the 
/evereft punifiiment upon us. He took care tp 
mark me out as the authour of the mutiny, as a 
ring- leader of fedition, who, by railing a tumult, 
fought to make himfelf feared. The Moor 
looked at me fteadily, and faid, " It is you thep 
who feduce my flaves? You have heard the 
charge 5 if you have any thing to fay in reply, 
fpeak." So much moderation in a per fori greer 
dy of gain and threatened with ruin, and that 
*oo in the firft impulfe of refentment, furprifetf 
me : an European mailer in the fame fituatiort, 
ide$f to every thing but avarice, would firft have 
condemned £ne to the moil esquifi.te torments, 
and heard roe, per.ha.ps, afterwards. ** Mafter 
{faid l'.to him in jtingw France) it is impofiibje 
you fbould hate us, for you do not know us* 
and it is no lefs fo that we ftiould hate you, be- 
caufeyou are not the authour of our fufFerings^ 
you even knew nothing of them. We know 
how to bear the yoke of neceffity which has fub- 
jefted us to you. We do not refufe to employ 
our perfons in your fervice, fince fate has fo 
difpofed of us ; but by going beyond our ftrength 
your flave robs us of it, and will ruin you while 

he 



OR, THE SOLITARIES^ -245 

ie deftroys us. Take my advice, transfer to a 
more prudent perfon an authority which he 
ab.ufes to your prejudice. Your work will not 
J>e lefs effectually done for being better diftri- 
Jt>i*ted, and you will preferve a number of fer- 
viceabie flaves, whofe future labours will be in- 
J&nitely more ufeful to you than any profit that 
£an refult from our prefent oppreffion. Our 
complaints are juit, our demands are moderate*. 
If you refufe to grant them, our minds are made 
•pp. Your infpe&or has already made a tryal 
j>f our resolution, and when you pleafe you may 
XBaJte another." 

I /aid ,no more j. the oyerfeer offered to reply,, 
iwtihis. nxafter refufed to liften to him. Then 
ilfppjcing at my companions one after another, 
J£ fa,w in their wan faces and meagre perfons 
the proof of my affertions 5 at the fame time 
•that their countenances betrayed no marks of 
jfear or irrefolution. At laft turning to me, 
c< You appear (faid he) to be a fellow of fome 
sfenfe j I will put you to the teft : you blame the 
conduit of this (lave ; change places with htm 
£j}d Jet us fee what your's will be." Immediately 
^ie ordered my chains to be taken off and put on 
my predeceffor, and his commands were exe- 
cuted in an inftant. 

To tell you how 1 conducted myfclf in my 
new poft would be as unneceffary as it is foreign 
£0 my prefent purpofe. My adventure made a 
Aojfe all over Algiers, and being publi(hed with 
as much induftry as it was heard with pleafure, 

came 



246 EMILIVS AND SOPHIA; 

came to the ears of the Dey, who dcfired to fee" 
me. My owner, having prefented me to him, 
faw he took a fancy to me, and made him a pre- 
fent of my perfon. Hence forward you are to 
confider your Emilius as the flave of the Dey 
of Algiers. 

The rules of a&ion to be adopted in my new 
department flowed from principles with which 
I was by no means unacquainted. We had dif- 
cuffed them during our travels, and their appli- 
cation in the prefent cafe, though on a very 
(mail and imperfect fcale, was certain and in- 
fallible in its effects. I (hall fpare you and my- 
felf a trouble unneceflary to both of us, by 
omitting the particulars of my conduit. Suf- 
fice it to fay, that the fuccefs with which it was 
attended procured me the confidence of my 
mafter. 

Affem Oglou had attained the fupremc power 
by the moil honourable path that can lead to 
fuch an exaltation : for from the rank of a com- 
mon failor, pafling through all the gradations 
of the land and fea fervice, he had raifed himfelf 
fucceflively to the firft departments of the ftate, 
and on the death of his predeceflbr was elected 
to fucceed him by the unanimous fuffrages of 
Turks and Moors, foldiers and citizens. He 
had for twelve years filled with honour this 
difficult port, at the head of a barbarous and in- 
docile populace, a reftlefs and feditious foldiery, 
fond only of tumult and diforder, who, not 
knowing themfelves what they wifhed for, de- 

fircJ 



OR, THE SOLITARIES. 247 

fed nothing but a change, and cared little whe- 
;r things went better, fo that they went 
lerwife than before.' There was no juft fault 
be found with his adminrftration, though it had 
t anfwered the expectations conceived of it. 
j had kept the ftate in tolerable tranquillity; 
;ry thing was in a better condition than be* 
•e ; commerce and agriculture flouriflied, the 
vy was on a refpeftable footing, the necefla- 
is of life were in fufficient plenty. But there 
rre none of thofe brilliant enterprifes, 
aich— 



FINIS. 



* 



3=aw 



T H B 



IN D E X, 







^> The numerals refer to the volume, the figures to 
the page of each volume, 

i.'t i 

fBBE de St. Pierre, his method of providing 
for his children ii. 86 

Academies, sore ptfbttck fchools of lying ii. 103. 
4t*nt 9 whether we fhould boaft of having none i. 91 
« children have very little 2&1 

febiOiSt allegory of his immerfioft into the Styx, a 

• beautiful one. i. 26 
: -How deprived of the merit of valour 46 
4&i*ti&$ rednndadt in 'children, and wanting in old 
, men .. ■•■ i. 78 
4gk8uiu)Ki~ of talking toodeftly before children-, ab- 

furd ii. 128 

Jgrontiy dlftumourable, whofe bufinefs it is to obtain 
} iktisfa&ion for them ii. 204 

Jgt. offirengtby how it (houid be employed H* I , a 
x -Great age, inftance of i: 49 

j0rrJ§emhui 9 great -boihters ifi. 144 

Jjux was afiwdqf Adkittav aad yet bid defiance tx» 
' Jupiter ii. 219 

J&um, of. the German traveller t ' it. 10^ 

jtlantms iv. 23 

jflmamkr, confident in virtue ^ i. 182 

Applied his feal to the mouth of his favourite iii. 82 
jfcmsnts, folid, are more nourifliing than liquid, i. 1* 

* in tie primitive ftate Of mankind - *$e 
. IV. N ilmatut 



* r: * i N B E'X. 

Amatus Lufitanus ii. 26j 

Analogy grammatical, children conform to it betta 

than we i. 87 

AnalyJtSy method of ii. 10 

Ancients, the Co a rce of pure literature* iii. 135 

Augks x pl vifiop, how they deceive us i. Jri 

Animals, have all fome education u 66 

Sleep more in winter than in fummer 231 

An/hver made to Lewis XV. iii* izi 

Ant bropomorp bites ii. 216 

Anthony > at what time the hiftory of his life more in- 

ftru&ive than that of Auguflus ^ ii. 187 

Apdles i. 269. iji, 200 

Apicius iii. 139 

Appetite of children . ' . . i. 292 

Apprenticejhipsy in what manner Emilius performed 

two at the fame time ; "$« 9$ 

Ariftijes ^ . j iij. 43 

Ari/tocracy t what is meant by It, iv. 1 3 3 •.—its limits,*?. 

fui table to middling ftates 131 

Art of inftru&ing without precepts u 206 

^r/ of obferving children ii. 89 

^r/j, in what order they are efleemed by the pob- 

lick h. 54 

^r/j, Emilius will view them in a different light ii. 55 

Another manner of eftimating the arts, according 

to the relations of neceffity, by which they ail 

connected ii. 59 

Arts, the agreeable ones have no need of teachcn 

iii. 205 
Artifan, his fituation the moil independent of any 

ii. 7S 
Arts, faVage and civil, difference between them ii* 53 
Artifans 0/ towns, in fignificantly ingenious ii. 61 
Aftyanax i. 65 

Attachment of children at firH is no more than an ha- 
bit ii. \\% 

In what refpecl attachment differs from friendraip 

ii. 165 
Athii/m iii. c$ 

Atoms ii. 261 

4 Anient 0* 



INDEX. 

Ubtnton (Monfieur d') iv. 5 . 

iupiftuu a&ed as a father to his grandchildren,!. 31. . 
whether it be true that he was happy ii. 186 

imboritj, no deference is to be paid to it when we 

intend to pay none to opinion, ii. 109 -—whether 

that of the matter is to be preferved at the expenfe 

.of the morals of the pupil ii. 164 

Ambours, their converfation more inftru&ive than 
•their writings iii. 131 

jUrtlius Fidor iii. 88 

B. 

tarne ^ iv. 237 

tmh held between two fingers croflwife ii. 109 
%mkuu i. 293 

&•/& iii. 58 

Jbtf the way never to find a bad one, i. 232. — which 

'. is the bell ibid. 

Mtmu (the Sieur le) his obfervations in regard to the 

• lavages iii. 66 

Mkmty, its real triumph, iii. 198. — a great beauty is 

-father to be avoided than courted in marriage 

ill. 288 

imife&*rj interefted, more common than people un- 
grateful ii. 166* 
Jmr, the modefty of its language iii. 87 
v 9*4j* weak, debilitates the mind i. 43, 44.. ii. 162 
Aftgr, human, different dreft fuitable to it in time of . 
exercife # and in time of ina&ion i. 226 > 
M*h politick, its different denominations iv. 122 
Different denominations of its members, and rela- 
tive to what ibid. 
B$dy int$rmtdiate between the fubje&s and fovereign . 

iv. 128 

This entire body confidered under different rela- } 

dons afTumes different denominations ibid. 

Names given to the members of this body ibid. 

Aswt, a (ingle one, Emilius's whole library % ii. 50 

A*W/» the in liniments of mifery to children i. 197 

Their abufe iv. 97 

Caufe the volume of the world to be neglecled 98 

N 2 Bonnet 



INDEX; 

fylP* "... ifi. 34 

Boys wctold bcl better educated were there no col* 

leges ' % . ' *".• '77 

BranUme, an extraordinary ftory from iiil 249 

Breath, human, mortal to man ' i. 57 

Br eth and porridge, indifferent nutriment i. 85 

Bucenfaur iij, 81 

Btrjjftn (M, dc) quoted i. 17, 6 1, 243. ii. 124 

Butchers f not admitted upon juries in England i. 293 



c: 

Capitals, all vtry much alike iv. 138 

They are not the right places in which t# learn 
the manners of nations iM% 

Gcfrice is no£ owing te> liberty* i. 8o8.~ is not die 
- work of nature, 2 10. — examples of the method of 
curing children of their eapfkes ibid- &c. 

Caps (night) for children , i. 227 

Cats finell to every thing new k 220 

Catechifm, iii. 214.-2 fpecimeh of one 2iy, fcfr. 
Catiline il. 29$ 

Cato, the cenfor, educated his children from their 
infancy i. 31 

Vticenfis ii. 294 

Cafar ibid* 

Chardin (Sir John) quoted i- **7 
Charity, a weak manner of inftilling it into children ft 

> i. 163, 164 U 

Charron quoted iii. 19 }i 

Chafe, its utility relative to education iii. 77 

Chafti/emeht ought 'not to be pra&ifed on children 

u l S7 
Child, his life becomes more precious as he grows up 

i. 28 

Ought to know how to bear ficknef* i. 48 

Suppofed of full fize aj his birth i. 63 

Why he extends his hand to grafp at a diftant 

object i. 71 

Child, 



u 



I 

\ 



INDEX. 

Child, to what kind of dependence he ought to be 

confined i; 116 

Ought not to be con drained in his motions i. 1 19 

Nothing mould be given him merely bedkuie hi 

cries for it i. 120 

' Ought not to have more words than ideas - i. 95 

He has not the fame ideas as we ibid. 

He ooght to do nothing merely becaufe he is Bid 

i. 127 
The wrong notion that, enters into his head, is to 
him the feed of erroar and vice i. 128 

Governs his mailer, in the cafe of a common edu- 
cation i. 206 
How to prevent him from prying into the manners 
of his mailer i. 209 
The commencement of his ft u dies is a kind of ex- 
perimental philofophy - i. 221 
Should not learn to declaim i. 281 
The way to excite his curiofity ii. 7 
Cannot be moved by tafte and fentimeot ii. 12 
Interefts himfelf in nothing, without knowing its 
< utility ii. 48 
SiUation in life, in which all the natural wants of 
nan, and the means of providing a gain ft them, 
are fucceffively difplayed to his mind ii. 56 
In what manner you are to bring him acquainted 
with the focial relations ii. 54 
J chili, that thinks himfelf fcorched by freezing 
milk ii. 101 
dn**ruty child, how to be kept under it 210, fcfr. 
A full grown child 31. 1 15 
A view of him ibid* 
Childhood, its firft ftage i. 73 
Second ftage i. 97 
Third ftage ii. 2 
A fhort view of the manner of fpoilin|g it i. 29 
The only way to prevent this abufe i. 30 
Has particular ways of thinking i. 1 30 
Ought to be allowed time to ripen i. 139 
Ought to be loved and encouraged ii. 102 
Its Bate with regard to man iil. 172 

N 3 CbitfbtocU 



INDEX. 

CbiUbnJi we ought not to be in a hurry" to judge tf ^ 

it i. 173 

Alike in both fexes ii. 114 

CbiUrm, how treated at their birth L 16/50, lit. 

Bear changes which we cannot i. 28 

' Their fcrft fenfations, thofe of pleafore and paia 

i. 66 

Ought to be accuftomed betimes to darknefs i. 67 I 

Are feldom afraid of thunder i. 69 ] 

How they learn to judge of diftances i 71 

Have the mufcles of their faces more flexible than 

oar's L 73 

Why they are fo ready to break every thing they 

lay their hands on i. 78 

How they become imperious i. 79 

When they grow up, they become le(s active i, 80 

Rules of behaviour in regard to them ibid* 

We . ought not to carefs them, in order to keep 

them quiet i. 82 

They are weaned too foon i. 84 

They conform to grammatical analogy better than 

we i. 87 

We are in too great a hurry to make them fpeak 

i. 88, lie. 
And to correct their mi flakes in language ibid. 
Why thofe of peafants articulate better than oar's 

i. 89 

They learn to fpeak more di&in&ly in convents, 

and in colleges i. 90 

They frequently give a meaning to the words, 

different from our's i. 95 

Not to appear uneafy when they hart themfehes 

i, 98 
It is an advantage to them to be little and infirm 

i. 99 

They fufTer more from the feverity of constraint, 

than from the inconveniencies again ft which 

they are fee u red i. 122 

They are made miferable by granting them every 

thing they a(k * i. 123 

Rules for granting or refufing their demands i. 135 

Children^ 



r N D E X. 

'CbiUri*, they are infloenced by the vices they bare' 
learnt of us i. 134 

Cauie of their nnrra&ablenefs i. 135 

Inconveniency of making long fpeeches to them 

i. 146 
Are not naturally inclined to lying i. 159 

Why they fometimes ftumble upon a lucky nit 

i. 169 

• Their apparent facility of learning injurious to 

them i. 174 

They are taught nothing but words i. 177 

They hare no real memory ibid. 

In what manner the kind of memory .they hare is 

cultivated i. 187 

Their geography . i. 180 

• Whether hiftory is adapted to their capacity i. 181 
in what manner their judgement is perverted i. 1 8 5 
Of their drefs i. 224, faff. 
Of the covering of their heads 1. 227 
Generally fpeaking clad too warm. i. 228 

- Efpecially in towns i. 60 
In what month they die moft i. 228 
Which ought they to drink, warm or cold li- 
quor ? ibid 
Muft have a large allowance of deep i. 236 
The way to make them fall afleep u 233 
-And to awake of themfelves ibid. 
And to fuffer pain without grumbling u 234 
May be exercifed in games of (kill and addrefs 

.*• 2 75 

Whether they ought to have the fame nouriihment 

• as we i. 288 

Difficulty of obferving them i. 314 

We never know how to put ourfelves in their 

T>lace ^ ii. 16 

Effett of the docility required of them ii, 35 

Never to put them off with reafons which are above 

their capacity ia« 38 

They pay but little attention to explanatory dif- 

courfes ii. 39 

N 4 Cbildrtn, 



I N D £ X. . 



Cb$Uirem % whether they ofegfct ttbe tanght to Ukwt 
: with gallantry to "the fex . ii. 70 

They trouble theitefebfe* *nly about nttwal ofc- 
je&* .' •; ■ ■ ■ : it. 101 

, But jtheir firft attachments are the effects of ha- 
bit -• -^' • ;. : ,■;.'.., ii. 118 
Areaatlurally iacliaed tobenewolwtce ii* 119 
Their curiofity on particular fubjecls ii. 126 
How i t ought to be eluded iltd* 
They learn the language of fentiment ii. 139 
Iocoaveniency thereof Hit, 
, Every thing is infinite. in regard tpthest ii. Ztg 
TWr good txmftitutioh depend* on that «f their 
nuither iii. 180 
. The : common amufements of children of both 
fexe» iii. 186 
The peculiar taftet that di&ngtiiJh then iM. 
Ckm> q toted i. 14 
Compared to Demtfihe&ei iiL 194 

Chx* .': VTi: /0 

Citizen u 9 

CitixenL who is in fault when they are compelled 
to be gnaves ii. 78 

Citi&ns, meaning of this word iv. 1 22 

Chrke, Dr. ii. 24.8 

Ck&patru iii, 88 

Climate i. 59 

Climates, temperate, their advantages jtf/V. 

Chads* paffing between the moon and a child, appear 
to the latter immoveable, while the moon feems to 
be in motion ii. 102 

CtUe&ums of pictures and books always incom- 
plete iii. 144 
Cellegtj i. 11,86 
Cemmand and obey, a child fhould never be made ac- 
quainted with thefe words i. izS 
Cemfta/s, a contrivance to make one ii. 28 
Competition, when it ought to be ufed no longer as an 
inftrument of education ii* 49 
Ctmfilen, modern iii. 132 

Cond amine i 



I N D E X. 

Condamim, M. de, an extraordinary faft related fey 
him ii. 2jz 

ConfeJJion, frank one of a young officer in the Swifs 
Guards iii. 104 

Confidence, the way to gain that of perfon* whom we 
want to reclaim ii, 233 

tmffidautt are generally nurfes in the ancient dra- 
ma ( *• 5$ 

Confcience, the beft of cafuifts ii. 296 

Affords greater light than all the philofojphers. 

P . , ; iii. 180 
Other definitions of . iii. 4, 5 

Why fo little regarded ^ ^ (hid. 

Confolations, what turn majr bcgiven them, in order 
; to mortify felf-love ^ V : ' ii. 197 

Contrd£> or compact, lbcial iv. 12I 

' trbduftive of a moral and collective body ib'U* 
Theonl/'fondarAentul law iv. 122 

Has need of no other fecurity than the pub- 
lick iv. 123 
Renders man more free than he would be in a 
ftate of nature ' iv. 124 
Contradictions to the focial order, theff fburce 11. 171 

Convents i. 90 

Proper for young ladies iii. 383 

rt Jleal fchoolspf coquettry iii. 237 

Conventions and duties pave the way to falfehood i. 1 57 
Country, farnifhes the town with a perpetual fupply 

of people i. 58 

Coquettes t their arts iii. 227 

Have no authority over their lovers in matters of 
importance, . iii. 249 

Cjriolanus ' ' iii. 244 

Cofmbgraphy, firft leflfcn in It ii. 14 

Courage, where we are to loo|c for it i. 47 

Cradle i. 60 

Cries of children L 72 

Cultivation, 6ne of its principal rules, to keep things 

as far. back as poflible ii. 102 

Curate, Savoyard, his profcffigp of faith ii. 2^0 

Curiofitjt itt fi'ft foQrCe ii. 7 

N 5 Canopy 



I N D E X. 

Curiofitft iivwhat manner it is unfolded - ibid. 

What fort of curiofity would actuate a philofopher 

who might be baniftied to a deferi idand li. 8 

Why a philofopher has fo much curiofity, and a 

fa v age fo little ii. 104 

Cttfias ' if. 105 

Cyclops i, 293 

IX 

\ 

Dancing iii. 205 

Darius in Scythia . iii. 82 

The prefent fent him by .the king of that 
country ibid* 

Marches back in a hurry ibid* 

Darkne/sy children fhould be ufed to it betimes- i. 67 
Da vi la ii. 17S 

Death in what manner it becomes the mod terrible 

of all evils i. ico, 

In what manner its approach is not armed with its 
ufual terrour i. 23c 

The idea thereof is not foon imprinted on the minds 
of children 
Decemvirs 
Declaiming 

Deities, Pagan, whence imagined 
Definitions, the way to make good ones 
Democracy, what, is meant by it 

Suitable to fmall ftates 
Demoftbenes compared to Cicero 
Def cartes , 

Dependence on things and on men 

The former is not prejudicial to liberty 
Dejigning, reflexions onthatart • 
Deuteronomy 

Mitigation of one of its laws 
Dialogue, moral, between the tutor and his pupil i. 129 

Between a Dogmatift and a Rationale Hi.. 28 
Diana iii. 78 

Diogenes iii. 82 

Di/order, thoral, whete it begins u 24 

BiftanceSf, 



11. 

• •• 

111. 

i. 


»49 

2 44 
281 


11. 


216 


• 

1. 


176 


IV. 


*33 


•• • 
111. 


»34 
*34 


ii. 243, 


258 


i. 
ty 


**7 
118 


« 

1. 

• »• 

111 

• ». 

111. 


267 
. 26 
170 



I /N D E X. 

Difidncis f the manner of fhowing children how to 

judge of them i. 71 

Docility, the effe&s of that required in children ii. 35 

Dogma, important ii. 76 

Domtfticki, we Ibould have but few, iii. 141 

Dominion, depends on opinion like every thing 

clfe,; ^ i. 113 

Dre/s, fine, its inconyeniency iii. 140 

The education of young girls, in this refpeft, is 

contrary to good fenie iii. 198 

Neceffary to particular ibapes iii. 199 

Expenfive drefs diftinguifhes the fortune, but does 

not embellifh the perfon ibid. 

Dados (M. de) feveral of his maxims relative to 

politenefs k iii . 1 2 1 , ' 1 2 z 

Dig, wrong to impofe any on children i. 1 3,1 

Confequence of that indi fere don ibid. 

What is to be fubftituted in its Head i. 132 

E. 

Education, its different fpecies i. 4, 10 

Oppofition between them i. 7 

Choice i. 7, 15 

End ■ " ^ i. 5 

Meaning of this word among the ancients i. 14 
Begins at our birth ^ i. 65 

The proper inftrument for conducting it i. 1 32 
Importance of retarding it i. 138 

Difficulty ibid. 

Ought to be purely negative ibid. 

Education, txclufwe, prefers expenfive injftru&ion* 

*• 2 37 
Education, natural, ought to qualify man for all fla- 
tten* of life i. 41 
Education, vulgar, excufes children from learning to 

think ... *• 202 

What tarn of mind it gives them i. 203 

Education, ought to be different fox the two fexes. 

111. I76 

N 6 Education* 



INDEX. 

Eiucati**, the wanrto^xteixUhe good *8e&« thereof to 
e-ery part of life ir. 52 

£&9ff*jir*,anidlewayofteachiagittochildren ii. 206 
The true way of teaching it ibid. 

Emilius, why he is fo long before he appears oft the 
Aage i. 37 

I»opa4ent, and why i» 41 

Of noble parentage and for what roafon ibid. 

An orpha*, and in what fenfe ibid. 

Mutt have no fwaddling clothes i. 60 

The firft thing he ought to leant i. 93 

Mod have no poddng^caps, go- carts, nor leading 
. firings i. 100 

Why he is to be brought irp in the country 

Dialogue between him and Robert the gar- 
dener i. f 53 
Never learns any thing by heart - i* 187 
In what manner he learns to read i. 199 
Tofwim i. 237 
To draw .u 268 
Will drink cold water when he is warm i. 229 
Advice given him in regard to per fens furprifing 
him in the night i. 252 
His progrefs at twelveyears of age 1. 305, 306, WV. 
His adventure at the fair ii. 21, 22, tfr. 
His 4rft leflbn in cofmography ii. 14 
Jn.Hatkks ii. 29 
In natural philofophy ii. 3 j 
A decifive term between him and me on all oc- 
cafions ^ ii. 37 
A queftten which I (hall certainly fubjoin to all his 
interrogations ibid. 
How I make him fenfible of the utility of finding 
out the pjace of the fun's rifing ii. 41 
He is his own rival ii. 49 
His library is to con fid of a fmgle %ook, its 
name ii. 50 
A qucftion that would fcarce excite attention in 
another perfon is interesting to Emilius ; ex* 
ample ii. 66 

Emiliut, 



I N D EX. 

BinifrMs, why fo little taken notice 'of by w6men if* - 

his infancy, and the advantages thereof ii. 70 

Why I am willing be mould learn a trade ii. 80 

What trade I choofe for him ii. 94 

Makes two apprenticeships at the fame time ii. 95 

*In what manner I commend his work, when it is 

well done ii. 96 

-A queftion he pats- to me upon difcovering that I 

1 am* a man of fortune, and my anfwer ii 99 

-He is nof a favtfge bat formed -to live in towns 

ii.' iqa. 

'Heisnotinaharry toanfwer my qncftions ii. 100 

He knows the utility of whatever he does, ^nd 

the reafon of whatever he believes ii. 1 f o 

His progrefs at fifteen ii. 1 1 1 

Is not deceitful like othef children ii. 1 jq 

It will be late before he comes to know what itjs 

to fuffer and to die iiiif. 

Impreffions ( he will receive from the fttdy of hrf- 

tory ii. 184 

Forms too juft a judgement of others to envy 

their lot ii, 19© 

May grow vain of his fuperioritjr ii. 191 

Remedy againft that vanity ii. 192 

How he is to be made acquainted with the world 

ii. 201 
He is fond of peace ii. 203 

l He does not talk with vehemence H, 206 

Neither is he cold or phlegmaticfc ii. 207 

Extent of his ideas, and elevation of his thoughts 

ii. 209 
Refufes his attention to every thing above his ca- 
pacity H. 525 
To what fedk he ought to belong ii, 227 
Attains the age of puberty iii. 71 
His firft fetting out in the world iii. 1 1 5 
His behaviour towards the fair fex iii. 120 
What advantages he will purfue or neglect iii. 1 24 
6ets out with his governour from Paris iii. 290 
Their travels iv. 4 
Come to their jonney's end iv. 7 

Emili*s % 



INDEX. 

Emilius, well received by Sophia's father iv. 7 

Beginning of his courtfhip ^ iv. 9 

Goes and lodges with his friend at the diftance of 
fix miles from Sophia iv. 20 

Returns to her iv, 23 

Talks to her, and has a favourable audience iv. 26 
Admitted upon the footing of a lover iv. 34 

Gives le&iires to his miftrefs in different arts and 
, fciences iv. 36 

, Quarrel between the two lovers, and on what ac- 
count iv. 41 
Reconciliation ; Emilius fteals a kifs from Sophia, 
i. and on what occafion iv. 42 
Is reprimanded by Sophia's mother ibid. 
With what kind of jealoufy he is likely to be 
difturbed iv. 51 
Is not changed by love iv. jj 
Different vifits to Sophia iv, 57 
His occupations on the days he does not vifit 
Sophia iv. 61 
His liberality to the poor, &c. iv.. 62 
In what manner he was overcome by Sophia in 
running a race iv. 65 
Is vifited in his mop by Sophia's father iv. 66 
By Sophia in company with her mother ibid* 
Refufes to go back with them and upon what ac- 
count iv. 64 
Stands godfather to a peafant's child along with 
Sophia, and on what occasion iv. j6 
Advifed by his governour to leave Sophia for a 
time iv. 88 
His uneafinefs on the occafion ibid. 
At length obeys the orders he receives for his 
departure , , ^ v * 93 
Promifes to return after twoyears feparation iv. 95 
Inftrudtions relative to his travels iv. no 
How greatly improved at his return iv. 1 15 
The refult of his obfervations during hi* travels 

iv. 148 
He returns to Sophia iv. 1 56 

He marries her ibid* 

Emilius, 



IV* 

iv. 


179 
180 


iv. 


181 


iv. 


196 


iv. 


204 


IV. 


211 


iv. 


2I& 


iv. 
iv. 


224 
220 


iv. 


22a 



I N D E X. 

Etmlius, acquaints his governour with Sophias preg- 
nancy iv. 168 
Engages him to fpend the remainder of his daya 
. with them ibid* 
Acquaints his governour with Sophia's infidelity 

iv. 175, &V. 
To difcover the relation of things to one another 
flu died the relation of each tonimfelf iv* 177 
Becomes father of two children 
Lofes his daughter 
Takes Sophia to Paris 
Quits his houfe 
Works as a carpenter 
Refolves to fee Sophia no more 
Is vifited fecretly by Sophia 
Refolves to travel 
Leaves his native country 
His manner of travelling 
Arrives at Marfeilles and embarks for Naples 

iv. 230 

Is taken by a Corfair iv. 232 

Kills the captain of the (hip on board of which he 

had embarked iv. 233 

Is carryed to Algiers, and fold for a (lave iv* 234 

Changes his matter iv. 239 

Is treated Tuelly, and itirs up a fedition among 

his fellow-Haves iv. 240 

r» Becomes infpe&or over the other Haves iv. 245 

Again changes his mailer, and becomes a Have to 

the Dey of Algiers iv. 246 

Empidocles reproaches the Agrigentines iii. 1 44 

Encloi (Mademoifelle de !') iii. 232, 287 

Englijb call themfelves a good-natured people i. 292 

Englijb girl, only ten years of age, played extremely 

well on the fpinnet i. 277 

Englijb and French compared in regard to travelling 

iv. 101 
Envy is bitter, and why ii« 1 37 

Epidetus, his forefight of no ufe to him ii. 147 

Epitaph, modern* compared to that of Sirdanapalus 

* • • • 

Equality 



I N D E X. 

Equality of rani not eflcritial to matrimony iii. 283 
Err our , the only way to avoid it is to continue in 

ignorance ii. 104 

Errours of /en/at ton are alfo errours in judgement; 

example ii. 101 

Eifih annexed to infancy i. 27- 

Eiiih, moral \ con 6 ft all in opinion, except one i. 169 
Evils, fhyfical, refs fevere than the others ibid* 

Evils of the mind, or inward bufferings con fide red as 

nothing ii. 150 

Euripides, what he fays of Jirpiter ii. 222 

Exeefs of indulgence or rigour to be avoided i. 120 
Exercife of the body, whether it hurts the operations 

of the" mind L 202 

Exijf (I) the firft truth that ftrilces us ii. 249 

Ezijterice of objects and fenfations, the fecond truth 

\ we learn ii. 2J0 

Explanations in difcaurfe make very little impreflion 

on children J ii. 39 

F. 

Fables, whether they be proper,for children i. 187 
Analyfis of one of thofe or La Fontaine i. 189 
Their moral examined i. 194 

The proper time for ftudying them ii. 197 

The nbofal ought not to be expreffed ii. 198 

Faces bandfomer than the mofks ii. 173 

Faculties, or powers fuperfluous in man* the caufe of 
his mifery i. 10& 

Faith of children, on what it depends ii. 226 

Faith, prof ejjibn of, of a Savoyard curate ii. 240 

Family, in what manner it is diffolved i. 32 

Fanaticifm iii. 58 

Fancies of fpoiled children i. 124 

Fate, he that llfuggles moft againft it is motV un- 
happy iv. 178 
Father, his tafk i. 32 
Ought to give no preference to any of his children 

• i. 42 

Faults (the age of) the proper time for fables ii. 197 

£ Features 



I N E> E X. 

JFV#/#r* do ft+t change wkh the feihioa ^ ilk 199 

Fueling* in what refpeft it differs from judging ii. 101 

Ffiipito of roan * pen 1 earth merely negative i, 105 

Fmmes of animals have no flume ia the prefeeco of 

the mate* iii. 166 

. #a.ve no defires when their wanti are fatisfied ibid. 

. Their affeaed denial* iii. r66 

fenelon ]iu 192 

Fetiche* Si. 2117 

Fife- arms i. 69 

Font entile, his faying In regard to the ttifpttte abbut 

. the ancients and the modern's iii. iff 

Forte, in what it eonfiis i. 107 

At waat time of life man poflefles the greatell re-4 
lative force . ii. 4 

In what manner he ought to employ the fuper- 

abundant part of it ^ itid. 

ForefighU the fource of our aiifery i. 1 i 1 

forefyht gf 4**// denotes a: maturity of nadtrftaad- 

ing ii. 34. 

jf^r^ of Monhn&ency ; ti. 41 

French have but a ftperficial knowledge of other 

nations iv. 98 

French and Englijh compared ia regard to travelling 

iv. ioi 
French, what renders their manner of falutatien dif- 

agreeable i. 92, 261 

Frame* gib, what they indicate i. 270 

G. 

Gaiety 9 a very dubious fign of content ti. 155 

Gallantry, in intrigues of this fort the lover has a 

greater hatred for his rival, than affe&ion for his 

iniftrefs iv. 49 

Games, or amafements to deceive the appetite, by 

whom, and on what occafion invented i. 299 

Gaming, the refource of the indolent iii. 14$ 

Geneva, the inhabitants of that city would not be free 

at prefent, if they had not been able to walk bare- 

footed i. 256 

Genius, 



' INDEX. 

Genius, a perfpn of genius has often die appearance 

of fUtpidity in his childhood i. 171 

Geography, the notion which children have of it i. 180 

The firft leflbns therein iu 17 

Geometry, whether it be true that children learn it 

i. 175 

Oar manner of teaching it depends as much on 

fancy as on reafon i. 271 

In what manner Emilias learns the elements thereof 

». 27s 

The way to render it interefting ii. 10 

Geometrical figwrtt ; cakes cut in that manner L 274 

Germans, their refped to the fair-fex iii. 243- 

Girls fond of drefs almoft from their cradle iii. 182 

In what manner they were educated at Sparta 

m. 183 
Their occupations iii. 187 

More docile than boys iii. 189 

Their ntiderftanding ripens earlier than thofe of 
boys Hid. 

Should not learn to read and write betimes ibid. 
Above all they fiiould be inured to constraint 

iii. 191 
And for what reafon ibid. 

They are in every thing upon the extreme iii. 193 
From whence arife many vices, particularly to 
women ibid. 

Earlier affefted with a fen ft of decency, and virtue 

iii. 207 
Their agreeable prattle ibid. 

The reafon why girls carefs one another more than 
ufiial, in the prefence of the men iii. 210 

Are laid under an apparent reftraint, and for what 
reafon iii. 213 

The way to render them really virtuous iii. 248 
The authority which they acquire by that means 

iii. 249 

Example ibid. 

Little girls, their diflike to reading and writing 

iii. 189 
Little 



INDEX. 

LittkgirU, more flirewd and cunning than boys iii. 19$ 

Example iii. 196 

We fhould encourage-their prattling iii. 208 

. Advantage thereof ibid. 

Gluttony, preferable to vanity, as an excitement to 
children i. 289 

God, incomprehensible ii. 267, 288, 290 

Powerful, good 9 juft ii. 281, 289 

Immaterial ii. 28$ 

Eternal ii, 289 

, Intelligent, and how # iM- 

Much better not to mention his name at all to 

children than to give them falfe ideas of him 

ii. 224 

Goodnt/s, of all the attributes the mofi eflential to the 
Deity ■ ^ i. 77 

GocdavdiviJof human life examined i. 104, 10c, 

Gcfptl, its holinefs . iii. 49 

Grvtrument, political, an idea thereof fufficient for a 

child . m ii 63 

Signification of this word iv. 121 

Its different forms iv. 122 

The moft active of all, that of a fingle perfon 

iv. 131 

Eafy and plain rules to judge of the relative good- 

nefs of governments iv. 132 

The fpirit thereof is not the fame in capital towns 

as in the diftant provinces . iv. 139 

Gcvernour, the firft qualification reqnifite for one 

*• 33 
. The way to avoid any difficulty in choofing one 

ibid. 

Ought to be young . » J. 37 

Whether he ought to have finifhed bis courfe of 

education i. 38 

Ought to choofe his popil i. 39 

Should not confider himfelf as feparable from his 

pupil i. 41 

Ought not to undertake the care of a diftempered 

child i. 43 

GovernoKv^ 



INDEX. 

Gwtrnour, ought to hmre an authority over twerjr ob* 
. jeft lie is defirous to reprefent to his pupil i. 144 
, Ought to ferve an apprcmiteftrip together with his 
pupil ii. 54 

.. Abitfes to be avoided in theif joint labour ii. it 
Foundation of the confidence which mis ptrpil 
ought always to place in him ii. 19$ 

How he ought to behave in regard to the fa a Its 
committed by his pupil, upon his coning to ma- 
turity H« 196 
Govtrnours, their falfe dignity ii. ig± 
Gratitude, a. ienurjient naeftral t» the human breaft 

Si 167 

The way to excite it in the mind of a young per* 

ion ibia\ 

Grotius quoted in regard to politick law iv. 1 1 c 

£ubHA*d nothing bat fmlfe principles on x\A 

rights of war iv. 1 36 

tymaaflick extrcifn i. at] 

••■■»■' ■ 

H. 

r 

* 

Habit is not nature i. 6 

The only habit we fhoold permit a child to contract 

in his fir ft ftage i. 67 

Whence proceeds the influence of habit i. 309 

The habit of body fuitabJe to exercife, different from 
that fui table to inaction i. ti6 

Habits, the greateft part of thofe, which we imagine 
to be contracted by children* are not real if. 54 

Happintfs of man* natural, in what it confifts ii. 34. 

Whether there be an equal meafnre of happinefs 

in all ftates in life ii. 146 

We judge of happinefs too much by appearances 

ii. 137 
The end of every fenfible being iv. 77 

The road to it prefented by nature iv. 78 

Harm, to do none to any body is the firft and princi- 
pal lefTon of moral philofophy i. 167 

Hearing, the improving of that fenfe i. 280 

The active organ correfponding to it ibid* 

Heart, 



INDEX* 

th*rt+ ntf cffity of laying hs defines under fome r*. 

ftri&ions - M 81 

JEaWr* manner of educating him i. 214 

UarcuUs iii. 170 

Mermes ii. 49 

Hmdoims quoted . i. 227, 299 

..A painter of manners iv. 1^3 

- Jnjudicioufly ridiculed iv. 105 

Mifiorians, ancient i. 299 

Hijkry is not adapted to the capacity of children 

i. 181 

Example # i. iSt 

The right time for ft u crying it ii. 174 

Calumniates mankind ibid, 

: Never gives a faithful pidture of events U.V175 

In what refpeft it beafs a reiemblance to romances. 

ii. 176 

Ought to reprefent fads without drawing charac- 
ters ii. 177, (sfc. 

Modern hiftory has no chara&eri flick ibid. 

It is rather an exhibition of actions than of men 

ii. 180 
Mhbbes, what name he gave to a k*ave i. 77 

In what fenfe his grand principle is true i. 123 

Quoted in refpedi to politick law iv. 115 

Horfe, reflexion on the exerclfe of riding i. 237 
Humanity t the firfi daty of man i. 102 

In what it con fills i. 165 

In what manner it is excited and encouraged in 
the bread of a young man 1. t68 

Maxims to that purpofe ibid. 

Hunting, See Chafe. 

Hurtois ii. 103 

Uujbandsy caufe of their indifference iii. 204 

HJg**** i. 48 

T. 

Idto/i/lr, their chimerical diftin&ions ii. 250 

Idles, diilincl from images u 174 

And from fenfations ii. toe 



INDEX, 

Meat, the manner of forming them, is die charafier- 

iftick of the mind ii. 100 

What is meant by fimple ideas ibid. 

Comparative and numerical are not fenfations ii, 

252 

Abftraft, fource of the greateft erroars ii. 260 
Of juftice and honefty, every where the fame ii, 

297 

Acquired diftinlt from natural fenfations iii. z 

Identity, fueceffive, in what manner we have the fen* 

fation of our own i. 101 

14lenefs is publick robbery ii. 79 

The -way to cure children- of it 1-234 

Idemeneus (another) an objed of Emilius's enquiry 

^ iv. 137, 

Jeahujy, in love, owing to nature iv. 47' 

Proof taken from brute animals ibid. 

. Depends greatly on the power of the fex iv. 48 

Its motive; is founded rather in the focial paflions 

than in the original inftind iv. 47 

Imagination, or fancy, extends the meafureof poffi- 

bilities J. 106 

Transforms the paflions of limited beings into vices 

ii. 135 

Imitation, natural tafte i. 179 

How it degenerates into vice ibid. 

The foundation of the beautiful in the polite arts 

iii. IZ7 

Indigejiions, how to prevent in children 2. 298 

Ijtfants i. 97 

Infinite ii. 219 

Ingratitude, unnatural to man ii. 166 

What it is owing to ibid. 

Ink, in what manner it is made ii. 44 

Advantage of knowing it ii. 47 

Inoculation i. 236 

Inftin8, how it becomes a fentiment ii. 118 

Inftrufiion given to children u 135 

Ought to be retarded as much aspoffible i. 145 

Ought to be without rivals or competitors ii. 49 

InftruQws 



INDEX. 

JnftruBions. ,of*. nat&rt are flow, thofe of .men pre* 

, mature ■> ii. 123 

Imftrumtnts, mechanical,, the great number of them 

prejudicial to dexterity and fagacity ii« 31 

Jflimr'irjwrk .. . ; ;,.. m > : ii. 9a 

Journey, the difficulty of it confifh in the diftance of 

its . termination iv. 226 

^th judge, differs from feeling, and in what ii. 251 

- Belongs only to an a&ive or intelligent being . ibid* 

Judgements active and paffive ii. 101 

Diftinftiort . ■ i :. iv. 34 

In what inanner we learn to judge properly ii. 105 
Jpices,^ nourijhing, ought to be extracted from folia 
-'...foods • *• 55 

Julius Camiflus iL 265 

?upiter challenged by Ajax ii. 219 n 

uftice, to what our firft no'tidn of it is owing i. 149 
Juftice* human, the principal thereof . ii. 168 
Juftice and goodnefs . .- ibid. 

Jusueudl quoted ii. 91 

TC : 

Kitchen, French i. 288 

Kite L i. 316 

Knights of Malta, account of two Iv. 238 

Knowledge 1 a choice ought to be made of fubjeds 

adapted to the human understanding ii. 5 

Well viewed in its feveral connexions and relations 

prevents our entertaining any prejudices for the 

talents we cultivate ii. 71 

L. 

* 

Lais a iii. 246 
La Fontain, his fables improper for children i. 187 

Lambercier, M. de i. 247 

Langey, M. de iii. 114 

Language, natural i. 72 

Languages, whether the ftody thereof be proper for 

children i. 177 

y Language > 



i:JN ID .ErX- 

Languapa, why chilcUw&re taught ihedead one's by 

_ . Way of preference i. 177 

A child new dettms?mor* t&anone i. 176 

Laiv of politic h . iv. 115 

Law, what is wanting to them to render men free 

i. 118 

Favour the flrong again ft the weak ii. J71 

Laws, of nature, inonr^ffqiitry after them we Ihoold 

. not take &c> for reaftxii • ii. 31 

Example taken from gravity* ibid* 

laadimg-ftrings have a bad effed on children i. 100 

Learned arte wxlcrirbiii the truth than the ignorant 

■ - " « . ik 1©$ 
Leonhdas ill. 47 

Leffons ought to confifl more in a&ioi* than in words 

I - !• 154 

Liberty* die chief of all bleffings i. 1 15 

liberty well regidarwd, the only inftrumentof n good 

education k 134 

Liberty, in what it confifts . ii. 277 

For what reafon it was given us 278 

Confequences of the good or ill ufe of it iii. 12 

Library, Emilius's ii. 50 

Life, a governour looking after an ufelefs on*, tales 

that time which he had defigned to fpend iri en* 

hancing its value* ' r L 43 

At what time that of the individual properly cont- 

menceth i. 101 

. We ought to let children enjoy the pleafare of ic 

u 102 
Old men regret the lofs of it more then young ones 

1. 110 

A hardy life incfeafes the number of agreeable fenfa- 

tions i. 232 

Human life, its greateft dangers are in the beginning 

i. 101 

Short in many refpecls ii. 114 

Particular lives preferable to hiftory ii. 180 

Litharge ii. 45 

To live, What is meant by it i. 15 

Locke 



INDEX. 
Locit (Mr.) ii agaiaft giving phyCck lo children i. 

Examination of his maxim, that we muft reafon 
with them i. 126, 129, EjfW 

His manner of making a child generous i. 164 

He is (or having children learn to read with dice 
i. 199. 

Inconfiflency of this amhour in regard to their. 
drinking i. 228, 229 

What trade he is for having his gentleman learn 

ii. 8 S 

Recommends the fludying the nature of fpirits be. 
fore that of bodies ii. 21; 

Proved againll him, that matter is incapable of 
thinking ii. jjj 

At what time he has done with his pupil iii. 162 
Lard, a great one, fallen to poverty ii. 75 

Lstopbagi _ i. 293 

Lew requires a return ii. 122, 123, i3c 

Sees better than we ibid. 

Fixes our natural inclinations ibid.. 

Paflions with which it is attended ibid. 

Lwcoffelf, ihefourceof all our paflions ii. 117 

Always good and conformable to order ii. nB 

What fort of paflions fpring from it ii. 1 19 

Why it is never fatisfied ii, 120 

What fort of paflions arife from it ibid. 

Becomes pride in great fouls, vanity in little one* 
ii. laj 

How it is transformed into a virtue ii. 208 

L011, a very equitable fentiment iv. 51 

its power over the inclinations of young people 

ii. I2Z 

Luaci-a ii. 197 

l.jdiam, in what manner they diverted their hunger 

i. 299 



Hacbinu, too many of them frighten boys, and divert 

their attentioa ii. ^o 

Vol. IV. O M«c/m« 



INDEX.. 

Machines , we mould make them onrfelvts ij. yi 

By aflembling fuch a number of them, we find do 

refource within ourfelve* ii. 31 

Magifiratts, meaning of that word iv. 128 

Three interefts eflehtially different in the perfonof 

the magiftrate ibid. 

Malta-, Knights of, account of two • iv. 238 

Man, why he, knows not how todio. i. 47 

H is breath is mortal to his own fpecies i. 57 

Strong-of hijafelf* is made weak bji. foci ety i. 145 

Ought to be armed againft unforefeen accidents 

■"•.-• i» 356 

It the fame in all Nations ii. 7$ 

' What- rencter*. him efibnti&lly good or had ii. no 

' Ought to be grown up before he know* the* female 

fcx- r ■' ■- ii% 162 

Ought not to hp ihov^nvUi^raafqu^rade- to, a*- papifc 

I" «♦ i7» 

l Witb*wh*t~dif&Culty he thinks, and when ,orjceJ» 

begins, his cogitation never ceaies ii; 213 

jiman 1 uniting from oktjtudfi* auothtr, to what cob- 

. pai-ed _ * ^ ii. 19 

Jinan of f be world i±z\\ difguife ii. 156 

Jh what \h% natural felicity of man confiits- it. 34 

jf wan-in a flat© of mature, very different from- a man 

in the ftate of fociety ii. 104, 213 

M&n> what rank- he* occupies in tfeq order of things 

.' ^ ii. 268 

Compoied of two fubftances ii. 272, 283 

The manner of their being United, is lncompre- 

Henfible ii. 259, iii. 9- 

Hi* dignity -. ii» 269 

•'■ It fur nifhes him with a new motive of gratitude 

ii. 270 

Authoiir of moral -and phyJiGal4?il> '■• ii. 2^0 

. Why he is agreeable to a woman iii. 165 

His dependence on woman, and in what iii. 168, 

* 180 

J^is politenefs more officious than that of the wo- 
man . iii; 209 
c Natural judge of the woman's merit iii. 261 



£ N DBS 

deftgned<by nature to bc&tisfied with one wo- 
man jv. 48 

• The fame ift 1 - craery age iv. 49 
Mankind, why I mention them fo late to my pupil 

- The unreafonablenefc of their complaints of the 

(hoctneft of life iy. u 

kfawnert) how they may be reformed ^ '•, 2 4. 

• How a child will: be prevented from- prying into-" 

thofe of his governour i. 209 

Mips ii, 1*" 

Msrstl, a dancing-mafter at Paris i. 157-*— Ui. 119 

Marriage, its firft inflitution from nature ii. 242 

The moll facred of all engagements ibid* 

rDifproportioned marriages, the caufe thereof iii* 

280 

■ Happy marriages, on what they depend Ii* 1^5 

Ma/Zs, how to prevent children from being afraid of 

.thorn N i. 63 

Mnfiety governed by a- child 1. 2c6 

M&triallfm, its abfurdity ii* 260 

MaurUliJls, their chimerical diftinflions- iiv 250 

Their reafboing com.paie4 to -that of a deaf perfon 

ii. 274 
M&trimorp, modem, ilftetch of' iv. 185 

Mutter^ its natural (late* ii. 2*^6 

Is-incapable of thinking H. fcy^ 

Maxim* of behaviour, in- regard to children- i« 80 
Relating to pity ii. 141 

Me*grfd\*t becomes heating' by the feafoning i. 56 
Mt&f»res % new- ii te#* 

Memory^, children have no real memory ' i/1'75 
Howithe kind of memory which- they- have* is-cul- 
tonte^U' i. 187 

Mtmllipf>us y a tragedy written by Euripides ii. 22s 
Meridian* te- trace ik JO* 

An adventure which it occafioned ii. 41 

Malts, chofen as a mean- term for exchange ih 64 
Mttbed of learning the fciences with* left facility 
would be ufeful " ii. 1} 

Midas ■ ■ - - ii« 9SS 

o 2 iw/*, 



index: 

Uitf, whether it beindifcrcat tochoofethc 

milk or that of a norfe i. zz 

Is (cross at firft, and grows afterwards confident 

i. 51 

Is a vegetable fabftance L 54 

Curdles always in the ftomach i. 55 

Minds of tenfibility never fond of pnhlkk pJeafures 

Mifiry of man renders him ho mane ii. 137 

Miffionmria iii. 39 

Monarchy 9 what iv. 133 

Sufceptible of partition i£f'4 

Example iv. 134. 

Suitable to great kingdoms _ ibid. 

Money, why invented ii. 63 

Is only the means of companion ibid. 

Every thing may be nfed as money ibid. 

Whyftamped ii. 64 

Its ufc ibid. 

The moral effefts of this invention cannot be ex- 
gained to children ii. -65 

Monkeys of Labaa ii. 217 

Montague quoted i. 223, 235— ii. 1 10, 1 80, 298 
Montefquieu quoted ^ iv, 116 

Moon 9 the clouds paffing over it make it feem to 

move in a contrary direction ii. 102 

Moors, their character ^ iv. 236 

Morality, the manner of teaching it to children i. 

129 

The only moral leflbn foitable to children i. 167 
Morality and politicks ought not to be treated fepa- 
rately i|» 170 . 

The moral of fables examined i. 194 

The moral of fables ought not to be exprefied ii. 

Morocco, what Montagne fays of one of its kings i. 

2 3S 
Motion is not eflential to matter ii. 255 

Of two forts m ^ ibid. 

Whether that of animals be fpontancous ii. 256 

Proof of a firft caufe ii. 258* 261 

Motion, 



I N D E X. 

Motion* it is by this we learn that there are bodier 

diftinft from ourfelvea i. 71 

Motte, La, quoted, and on what occafion iii. 134 
Mu/cles of the face more flexible in a child, than in a 

grown perfon i. 73 

Mufick, the way to learn it by the touch i. , 254. 

May be made of ufe to converfe with a deaf perfon 

ibidm- 

Of the manner of teaching it to children i. 282, 

Myfteries ii. 220 

N- 

Nations, each have their particular charatter iv. 100 
In what manner national chara&erifticki wear off 

iv. 105, \o± 

Nativity of man happens twice ii. 1 14, 1 16 

Nature, different paths by which we deviate from 

her, fo early as our infancy i. 26 

She trains up children to con ft ant exercife i. 27 

How man deviates from her by means of his paf- 

fions ii. 117 

Her infer u&ions late and flow ii* 123 

Her progrefs in difplaying the power of the Jbx 

ii. # I34 
The nature of man i. 6 

Tbe Divine nature ii. 218 

Ne<wton ii. 258 

NiewwsnbiH ii. 265 

Night, the caufe ofits ftriking us with terrour i. 242 
The remedy againft this fright i. 246 

A nocturnal exploit of the authour in his infancy 

i. 247 

Noife of fire-arms i. 69 

Notions, moral, their progrefs in my pupil ii. 6 

Nutfe, the real one i. 50 

The beft, who is agreeable to the man-midwife 

i. 51 
Choice of one ibid* 

Should not change her manner of living i. ^% 

O 3 Hufft* 



I N D E X, 

-ffw/tt, ^bw'!*eiitefl,'a!id'Why u 23 

The reafon of their being fo attached 'to f the cof- 

-toro offwaddling clothes i. 61 

j£x4el in thcaft'df diverting children froin'fqoak 

ling i. 83 

^-precaution which they neglctt ibiti. 

Ttoey make «fe *>f too ^any Superfluous avoids to 

children, i. 86 

O. 

-Cbjefiions againft indulging children with liberty i. 

103 

Agai nft a late education i. 141 

A gain ft the inactive method df teaching nothing 

to children 4. *oo 

Ageinftitly manner of employing children i. 222 

• Again ft the eafrly exercife -df a 'body, not yet ar- 

rived at its full ^growth i. 2?6 

Againft the practice of trainings 'child to judge for 

himfelf ii. 55 

Again ft the choice of cbje&s -which 'the auihour 

•propofes to a youth ii. 151 

IQhjefls, choice of thofe we ought to (how to children 

i. 67, -68 

Of our firft obfervations, as foon as our thoughts 

begin to be diverted from ourfehres ii. 8 

Xyijefls purtly phyfical, the only one* capable of en* 

gaging the attention of children ii. ic<> 

Otjefis, int die final, are not adapted to the capacity 

ofyouth ii. 173 

*Obfer*vation on mariners, ineonvemency of fullering a 

youth to indulge himfelf too much in it ibid. 

^O Id men difagreeable to children i. 38 

Love to have every thing quiet about them i. 78 

'Opinion, what we are to do to reign by it ii. 8i 

To prevent a pupil from being fwayed by opinion, 

he muft not be governed by authority ii. 109 

• Eftablifhes its throne on the paflions of mankind 

ii.- 122 
Order to be obferved in ftudies ii. 20 

Mora/ 



>I » D £ X: 

Moral tt%kr> how a man enters into it jL 1S8 

#*•/<*/ «rirr, the tiitifc fbr exhibiting a view of k to 

aydtofcfe : l!fcm • ^ .. it. ( 1^0 

'Source of all its con traditions . 'ibid m 

ttamttfe'in^r^ig^lc *L. ii. *^S 

'OVgetos of fecret pleafure and difagreeable neceffity, 

why pkced fo ri^ar eaeh other ii. 128 

Orpheus . iii. i? 

Ottoman family, ancidttt cuftom of thfcfe princes ii. 

OtfcV quoted iii* 248 

Ptfg&nifmy its ttbominabfe deities .11,297 

/V», man ought to accuftom hinvfelf to it i. 99, 

How it lofes its ftiarpnefs in regard to children u 

. • ... 2 3* 

Palaces, their ufeleflhefs 4in 145 

Their inconveniencie* ibid* 

Palaces of ice in Ruffia . Hi. 140 

Pantaloon, how he comes to b$ dliagreeabfe ii. 198 
Parqceljus . ii. 265 

Parallel between: my pupil and youVs, upon their firft 

appearing in publick ii. 151 

Paris confidered in regard to tafte iii. ijji 

And under other relations iii. 161 

Parifian, how he comes to be ftupid with fo much 

underftanding iV*. 98 

PaJJionSy what natural toman i. 136 

The inftruments of our prefervatton ii. 116 

Which of them is the fource of all the reft ii. 117 

How man goes beyond nature by means of the 
paflions ii. 118 

How they are directed to good or evil ii. 1 20 

The fummary of human wifdom con fills in the right 
ufe of them ii. 133 

Their progrefs requires that of knowledge to be 
accelerattd ii. 22c 

Of Vki 



I N D S X. 

Tbefoft and Under paffions, as well as thofc of the iraf- 

cible k ind , are derived from felf love ii. 1 20 

Impetuous paJRons, the way to make children afraid of 

them uu 146 

Growing pajjions, the way to reduce them to rale 

i. 132 
Pajftom, in what refpecl good, in what bad iv. 84 
Pea/ant, S<wi/s, his notion of regal power ii. 219 
Pea/ants are not afraid of fpiders i. 68 

Their children articulate better than oar's i. 88 

Do not lifp ihtd. 

Why more ftupid than a favage i. 202 

People, the common people have as much fenfe and 

underftanding as the better fort ii. 147 

A corrupt people nzvc neither vigour nor true courage 

ii. 102 
People 0/ good morals, their peculiar qualities ii. 163 

The meaning of the word people in apolitical fenfe 

Perfection, what dogma it is owing to ii. 221 

Perfpefiive, without its decepion we fhould diftinguifli 

no fuch thin? as fpace or diftance i. 258 

Peruvians, in what manner they treated their children 

i. 61 
Peter the Great ii. 94 

Petronius quoted ^ ii. 55 

Petulance ol children, what it is owing to i. 75, 134 
Philip, phyfician to Alexander the Great, his hiftory 

I. 182 
Pbilofophers, who are they ii. 245 

Caufe of thediverfny of their fentiments ibid* 
Are notintereded in difcovering the truth ii. 246 
Their only objed ibid. 

Their whimfical fyftems ii. 266, iii. 1 

Philofophy reduced to maxims ', the refult of experience 

ii. 178 

Philofophy, modern, one of its mod frequent miflakes 

"• 12 3 
Experimental philofophy requires fimpie inftruments 

II. 30 
Pbyticks) or natural philofophy, its firit leflbn, ii. 33 

Phjfidi, 



INDEX. 

Phyficks % fyftem of, what good for ii. 32 

Pity, in what manner it a els upon the mind ii. 140 

It is a fweet paffion, and why ii. 137 

In what manner it is prevented from degenerating 

into weaknefs ii. 209 

Plan laid down by the authour i. 36, 37 

Plato, his imaginary good man iii. 47 

. His manner of travelling was on foot iv. 4 

Why he allotted the fame exercifes to women as to 

men in his republick iii. 175 

Plutarch ii. 282 

Poifon, what idea children have of it i. 184 

folitenefs, in what true politenefs con (ids iii. 122 

PafTages from Monf. Duclos relating to this fubjeft 

ibid. 
Polygamy iv. 49 

Poor man has no need of education i. 40 

Poul €errho, What it fignifies among the Mahome- 
tans iii. 61 
Power of the fex, in what manner children forward 
it ii. 134 
Meaning of this word in politicks iii* 104 
Pewer fuperfluQus, in man, the caufe of his mifery 

i. 108 

Preceptor 9 Emilius's, is become a confident of his 

pupil and of Sophia, and a mediator of their 

courtihip iv. 33 

Glories in this employment, and mentions all its 

agreeable circumftancea ibid. 

Travels with Emilius ; brings him back to Sophia ; 

has the pleafure of feeing them married, and 

fpends the remainder of his days with them. 

' See Emilius and Sophia. 

Preceptor $, their mi (taken behaviour towards their 

pupils, upon their coming to maturity iv. 53 

Prejudice againft a mechanick trade ^ how I teach 

Emilius to overcome it. ii. 81 

prejudices , to grow proud of conquering them, is 

fu emitting to them ii. oe 

Do not change the natural relations Si. 24$ 

O 5 . Prefcnt 



.INDEX- 

Prtfent time ought not to be facrificed tt> futurity hi 
thfe matter of education i. 101 

Pride, fource of the greateft evils - - jv. 86 
-principles of things, why fach oafioos as acknowledg- 
> ed two, reckoned the bad inferior to the good i. 77 
Profeffion of faith of a Savoyard curate ii. 240 

Progrefs of Emilias at twelve years old i. 3099 

306, &fr # 

At fifteen ii. no, &c 

Property, fpecimcn of the manner of infilling the 

firft notion of it into a child i. 15& 

&tt<vidence 9 confidered in relation to the liberty of 

man ii. 278, 280 

In what manner jollified ii. 281 

And in what refpeft ii. 282 

Punifoment, ought to be unknown to children i. 135* 

Puberty, changes in individuals according to<cO*ftito> 

tion, and in men according to climates ii. 123 

May be accelerated, or retarded, by moral -caufes ibi<L 

. Always more forward among civilized nations, and 

in towns ii. 124 

Pupil, an imaginary one formed by the authour u 36 

Inconveniency in his paffing through different 

hands i. 53 

Advantage in his learning nothing till he is twelve 

years old /' i. 138 

In what manner he may be rendered capable of 

perception, memory, and reafoning i. 201 
Ought to be inftrutted only by experience 209 
The inconveniency of his inftruclion is not fo 

much in his not understanding, but in thinking 

that he underftands ii. 6, 44 

In vifiting the (hops of artificers, he ought to fet 

his hand to work ii. 54 

Utility of his employing himfelf in the -manual 

arts ii. 79 

A proper trade for him, if he has a tafte for the 

fpeculative fciences ii. 94 

How I manage to prevent mine from being as lazy 

as a favage ii. 98 

Pupil, 



I N 1 D E X. 

Pupil t upon ceafirig to be a child, he ought tobe fen fi We 

of the fuperior knowledge of his tutor ii. 19c, 

Difference between your pupil and mine ii. 21 1 

Pupils, what wercife they are taught, while that of 

fwimming is neglected i. 237 

Pyrrbus, Emilius's judgement on that prince's life 

11. 185 
Pythagoras, his coropatifon of a view of the world. 

ii. 17& 

Stveftion, by which one gets rid' of the impertinent 
interrogations of children: ii* $7; 

Ad vantages thereof ibid. 

A puzzling queftioirahd anfwer to ifc ik 129- 

Qttintrlian quoted i. 200* 

%uhcttx* Dotty or knights errant iu 203.— iri 245. 

RV 

Raymund Lu/Ii, what his art was good for iv. gg 
Reading, manner of 'teaching children to read i. 

198, fcfc- 
Reafin, a check to force i. 3 1 

In what manner children* conceive a diftafte again ft 

it i. 139* 

Reafin, jfikftfive i. 221. 

Its inftruments i. 22* 

Reajbnti ; imp6rtaiJ**<^^vttg-!«j(netocWldren, who 

are incapable of underftanding any i. 129. 

Rtafoning, that of children ^ i. L30 

As fbon as the mind has begun to form ideas, ever? 
ju8£ement then is rtafoning, ii. 10S; 

RefrdQio* ii 105 

Refu/ahy not to be i&vtth of them r and never to rec a 1' 

them m i. 120* 

Reghnen, Pythagorean w 56, 293. 

Regimen, vegetable, proper for nurfe* *• 5* 

Rtguhs iii- a 

O 6 Riiattint 



INDEX. 

Relations foetal, how they ought to be mown to dpi- 

dren ii. 54 

Religion, choice of one for Emilias ii. 227 

Ought not to be taught as an objed of melancholy 
and re ft rain t ^ iii. 212 

Its efficacy in hinderiog evil, and promoting good, 

iii. 60 

Three principal ones in Europe 4ii 35 

Remorfe ii. 296 

Repajl rural, compared to a grand entertainment 

ii. 68 
Reprimand which theauthour received from a juggler 

in Etnilius's prefence ii. 26 

Republic k (Plato's) is not a political treatife i. 10 

What it is ibid. 

In what mariner children were educated therein 

Rich man, the education of his ftate is not proper for 
him u 40 

Reduced to poverty ii. 76 

Rich people deceived in every thing i. 50 

What they generally are iii. 13a 

What they ought to do, in order to enjoy their 
riches iii. 140 

Always reftlefs ibid,. 

Who is the real rich man iii» 143 

Robert, the gardener. His dialogue with the authour 

and his pupil i. 152, fcfr* 

Robin/on Crufoe ii. 51 

Romans, illuftrious, how they fpent their youth ii % 

203 

Their attention to the language of figns iii. 83 
Rome, her refpeft for the women iii. 243 

Saved by a banifhed citizen iii. 244 

Made free by a worn a n ibid. 

Romulus muft have had an affection for the wolf by 

whom he was fuckled iii. 118 

RuJJla, palaces of ice there iii. 140 

A Saint 



I N ■ B E X. 



s; 



Saint Pierre,. Abbe de> quoted iv. 140 

SaUntum (a fecond) an objecl of Emilius's enquiries 

fv. 137 

Sam/on iii. 171 

Sardanapalus, bis epitaph iii. 133 

Savages, their infancy iii* 60 

Their youth - *J//, 

Why more cunning than peasants i. 202 

According to the phyficians, they ought to be laid 

up with, the rheumatifm t i, 229 

Why cruel i. 29J 

Of all people the leafl curious, and the leaft uneafy 

ii. 156 
Savoyard Curate's profeffibn of faith ii. 240 

Scepticksy their misfortune • ii. t 244 

Sen/at ions and fentiments are differently exprefled 

J* 73 
Diflinguifhed from ideas ii. 100 

The way- to have two contradictory ones at the 
fame time, in regard to the fame body ibid. 

How each of them may become an idea in regard 
to us ii. 105 

*Tht fenfations of pleafurt and pain precede the re- 
prefentative ones . i. 70 

Thtfen/ation of one's exigence, a doubt concern- 
ing its nature ii. 2 co 
The internal ftnfation relative to the vifible order 
of the univerfe ii. 263 > 291 
Uatural fen/at ions t of two forts iii. I 
Prior to our underflanding iii. 2 
Senfations different from their caofe or their objelt 

ii* 250 
How diftinguifhed by the fenfitive being ii. 291 
ienfes, which of them ihows itfelf the la t eft in chil- 
dren i. 70 
Of the art of exercifing them . i. 230 
, Two methods of verifying their relations ii. 105 
Common fenfif what it meant by it i. %oz 



INDEX. 

StnfibiRty, how it is ftifled* or prevented from growl- 
ing ii. 138 
How it rifcs ibicL 
To what that of young people is at firft confined 

ii. 164. 
Ought to ferve as a check to reftrain them ii t 165 
Sentiments, gradation in thofe of a child ii. 1 19, 
What is the fir ft fentiment of which a. yotith care- 
fully educated is fufceptible iu 135; 
Stxes, idle difpute about their preference or equality 

in. Y64. 
In what refpecls equal ibid*. 

-In what they admit not of a conrparifon ibid* 

In their union they differently concur in the fame 
objea ibid. 

From this union arife the fofteft laws of love 

iii. 170 
Their relative duties ought not to be equally rigid 

• ' iii. 17 it 

Whatever diftinguifhes the fex ought to be re~ 

fpe&ed iii. 177 

In what refpedl their focial union is admirable 

111. 211 

Shore, why to thofe who put off to fea, it feems to 
move ii. 102 

Sb*ttle-a>c&, a woinan^ play J. 275. 

Sight, the exercife of this fenfe i. 258 

What renders its decisions precarfotrs i* 250^ 

In what manner running affifts the fight i. 265 

Sign, ought not to be fubftttuted in the place of the 
thing fignified,, but when it is iinpoffible to mow it 

Sigts, energy of their language ii. 292 

Relative toeducation ii. 293 

Sir I tnujl live; reflexion on that expreffion, and en 
the anfwer ii. 74, 

Situations, in which the natural wants of man, and 
the means of providing for them, are reprefented 
in a manner obvious to the capacity of a child 

ii. 50 

Sketch of modern matrimony iv. 185 

Sleep 



I N D E ^X. 

Sleep of children i. 230 

The way to regulate its duration }• 2 3 l 

Smallpox ^ i. 236 

Smelly reflexion on this fenfe i. 299, 360 

Society has weakened man i. 1 1 5 

Cannot fubfift without exchange of commodities 

11. 6$ 

Whence it follows, that every fociety has for its 

firft law fome conventional equality ibid* 

Application of this principle to commerce and the 

arts ii 64. 

Seer at a - iii. 48 

SoJo*, an an} aft afl of that leg id a tor iv. 124.. 

Sophia t the intended fpoufe of Emilias iii. i6z 

Her character iii. 249 

Is fond of drefs, and underflands it 'iii. 251. 

Her natural abilities iii. 252 

. Her acquired abilities ibid, Isc. 

• Her domeftick applications iii. 253, 

Underflands hoale- keeping in all its branches ibid. 

Extremely nice in regard to cleanlinefs iii; 254. 

Owes this defedt to her mother's initru&ions ibid. 

Yet (he avoids an overtrained delicacy ibidi. 

Qualities of her mind iii. 256 

Sketch of her character ibid, 13c. 

Is not without religion, and of what fort iii. 258. 

Is in love with virtue, and from what motive ibid. 

Acquainted with the duties and prerogatives, txnhv 

of her fex and our'* iii. 260 

Is but little acquainted with the world iii, 261 

. Supplies that want by a peculiar politenefs ibid. 

Behtves with filence and refpeft in company iii. 

262 

She aflomes a different bat modeft carriage with 
young people of her own age iii. 263 

Her ^manner of anfwering the whining ipeeches of 
fops iii. 264 

She is pleafed with fincere praife, and with homage 
founded on efteem ibid. 

Her father's fpeech to her upon intimating his in- 
tention of marrying her Iii. 26^ 



1 



D K X. 

Sophia, the former Hate of her father and mother iii. 

266 

Their prefcnt. foliation ibid. 

Happy in their poverty Hid. 

Is left to her own choice in regard to a hufeand 

m iii. 267 

Is fuppofed to be of a very warm eonftitmion iii. 
170 
Sent to town, and why iii. 27a 

Returns to herparems iii. 273 

Her health is impaired iii, 274 

The rival of KucharM iii. 277 

Sees Emilius and hisgovernour, who happened to 

take up their lodging at her father's iv. 8 

Imagines ihe beholds Telemachus in Emilius 
iv. a 
Pays a favourable attention to him iv. 25 

Openly aiTumes theauthority of a miftrefs iv. 35 
Receives leflbr.s from her lover, in different arts 

andfeitnees iv 38 

Is indebted to her lover for the prize at running 

iv. 6* 

Accompanied by her mother, (he goes and Tees 

him work iv. 66 

Accepts him for her htiiband, and on what ccca- 

Prepared for a feparation of two years iv. 9; 

Her behaviour at his departure iv. 96 

Emilius upon his return marries her iv. 156 

Becomes prtgnant iv. 168 

Is mother of two children iv, 179 

Lofesher father, mother, anddaughter iv. 180 
Accompanies a female friend to the capital iv, 181 
Lofes her tafleforrerirement iv. 184, 

Becomes indifferent to her hufband iv. 185 

ConfefTes her infidelity iv. 190 

Vifitsherhumrmd fecretly iv. 21S 

Stwtnign, fign lfication of this word in politicks iv, 
12S 

Soul of man, its immateriality proved ii. Z83 

I cannot imagine fucb. a being can perilh ii. 284. 

Soaniardt, 



INDEX. 

Spaniards, their manner of travelling ir% 10* 

Sparta, the refpect that republick had for women 

iii. 243 

Spartans, brought up unlucky boys, yet were not 

the more ilupid when they came of age L 206 

Sphere, armillary, an ill contrived machine ii. 1 6 

Spiders, what kind of children are afraid of them 

u 68 

Spirit, how this word is undcrftood by the vulgar 

and children iL 216 

Its original meaning ibid. 

Spirits of a child ought to be exhafad at £rft, and 

afterwards retained and comprefied i. 171 

Spontaneity is not applicable to unorganized matter 

ii. 256 
Squinting, way to prevent a child from having this 
defect i. 67 

State of nature, in leaving it, we compel our fellow- 
creatures to leave it alfo ii. 7; 
What occupation comes neareft the Hate of nature 

State of nature, and civil policy, what is necefTary to 

re-unite the advantages of both i. 117 

Staticks, the firft leJTon in that fcience ^ ii. 30 

S tricks, one of their whimfical paradoxes t ii. 292 

Studies, whether they are to be performed only by 

the eye i. 180 

Whether there are any proper for children i. 185 
Studies, fpeculative, too much encouraged in the time 

of life fitted for action ii. 201 

Stupidity of a child always kept under his mother's 

wing i, 219 

How I mould reprefent the mod deplorable ftu. 

pidity ii. 220 

Sun, defer iption of its ri fine ii. 10 

Subjefis, relative to the focial compact j meaning of 

this word in politicks iv. 129 

Subftance, animal in putrefaction fvvanus with worm* 

i. 54 
Subfances, how many there are ii. 218 

Suetonius, quoted i. 31 



I N D E X* 

9*rp rifts, in the night ■?. 2£i 

Swaddling chthis 'I. 17, <6o, 81 

&&im*ting, what exercife is preferred to it, in the 
edifcatfb'nof a^nV^frtteihrfn i. 23? 

What rediers it dUHgtnus i. 23* 

ty*Ato/Yi-mfthod ii. 16 

T. 

Tacitus, at what time of life this aothOtfr is proper 

to be read h. 178 

Quoted iv. 10 J 

Talents, natural, how -eaflly wc may T>etmilak€n in 

judging t>f thetn- ii. 8> 

Example ii. 83 

The goodeflfcft of talents or abilities ifi. 207 

Which holds the firft rank in the art of pleating 

ibid. 

The agreeable talents or accomplifhments, reduced 

to an art iii. 205 

Tarquin iii. 82 

Tajle, remarks on this fenfe i. 286 

Natural taftes are the moil fimple ibid. 

And the moft general i. 287 

Tajle, considerations on tafte iii. 126 

Where it ought to be ftudied iii. 131. 

That of the ancients very different from that of 

the moderns iii. 132* 

Taftes, ftrong, naturally difagreeable to us i. 287 

Inconveniency in accuiioming ourfelves to them 

i. 288. 
Tailors, unknown to the ancients ii. 90 

Teeth, a way to forward the cutting of them i. 84 
Telemachus iii. 290 

Tennis, an exercife for boys i. 275 

Terraffon, the Abbe, oppofed, and on what account 

iii. 134 

Tbales, in what manner he travelled x ^ iv. 4 

Theatre, what we learn there iii. 135. 

What the ftudy of the ftage leads to ibid. 

Tbemijlocles^ 



t N fi E X. 

WtomfactoytA'xvh&t'nktLiitr his foh Yufed ftll ©reW* 

i; 114 
TUodtlitt ii. 31 

F&ejtius, his fifty daughters mentioned, and on what 
v >*occafion 'iii. 170 

Tbrafybulut , iii. 82 

Tbucydides, the bed model for hiftorians » ii. 178 
Thunder, children are feldom afraid of it i. 69 

Time, it is much worfe to lofe it, by making in ill 

ufe of it, than by fitting ftill i. 173 

Toilette, wtett the abtffe of it is owing to iii. 20& 
?W/, or i n ft rumen w, the more 'ingenious they are, 

the more our organs become rude and imperfedt 

ii. 31 
Tongue, French (fee Language) iii. 86 

T+uck, the improvement of this fenfe i. 24c* 

its judgements limited and certain i. 253 

How it is capable, of fupplyirig -the -fight i. 241 
And the hearing i. 254 

Without it, we fhould never have an idea of ex- 
ten Hon 1 i. 266 

Tonvjis, ptpuhus, are the graves of the human fpecies 

Why the different races degenerate there ii. 125 

Large ones exhauft a ftate- iv. 141 

Trade, why I am willing that Emilias fhould learn 

one ii. 85 

Trades, reafon of their-difference ii. 73 

Travelling, queftion relative to that fubjedl iv. 97 

The manner of propofing the queftion differently ib. 

Another manner iv. 99 

Why fome people improve lefs by it, than by 

reading iv. 100 

It is undertaken with fome particular defign iv. 107 

It is adapted to very few iv. 108 

What renders it ufelefs to young people ibid. 

Confidered as a part of education, ought to be 

under particular rules iv. 109 

Why they ought to make but fhort flay in great 

towns iv. 138 



J 



I N T> E X. 

Tnuftrg of St. Mark at Venice, what it wants i. sz 
7r^/^, when we can without riflt infift on a child'; 

telling it i. 21ft 

Yurenne, Marina!* a fpecimen of his good nature ii. 

18a 

And. of his weaknef*. ihid* 



T. 

Valeriut Maximvs quoted r. 97 

Vanity, difagreeable confeqaences of the firft emo- 
tions of this paflion in Emilias ii. 28 
Farro quoted i. 14 
Venice, why that government is adored by the peo- 
ple iii. 8r 
Vice, there is not one in the human heart, but yon 
nay tell in what manner it entered i. 136 
The firft ftep is the only painful one iv. 209 
piohnct ufed to women, very common in the Greek 
and Jewifh antiquities iii. 169 
More rarely in our times, and why ibid. 
Virgil % the mod beautiful verfe in that poet ii. 142 
Virginity , importance of preferving it a long time 

ii. 125 
Directions in regard to it ii. 1 28 

Virtue is not lefs favourable to the caufe of love, than 
to the other privileges of nature iii* 244 

The only road to happinefs iii. 259 

Etymology of this word iv. 82 

What is the balls of it ibid* 

What is meant by a virtuous man, iv. 83 

UlyJ/is charmed with the finging of the Syrens iii, 92 
His companions debaftd by Circe iv. 70 

Undemanding^ or mind, has its particular form, ac- 
cording to which it mould be governed i. 140 
Its chara&eriftick ii. IOO 

The underftandings of your pupil and mine ii. 211 
Vnderjlandingy the proof and meafure of its maturity 

ii. 6, 34 
Uiiiwji 



INDEX. 

Umvcrji, its harmony demon ft rates a fupreme intel- 
ligence ii. 267 
yacaiulary of a child ought to be /hot t i. oj 
Voht, bow many forts a man has i. 280 
yoifei iii. 244 
Uft of the invention^ money ii. -64 
Viiliiy, meaning of this word in the mindsofchil- 

W'liy common boys are not (track with this idea 
ii. 36 
An inllance of the manner of making it intelligi- 
ble to then ii, 41, 42, 43 

Warnings ntghHtd, whether it be proper to repeat 
them after the affair is over ii. 196 

Water, how a child ought to drink it i. 229 

Wiaknefi, in what it conflfls ii. 209 

What that of man is owing to ii. 1 

It is that which renders him ibciable ii, 136 

Winning, time and manner of weaning children i. 84 

Wine, we are not naturally fond of it i. 287 

Mixed with litharge is poifon ii. 45 

Way 10 deteft this adulteration ii. 46 

Wifdtm, human, in whatit confifts i. ioj,— ii. 133. 
iv. 178 

Witty fayingt, the way to hit upon them i. i6g 

Woman cotlidered as an imperfect man ii. 114 

In many refpeib is no more than a great child ii. 

i'S 
Women, the earlieft part of our education is owing td 

They no longer choofe to be nurfes or mothers 

19, 21, 2+ 
What kind of addrefs they like in the men ii. 70 
Enquiry into the relations and differences between 
their fex and ours iii. 163 

In what refpefls they are men Hid, 

Their detonation iii. 16c 

it«mb» 



1 

* 

L 



y. 



I N : D? E, X, 

fftapun, tfcir -VW tp C0p%ucg nvw ijf 4 165 

. Glory in their weaknefs In. ijSg 

. Ad as fuch,aU;thfpr f liv£* iij. 174 

What is neceflary for ^ r^rfprmingof their dury 

ibid* 

The infidelity of marri^ wom^n. more- criminal 

tha^tha^ofinw . : iji. 17a 

Ought to reckon the preferring of appearances one 

of tfce£r4utw : . i|i, 173 

.More prolifick in the Country than in great towns, 

and^wfep ibid. 

Their education ought to be contrary to that of 

man, and in what refpett iii. 176 

And relative to man , ibid. 

Their dependence on man, and in what iii. 1 80 

. How they* d^viate'fponv th«ir fta.tft iii, i£i 

Their mofl important quality iii. 194 

. Their real reiqurqes . iii* 197 

Their politenefs iii. 309 

Their peculiar taUmtii.addreft, and not falfehood 

iii. 229 

Are not formed for an enquiry into abftrad and 

fpeculative truths iii. 233 

They have an excellent tafte in natural things iii. 

234 

Their undemanding: fooner arrives a& perfection 

thaji.tha;. of men . iii. 260 

^re the natural judges of the merit of our fex iii. 

261 

Caufe of the principal revolutions-, in the Roman 

republick iii, 244 

Mere pretenders in learning iii. 287 

Woguit<vcidof7*9diflyi moift deceitful thaa^ the red 

iii* 231 
Toung nvtmeu* Sv&YcHtig* 

W.ords t a child ought to learn none, but fuch as he 

underftaftds i. 93 

Difficulty, ojf givingthem always the fame meaning 

i. 176 
The only thing w$ te*$h children i. 177 

World, 
1 



